CHAPTER I. Down the Rabbit-Hole

Alice was beginning to get very tired of sitting by her sister on the bank, and of having nothing to do: once or twice she had peeped into the book her sister was reading, but it had no pictures or conversations in it, 'and what is the use of a book,' thought Alice 'without pictures or conversation?'

So she was considering in her own mind (as well as she could, for the hot day made her feel very sleepy and stupid), whether the pleasure of making a daisy-chain would be worth the trouble of getting up and picking the daisies, when suddenly a White Rabbit with pink eyes ran close by her.

There was nothing so VERY remarkable in that; nor did Alice think it so VERY much out of the way to hear the Rabbit say to itself, 'Oh dear! Oh dear! I shall be late!' (when she thought it over afterwards, it occurred to her that she ought to have wondered at this, but at the time it all seemed quite natural); but when the Rabbit actually TOOK A WATCH OUT OF ITS WAISTCOAT-POCKET, and looked at it, and then hurried on, Alice started to her feet, for it flashed across her mind that she had never before seen a rabbit with either a waistcoat-pocket, or a watch to take out of it, and burning with curiosity, she ran across the field after it, and fortunately was just in time to see it pop down a large rabbit-hole under the hedge.

In another moment down went Alice after it, never once considering how in the world she was to get out again.

The rabbit-hole went straight on like a tunnel for some way, and then dipped suddenly down, so suddenly that Alice had not a moment to think about stopping herself before she found herself falling down a very deep well.

Either the well was very deep, or she fell very slowly, for she had plenty of time as she went down to look about her and to wonder what was going to happen next. First, she tried to look down and make out what she was coming to, but it was too dark to see anything; then she looked at the sides of the well, and noticed that they were filled with cupboards and book-shelves; here and there she saw maps and pictures hung upon pegs. She took down a jar from one of the shelves as she passed; it was labelled 'ORANGE MARMALADE', but to her great disappointment it was empty: she did not like to drop the jar for fear of killing somebody, so managed to put it into one of the cupboards as she fell past it.

'Well!' thought Alice to herself, 'after such a fall as this, I shall think nothing of tumbling down stairs! How brave they'll all think me at home! Why, I wouldn't say anything about it, even if I fell off the top of the house!' (Which was very likely true.)

Down, down, down. Would the fall NEVER come to an end! 'I wonder how many miles I've fallen by this time?' she said aloud. 'I must be getting somewhere near the centre of the earth. Let me see: that would be four thousand miles down, I think' (for, you see, Alice had learnt several things of this sort in her lessons in the schoolroom, and though this was not a VERY good opportunity for showing off her knowledge, as there was no one to listen to her, still it was good practice to say it over) '-yes, that's about the right distance-but then I wonder what Latitude or Longitude I've got to?' (Alice had no idea what Latitude was, or Longitude either, but thought they were nice grand words to say.)

Presently she began again. 'I wonder if I shall fall right THROUGH the earth! How funny it'll seem to come out among the people that walk with their heads downward! The Antipathies, I think-' (she was rather glad there WAS no one listening, this time, as it didn't sound at all the right word) '-but I shall have to ask them what the name of the country is, you know. Please, Ma'am, is this New Zealand or Australia?' (and she tried to curtsey as she spoke-fancy CURTSEYING as you're falling through the air! Do you think you could manage it?) 'And what an ignorant little girl she'll think me for asking! No, it'll never do to ask: perhaps I shall see it written up somewhere.'

Down, down, down. There was nothing else to do, so Alice soon began talking again. 'Dinah'll miss me very much to-night, I should think!' (Dinah was the cat.) 'I hope they'll remember her saucer of milk at tea-time. Dinah my dear! I wish you were down here with me! There are no mice in the air, I'm afraid, but you might catch a bat, and that's very like a mouse, you know. But do cats eat bats, I wonder?' And here Alice began to get rather sleepy, and went on saying to herself, in a dreamy sort of way, 'Do cats eat bats? Do cats eat bats?' and sometimes, 'Do bats eat cats?' for, you see, as she couldn't answer either question, it didn't much matter which way she put it. She felt that she was dozing off, and had just begun to dream that she was walking hand in hand with Dinah, and saying to her very earnestly, 'Now, Dinah, tell me the truth: did you ever eat a bat?' when suddenly, thump! thump! down she came upon a heap of sticks and dry leaves, and the fall was over.

Alice was not a bit hurt, and she jumped up on to her feet in a moment: she looked up, but it was all dark overhead; before her was another long passage, and the White Rabbit was still in sight, hurrying down it. There was not a moment to be lost: away went Alice like the wind, and was just in time to hear it say, as it turned a corner, 'Oh my ears and whiskers, how late it's getting!' She was close behind it when she turned the corner, but the Rabbit was no longer to be seen: she found herself in a long, low hall, which was lit up by a row of lamps hanging from the roof.

There were doors all round the hall, but they were all locked; and when Alice had been all the way down one side and up the other, trying every door, she walked sadly down the middle, wondering how she was ever to get out again.

Suddenly she came upon a little three-legged table, all made of solid glass; there was nothing on it except a tiny golden key, and Alice's first thought was that it might belong to one of the doors of the hall; but, alas! either the locks were too large, or the key was too small, but at any rate it would not open any of them. However, on the second time round, she came upon a low curtain she had not noticed before, and behind it was a little door about fifteen inches high: she tried the little golden key in the lock, and to her great delight it fitted!

Alice opened the door and found that it led into a small passage, not much larger than a rat-hole: she knelt down and looked along the passage into the loveliest garden you ever saw. How she longed to get out of that dark hall, and wander about among those beds of bright flowers and those cool fountains, but she could not even get her head through the doorway; 'and even if my head would go through,' thought poor Alice, 'it would be of very little use without my shoulders. Oh, how I wish I could shut up like a telescope! I think I could, if I only know how to begin.' For, you see, so many out-of-the-way things had happened lately, that Alice had begun to think that very few things indeed were really impossible.

There seemed to be no use in waiting by the little door, so she went back to the table, half hoping she might find another key on it, or at any rate a book of rules for shutting people up like telescopes: this time she found a little bottle on it, ('which certainly was not here before,' said Alice,) and round the neck of the bottle was a paper label, with the words 'DRINK ME' beautifully printed on it in large letters.

It was all very well to say 'Drink me,' but the wise little Alice was not going to do THAT in a hurry. 'No, I'll look first,' she said, 'and see whether it's marked \"poison\" or not'; for she had read several nice little histories about children who had got burnt, and eaten up by wild beasts and other unpleasant things, all because they WOULD not remember the simple rules their friends had taught them: such as, that a red-hot poker will burn you if you hold it too long; and that if you cut your finger VERY deeply with a knife, it usually bleeds; and she had never forgotten that, if you drink much from a bottle marked 'poison,' it is almost certain to disagree with you, sooner or later.

However, this bottle was NOT marked 'poison,' so Alice ventured to taste it, and finding it very nice, (it had, in fact, a sort of mixed flavour of cherry-tart, custard, pine-apple, roast turkey, toffee, and hot buttered toast,) she very soon finished it off.

'What a curious feeling!' said Alice; 'I must be shutting up like a telescope.'

And so it was indeed: she was now only ten inches high, and her face brightened up at the thought that she was now the right size for going through the little door into that lovely garden. First, however, she waited for a few minutes to see if she was going to shrink any further: she felt a little nervous about this; 'for it might end, you know,' said Alice to herself, 'in my going out altogether, like a candle. I wonder what I should be like then?' And she tried to fancy what the flame of a candle is like after the candle is blown out, for she could not remember ever having seen such a thing.

After a while, finding that nothing more happened, she decided on going into the garden at once; but, alas for poor Alice! when she got to the door, she found she had forgotten the little golden key, and when she went back to the table for it, she found she could not possibly reach it: she could see it quite plainly through the glass, and she tried her best to climb up one of the legs of the table, but it was too slippery; and when she had tired herself out with trying, the poor little thing sat down and cried.

'Come, there's no use in crying like that!' said Alice to herself, rather sharply; 'I advise you to leave off this minute!' She generally gave herself very good advice, (though she very seldom followed it), and sometimes she scolded herself so severely as to bring tears into her eyes; and once she remembered trying to box her own ears for having cheated herself in a game of croquet she was playing against herself, for this curious child was very fond of pretending to be two people. 'But it's no use now,' thought poor Alice, 'to pretend to be two people! Why, there's hardly enough of me left to make ONE respectable person!'

Soon her eye fell on a little glass box that was lying under the table: she opened it, and found in it a very small cake, on which the words 'EAT ME' were beautifully marked in currants. 'Well, I'll eat it,' said Alice, 'and if it makes me grow larger, I can reach the key; and if it makes me grow smaller, I can creep under the door; so either way I'll get into the garden, and I don't care which happens!'

She ate a little bit, and said anxiously to herself, 'Which way? Which way?', holding her hand on the top of her head to feel which way it was growing, and she was quite surprised to find that she remained the same size: to be sure, this generally happens when one eats cake, but Alice had got so much into the way of expecting nothing but out-of-the-way things to happen, that it seemed quite dull and stupid for life to go on in the common way.

So she set to work, and very soon finished off the cake.the of and to a in that is was he for it with as his on be at by I this had not are but from or have an they which one were you all her she there would their we him been has when who will no more if out its so up said what about than into them can only other time new some could these two may first then do any like my now over such our man me even most made after also well did many before must years back through much where your way down should because long each just state people those too how Mr. little good world make very year still see own work men day get here old between both life being under three never know same last another while us off might great states go come since against right came take used himself few house use place during high without again home around small however found Mrs. part school thought went say general once upon every left war don't does got united number hand course water until always away public something fact less through far put head think called set almost enough end took government night yet system better four nothing told eyes city going president why days present point didn't look find asked second group later next room social business knew program give half side face toward white five let young form given per order large several national important possible rather big among case often early things looked ever become best need within felt along children saw church light power least family development interest others open thing seemed want area god members mind help country service turned door done law although whole line problem sense certain different kind began thus means matter perhaps name times itself action human above week company free example hands local show history whether act either gave death feet today across body past quite taken anything field having seen word car experience I'm money really class words already college information tell making sure themselves together full air shall held known period keep political real miss probably century question seems behind cannot major office brought special whose boy cost federal economic self south problems heard six study ago became moment run available job street result short west age change position board individual reason turn close areas am love society level court control true community force I'll type front wife center future hard policy seem clear town voice wanted woman common department girl black party land necessary surface top following rate sometimes tax mother music students low military child further third red university able education feel provide effect morning nations total near road stood art figure outside north million leave value cut usually fire plan play sound therefore evidence table book strong range believe living peace various mean modern says soon lines looking schools single alone longer minutes personal process secretary gone idea months situation women increase nor section pressure private started dark ground Dr. east nature stage finally kept call father needed values greater expected view that's everything space ten union basis spirit brown required taking complete conditions except hundred late moved ones wrote hours return support attention hour live particular recent data hope person beyond coming dead middle cold costs else forces heart material couldn't developed feeling fine story inside lost read report research twenty industry instead miles son wall added amount followed makes move pay basic can't including building defense hold reached simply tried central wide committee equipment picture island simple actually care religious shown friends river beginning getting higher medical received rest sort boys doing floor foreign terms trying indeed administration cent difficult subject especially meeting earth market paper passed walked blue bring county labor hall natural police similar training final growth international property talk working written food girls start wasn't answer hear issue purpose suddenly weeks western needs stand you're considered countries fall hair likely nation lay sat cases color entire happened paid production ready results square difference earlier involved meet step stock thinking club letter aid increased lot month particularly whom below effort knowledge lower points sent trade using industrial size yes bad bill certainly eye ideas temperature addition deal due method methods moral reading decided directly nearly neither questions record showed statements throughout anyone programs try according member physical science services southern hot remember strength comes normal trouble understand volume population summer trial appeared bed concerned district led merely sales student direction friend maybe piece ran army blood continued degree direct evening game green husband list literature plane association average cause generally influence met provided seven systems chance changes easy former freedom hell meaning opened shot spring ways works wrong fear organization planning series term theory ask effective lead myself respect stopped wouldn't clearly efforts forms groups movement plant truth worked based beautiful consider farm horse hotel note press somewhat treatment arms charge placed apparently carried feed herself he's hit I've length numbers operation persons radio reaction born manner oh recently running approach chief deep eight immediately larger performance price sun couple daily gun lived main stop straight heavy image march opportunity technical test understanding writing additional decision described determined fiscal progress served window cars character quality religion reported responsibility steps appear serious account ball corner design learned moving post activity forward pattern pool poor slowly specific staff types activities audience choice filled growing justice latter letters nuclear obtained returned democratic doubt obviously parts plans thirty established figures foot function include leaders mass saying standard stay attack closed drive gives speak waiting whatever completely covered faith hospital language race season wish built designed distance effects extent glass income lack products ahead analysis corps elements existence expect firm married principle there'sabase abate abdicate abduct aberration abet abhor abide abject abjure abnegation abort abridge abrogate abscond absolution abstain abstruse accede accentuate accessible acclaim accolade accommodating accord accost accretion acerbic acquiesce acrimony acumen acute adamant adept adhere admonish adorn adroit adulation adumbrate advocate aerial aesthetic affable affinity affluent affront aggrandize aggregate aggrieved agile agnostic agriculture aisle alacrity alias allay allege alleviate allocate aloof altercation amalgamate ambiguous ambivalent ameliorate amenable amenity amiable amicable amorous amorphous anachronistic analgesic analogous anarchist anathema anecdote anesthesia anguish animated annex annul anomaly anonymous antagonism antecedent antediluvian anthology antipathy antiquated antiseptic antithesis anxiety apathetic apocryphal appalling appease appraise apprehend approbation appropriate aquatic arable arbiter arbitrary arbitration arboreal arcane archaic archetypal ardor arid arrogate artifact artisan ascertain ascetic ascribe aspersion aspire assail assess assiduous assuage astute asylum atone atrophy attain attribute atypical audacious audible augment auspicious austere avarice avenge aversion balk ballad banal bane bard bashful battery beguile behemoth benevolent benign bequeath berate bereft beseech bias bilk blandish blemish blight boisterous bombastic boon bourgeois brazen brusque buffet burnish buttress cacophony cadence cajole calamity calibrate callous calumny camaraderie candor canny canvas capacious capitulate capricious captivate carouse carp catalog catalyze caucus caustic cavort censure cerebral chaos chastise cherish chide choreography chronicle chronological circuitous circumlocution circumscribed circumspect circumvent clairvoyant clamor clandestine cleave clemency clergy cloying coagulate coalesce cobbler coerce cogent cognizant coherent collateral colloquial collusion colossus combustion commendation commensurate commodious compelling compensate complacency complement compliant complicit compliment compound comprehensive compress compunction concede conciliatory concise concoct concomitant concord condolence condone conduit confection confidant conflagration confluence conformist confound congeal congenial congregation congruity connive consecrate consensus consign consolation consonant constituent constrain construe consummate consumption contemporaneous contentious contravene contrite contusion conundrum convene convention convivial convoluted copious cordial coronation corpulence corroborate corrosive cosmopolitan counteract coup covet covert credulity crescendo criteria culmination culpable cultivate cumulative cunning cupidity cursory curt curtail daunting dearth debacle debase debauch debunk decorous decry deface defamatory defer deferential defile deft defunct delegate deleterious deliberate delineate demagogue demarcation demean demure denigrate denounce deplore depravity deprecate derelict deride derivative desecrate desiccated desolate despondent despot destitute deter devious dialect diaphanous didactic diffident diffuse dilatory diligent diminutive dirge disaffected disavow discern disclose discomfit discordant discrepancy discretion discursive disdain disgruntled disheartened disparage disparate dispatch dispel disperse disrepute dissemble disseminate dissent dissipate dissonance dissuade distend dither divine divisive divulge docile dogmatic dormant dour dubious duplicity duress dynamic ebullient eclectic ecstatic edict efface effervescent efficacious effrontery effulgent egregious elaborate elated elegy elicit eloquent elucidate elude emaciated embellish embezzle emend eminent emollient emote empathy empirical emulate enamor encore encumber enervate enfranchise engender enigmatic enmity ennui entail enthrall ephemeral epistolary epitome equanimity equivocal erudite eschew esoteric espouse ethereal etymology euphoric evanescent evince exacerbate exalt exasperate excavate exculpate excursion execrable exhort exigent exonerate exorbitant expedient expiate expunge expurgate extant extol extraneous extricate exult fabricate façade facile fallacious fastidious fathom fatuous fecund felicitous feral fervent fetid fetter fickle fidelity figurative flabbergasted flaccid flagrant florid flout foil forage forbearance forestall forlorn forsake fortitude fortuitous forum foster fractious fraught frenetic frivolous frugal furtive garish garrulous genial gluttony goad gourmand grandiloquence grandiose gratuitous gregarious grievous guile hackneyed hallowed hapless harangue hardy harrowing haughty hedonist hegemony heinous heterogeneous hiatus hierarchy hypocrisy hypothetical iconoclast idiosyncratic idolatrous ignominious illicit immerse immutable impassive impeccable impecunious imperative imperious impertinent impervious impetuous impinge implacable implement implicate implicit impregnable impudent impute inane inarticulate incarnate incendiary incessant inchoate incisive inclination incontrovertible incorrigible increment incumbent indefatigable indigenous indigent indignation indolent indomitable induce ineffable inept inexorable inextricable infamy infusion ingenious ingenuous inhibit inimical iniquity injunction innate innocuous innovate innuendo inoculate inquisitor insatiable insidious insinuate insipid insolent instigate insular insurgent integral interject interlocutor interminable intimation intractable intransigent intrepid inundate inure invective inveterate inviolable irascible iridescent irreverence irrevocable jubilant judicious juxtaposition knell kudos laceration laconic languid larceny largess latent laudatory lavish legerdemain lenient lethargic liability libertarian licentious limpid linchpin lithe litigant lucid luminous lurid maelstrom magnanimous malediction malevolent malleable mandate manifest manifold maudlin maverick mawkish maxim meager medley mendacious mercurial meritorious metamorphosis meticulous mitigate moderate modicum modulate mollify morass mores morose multifarious mundane munificence mutable myriad nadir nascent nebulous nefarious negligent neophyte nocturnal noisome nomadic nominal nonchalant nondescript notorious novice noxious nuance nurture obdurate obfuscate oblique oblivious obscure obsequious obsolete obstinate obstreperous obtuse odious officious ominous onerous opulent oration ornate orthodox oscillate ostensible ostentatious ostracism pacific palatable palette palliate pallid panacea paradigm paradox paragon paramount pariah parody parsimony partisan patent pathology pathos paucity pejorative pellucid penchant penitent penultimate penurious perfidious perfunctory permeate pernicious perplex perspicacity pert pertinacious perusal pervasive petulance philanthropic phlegmatic pillage pinnacle pithy pittance placate placid platitude plaudits plausible plenitude plethora pliable poignant polemic portent potable potentate pragmatic precipice preclude precocious predilection preponderance prepossessing presage prescient prescribe presumptuous pretense primeval privation probity proclivity procure profane profligate profuse promulgate propagate propensity propitious propriety prosaic proscribe protean prowess prudence prurient puerile pugnacious pulchritude punctilious pungent punitive putrid quagmire quaint quandary quell querulous quixotic quotidian rail rancid rancor rapport rash raucous raze rebuke recalcitrant recapitulate reciprocate reclusive reconcile rectitude redoubtable refract refurbish refute regurgitate relegate relish remedial remiss renovate renown renunciation repentant replete repose reprehensible reprieve reproach reprobate reprove repudiate repulse reputable requisition rescind reservoir resilient resolute resolve respite resplendent restitution restive retract revel revere revoke rhapsodize ribald rife ruminate ruse saccharine sacrosanct sagacity salient salutation salve sanctimonious sanguine satiate scathing scintillating scrupulous scurrilous sedentary semaphore seminal sensual sensuous serendipity serene servile sinuous sobriety solicitous solipsistic soluble solvent somnolent sophomoric sovereign speculative spurious stagnate staid stingy stoic stolid strenuous strident stupefy subjugate sublime submissive succinct superfluous surfeit surmise surreptitious surrogate swarthy sycophant tacit taciturn tangential tantamount tedious temerity temperance tenable tenuous terrestrial timorous tirade toady tome torpid torrid tortuous tractable tranquil transgress transient transmute travesty tremulous trenchant trepidation trite truculent truncate turgid turpitude ubiquitous umbrage uncanny unctuous undulate upbraid usurp utilitarian utopia vacillate vacuous validate vapid variegated vehemently veneer venerable venerate veracity verbose verdant vestige vex vicarious vicissitude vigilant vilify vindicate vindictive virtuoso viscous vitriolic vituperate vivacious vocation vociferous wallow wane wanton whimsical wily winsome wistful wizened wrath yoke zealous zenith zephyr
It was a bright cold day in April, and the clocks were striking thirteen. Winston Smith, his chin nuzzled into his breast in an effort to escape the vile wind, slipped quickly through the glass doors of Victory Mansions, though not quickly enough to prevent a swirl of gritty dust from entering along with him.

The hallway smelt of boiled cabbage and old rag mats. At one end of it a coloured poster, too large for indoor display, had been tacked to the wall. It depicted simply an enormous face, more than a metre wide: the face of a man of about forty-five, with a heavy black moustache and ruggedly handsome features. Winston made for the stairs. It was no use trying the lift. Even at the best of times it was seldom working, and at present the electric current was cut off during daylight hours. It was part of the economy drive in preparation for Hate Week. The flat was seven flights up, and Winston, who was thirty-nine and had a varicose ulcer above his right ankle, went slowly, resting several times on the way. On each landing, opposite the lift-shaft, the poster with the enormous face gazed from the wall. It was one of those pictures which are so contrived that the eyes follow you about when you move. BIG BROTHER IS WATCHING YOU, the caption beneath it ran.

Inside the flat a fruity voice was reading out a list of figures which had something to do with the production of pig-iron. The voice came from an oblong metal plaque like a dulled mirror which formed part of the surface of the right-hand wall. Winston turned a switch and the voice sank somewhat, though the words were still distinguishable. The instrument (the telescreen, it was called) could be dimmed, but there was no way of shutting it off completely. He moved over to the window: a smallish, frail figure, the meagreness of his body merely emphasized by the blue overalls which were the uniform of the party. His hair was very fair, his face naturally sanguine, his skin roughened by coarse soap and blunt razor blades and the cold of the winter that had just ended.

Outside, even through the shut window-pane, the world looked cold. Down in the street little eddies of wind were whirling dust and torn paper into spirals, and though the sun was shining and the sky a harsh blue, there seemed to be no colour in anything, except the posters that were plastered everywhere. The black-moustachio'd face gazed down from every commanding corner. There was one on the house-front immediately opposite. BIG BROTHER IS WATCHING YOU, the caption said, while the dark eyes looked deep into Winston's own. Down at street level another poster, torn at one corner, flapped fitfully in the wind, alternately covering and uncovering the single word INGSOC. In the far distance a helicopter skimmed down between the roofs, hovered for an instant like a bluebottle, and darted away again with a curving flight. It was the police patrol, snooping into people's windows. The patrols did not matter, however. Only the Thought Police mattered.

Behind Winston's back the voice from the telescreen was still babbling away about pig-iron and the overfulfilment of the Ninth Three-Year Plan. The telescreen received and transmitted simultaneously. Any sound that Winston made, above the level of a very low whisper, would be picked up by it, moreover, so long as he remained within the field of vision which the metal plaque commanded, he could be seen as well as heard. There was of course no way of knowing whether you were being watched at any given moment. How often, or on what system, the Thought Police plugged in on any individual wire was guesswork. It was even conceivable that they watched everybody all the time. But at any rate they could plug in your wire whenever they wanted to. You had to live--did live, from habit that became instinct--in the assumption that every sound you made was overheard, and, except in darkness, every movement scrutinized.

Winston kept his back turned to the telescreen. It was safer; though, as he well knew, even a back can be revealing. A kilometre away the Ministry of Truth, his place of work, towered vast and white above the grimy landscape. This, he thought with a sort of vague distaste--this was London, chief city of Airstrip One, itself the third most populous of the provinces of Oceania. He tried to squeeze out some childhood memory that should tell him whether London had always been quite like this. Were there always these vistas of rotting nineteenth-century houses, their sides shored up with baulks of timber, their windows patched with cardboard and their roofs with corrugated iron, their crazy garden walls sagging in all directions? And the bombed sites where the plaster dust swirled in the air and the willow-herb straggled over the heaps of rubble; and the places where the bombs had cleared a larger patch and there had sprung up sordid colonies of wooden dwellings like chicken-houses? But it was no use, he could not remember: nothing remained of his childhood except a series of bright-lit tableaux occurring against no background and mostly unintelligible.

The Ministry of Truth--Minitrue, in Newspeak [Newspeak was the official language of Oceania. For an account of its structure and etymology see Appendix.]--was startlingly different from any other object in sight. It was an enormous pyramidal structure of glittering white concrete, soaring up, terrace after terrace, 300 metres into the air. From where Winston stood it was just possible to read, picked out on its white face in elegant lettering, the three slogans of the Party: 

 WAR IS PEACE FREEDOM IS SLAVERY IGNORANCE IS STRENGTH 

The Ministry of Truth contained, it was said, three thousand rooms above ground level, and corresponding ramifications below. Scattered about London there were just three other buildings of similar appearance and size. So completely did they dwarf the surrounding architecture that from the roof of Victory Mansions you could see all four of them simultaneously. They were the homes of the four Ministries between which the entire apparatus of government was divided. The Ministry of Truth, which concerned itself with news, entertainment, education, and the fine arts. The Ministry of Peace, which concerned itself with war. The Ministry of Love, which maintained law and order. And the Ministry of Plenty, which was responsible for economic affairs. Their names, in Newspeak: Minitrue, Minipax, Miniluv, and Miniplenty.

The Ministry of Love was the really frightening one. There were no windows in it at all. Winston had never been inside the Ministry of Love, nor within half a kilometre of it. It was a place impossible to enter except on official business, and then only by penetrating through a maze of barbed-wire entanglements, steel doors, and hidden machine-gun nests. Even the streets leading up to its outer barriers were roamed by gorilla-faced guards in black uniforms, armed with jointed truncheons.

Winston turned round abruptly. He had set his features into the expression of quiet optimism which it was advisable to wear when facing the telescreen. He crossed the room into the tiny kitchen. By leaving the Ministry at this time of day he had sacrificed his lunch in the canteen, and he was aware that there was no food in the kitchen except a hunk of dark-coloured bread which had got to be saved for tomorrow's breakfast. He took down from the shelf a bottle of colourless liquid with a plain white label marked VICTORY GIN. It gave off a sickly, oily smell, as of Chinese rice-spirit. Winston poured out nearly a teacupful, nerved himself for a shock, and gulped it down like a dose of medicine.

Instantly his face turned scarlet and the water ran out of his eyes. The stuff was like nitric acid, and moreover, in swallowing it one had the sensation of being hit on the back of the head with a rubber club. The next moment, however, the burning in his belly died down and the world began to look more cheerful. He took a cigarette from a crumpled packet marked VICTORY CIGARETTES and incautiously held it upright, whereupon the tobacco fell out on to the floor. With the next he was more successful. He went back to the living-room and sat down at a small table that stood to the left of the telescreen. From the table drawer he took out a penholder, a bottle of ink, and a thick, quarto-sized blank book with a red back and a marbled cover.

For some reason the telescreen in the living-room was in an unusual position. Instead of being placed, as was normal, in the end wall, where it could command the whole room, it was in the longer wall, opposite the window. To one side of it there was a shallow alcove in which Winston was now sitting, and which, when the flats were built, had probably been intended to hold bookshelves. By sitting in the alcove, and keeping well back, Winston was able to remain outside the range of the telescreen, so far as sight went. He could be heard, of course, but so long as he stayed in his present position he could not be seen. It was partly the unusual geography of the room that had suggested to him the thing that he was now about to do.

But it had also been suggested by the book that he had just taken out of the drawer. It was a peculiarly beautiful book. Its smooth creamy paper, a little yellowed by age, was of a kind that had not been manufactured for at least forty years past. He could guess, however, that the book was much older than that. He had seen it lying in the window of a frowsy little junk-shop in a slummy quarter of the town (just what quarter he did not now remember) and had been stricken immediately by an overwhelming desire to possess it. Party members were supposed not to go into ordinary shops ('dealing on the free market', it was called), but the rule was not strictly kept, because there were various things, such as shoelaces and razor blades, which it was impossible to get hold of in any other way. He had given a quick glance up and down the street and then had slipped inside and bought the book for two dollars fifty. At the time he was not conscious of wanting it for any particular purpose. He had carried it guiltily home in his briefcase. Even with nothing written in it, it was a compromising possession.

The thing that he was about to do was to open a diary. This was not illegal (nothing was illegal, since there were no longer any laws), but if detected it was reasonably certain that it would be punished by death, or at least by twenty-five years in a forced-labour camp. Winston fitted a nib into the penholder and sucked it to get the grease off. The pen was an archaic instrument, seldom used even for signatures, and he had procured one, furtively and with some difficulty, simply because of a feeling that the beautiful creamy paper deserved to be written on with a real nib instead of being scratched with an ink-pencil. Actually he was not used to writing by hand. Apart from very short notes, it was usual to dictate everything into the speak-write which was of course impossible for his present purpose. He dipped the pen into the ink and then faltered for just a second. A tremor had gone through his bowels. To mark the paper was the decisive act. In small clumsy letters he wrote: 

 April 4th, 1984. 

He sat back. A sense of complete helplessness had descended upon him. To begin with, he did not know with any certainty that this was 1984. It must be round about that date, since he was fairly sure that his age was thirty-nine, and he believed that he had been born in 1944 or 1945; but it was never possible nowadays to pin down any date within a year or two.

For whom, it suddenly occurred to him to wonder, was he writing this diary? For the future, for the unborn. His mind hovered for a moment round the doubtful date on the page, and then fetched up with a bump against the Newspeak word DOUBLETHINK. For the first time the magnitude of what he had undertaken came home to him. How could you communicate with the future? It was of its nature impossible. Either the future would resemble the present, in which case it would not listen to him: or it would be different from it, and his predicament would be meaningless.

For some time he sat gazing stupidly at the paper. The telescreen had changed over to strident military music. It was curious that he seemed not merely to have lost the power of expressing himself, but even to have forgotten what it was that he had originally intended to say. For weeks past he had been making ready for this moment, and it had never crossed his mind that anything would be needed except courage. The actual writing would be easy. All he had to do was to transfer to paper the interminable restless monologue that had been running inside his head, literally for years. At this moment, however, even the monologue had dried up. Moreover his varicose ulcer had begun itching unbearably. He dared not scratch it, because if he did so it always became inflamed. The seconds were ticking by. He was conscious of nothing except the blankness of the page in front of him, the itching of the skin above his ankle, the blaring of the music, and a slight booziness caused by the gin.

Suddenly he began writing in sheer panic, only imperfectly aware of what he was setting down. His small but childish handwriting straggled up and down the page, shedding first its capital letters and finally even its full stops: 

 April 4th, 1984. Last night to the flicks. All war films. One very good one of a ship full of refugees being bombed somewhere in the Mediterranean. Audience much amused by shots of a great huge fat man trying to swim away with a helicopter after him, first you saw him wallowing along in the water like a porpoise, then you saw him through the helicopters gunsights, then he was full of holes and the sea round him turned pink and he sank as suddenly as though the holes had let in the water, audience shouting with laughter when he sank. then you saw a lifeboat full of children with a helicopter hovering over it. there was a middle-aged woman might have been a jewess sitting up in the bow with a little boy about three years old in her arms. little boy screaming with fright and hiding his head between her breasts as if he was trying to burrow right into her and the woman putting her arms round him and comforting him although she was blue with fright herself, all the time covering him up as much as possible as if she thought her arms could keep the bullets off him. then the helicopter planted a 20 kilo bomb in among them terrific flash and the boat went all to matchwood. then there was a wonderful shot of a child's arm going up up up right up into the air a helicopter with a camera in its nose must have followed it up and there was a lot of applause from the party seats but a woman down in the prole part of the house suddenly started kicking up a fuss and shouting they didnt oughter of showed it not in front of kids they didnt it aint right not in front of kids it aint until the police turned her turned her out i dont suppose anything happened to her nobody cares what the proles say typical prole reaction they never---- 

Winston stopped writing, partly because he was suffering from cramp. He did not know what had made him pour out this stream of rubbish. But the curious thing was that while he was doing so a totally different memory had clarified itself in his mind, to the point where he almost felt equal to writing it down. It was, he now realized, because of this other incident that he had suddenly decided to come home and begin the diary today.

It had happened that morning at the Ministry, if anything so nebulous could be said to happen.

It was nearly eleven hundred, and in the Records Department, where Winston worked, they were dragging the chairs out of the cubicles and grouping them in the centre of the hall opposite the big telescreen, in preparation for the Two Minutes Hate. Winston was just taking his place in one of the middle rows when two people whom he knew by sight, but had never spoken to, came unexpectedly into the room. One of them was a girl whom he often passed in the corridors. He did not know her name, but he knew that she worked in the Fiction Department. Presumably--since he had sometimes seen her with oily hands and carrying a spanner--she had some mechanical job on one of the novel-writing machines. She was a bold-looking girl, of about twenty-seven, with thick hair, a freckled face, and swift, athletic movements. A narrow scarlet sash, emblem of the Junior Anti-Sex League, was wound several times round the waist of her overalls, just tightly enough to bring out the shapeliness of her hips. Winston had disliked her from the very first moment of seeing her. He knew the reason. It was because of the atmosphere of hockey-fields and cold baths and community hikes and general clean-mindedness which she managed to carry about with her. He disliked nearly all women, and especially the young and pretty ones. It was always the women, and above all the young ones, who were the most bigoted adherents of the Party, the swallowers of slogans, the amateur spies and nosers-out of unorthodoxy. But this particular girl gave him the impression of being more dangerous than most. Once when they passed in the corridor she gave him a quick sidelong glance which seemed to pierce right into him and for a moment had filled him with black terror. The idea had even crossed his mind that she might be an agent of the Thought Police. That, it was true, was very unlikely. Still, he continued to feel a peculiar uneasiness, which had fear mixed up in it as well as hostility, whenever she was anywhere near him.

The other person was a man named O'Brien, a member of the Inner Party and holder of some post so important and remote that Winston had only a dim idea of its nature. A momentary hush passed over the group of people round the chairs as they saw the black overalls of an Inner Party member approaching. O'Brien was a large, burly man with a thick neck and a coarse, humorous, brutal face. In spite of his formidable appearance he had a certain charm of manner. He had a trick of resettling his spectacles on his nose which was curiously disarming--in some indefinable way, curiously civilized. It was a gesture which, if anyone had still thought in such terms, might have recalled an eighteenth-century nobleman offering his snuffbox. Winston had seen O'Brien perhaps a dozen times in almost as many years. He felt deeply drawn to him, and not solely because he was intrigued by the contrast between O'Brien's urbane manner and his prize-fighter's physique. Much more it was because of a secretly held belief--or perhaps not even a belief, merely a hope--that O'Brien's political orthodoxy was not perfect. Something in his face suggested it irresistibly. And again, perhaps it was not even unorthodoxy that was written in his face, but simply intelligence. But at any rate he had the appearance of being a person that you could talk to if somehow you could cheat the telescreen and get him alone. Winston had never made the smallest effort to verify this guess: indeed, there was no way of doing so. At this moment O'Brien glanced at his wrist-watch, saw that it was nearly eleven hundred, and evidently decided to stay in the Records Department until the Two Minutes Hate was over. He took a chair in the same row as Winston, a couple of places away. A small, sandy-haired woman who worked in the next cubicle to Winston was between them. The girl with dark hair was sitting immediately behind.

The next moment a hideous, grinding speech, as of some monstrous machine running without oil, burst from the big telescreen at the end of the room. It was a noise that set one's teeth on edge and bristled the hair at the back of one's neck. The Hate had started.

As usual, the face of Emmanuel Goldstein, the Enemy of the People, had flashed on to the screen. There were hisses here and there among the audience. The little sandy-haired woman gave a squeak of mingled fear and disgust. Goldstein was the renegade and backslider who once, long ago (how long ago, nobody quite remembered), had been one of the leading figures of the Party, almost on a level with Big Brother himself, and then had engaged in counter-revolutionary activities, had been condemned to death, and had mysteriously escaped and disappeared. The programmes of the Two Minutes Hate varied from day to day, but there was none in which Goldstein was not the principal figure. He was the primal traitor, the earliest defiler of the Party's purity. All subsequent crimes against the Party, all treacheries, acts of sabotage, heresies, deviations, sprang directly out of his teaching. Somewhere or other he was still alive and hatching his conspiracies: perhaps somewhere beyond the sea, under the protection of his foreign paymasters, perhaps even--so it was occasionally rumoured--in some hiding-place in Oceania itself.

Winston's diaphragm was constricted. He could never see the face of Goldstein without a painful mixture of emotions. It was a lean Jewish face, with a great fuzzy aureole of white hair and a small goatee beard--a clever face, and yet somehow inherently despicable, with a kind of senile silliness in the long thin nose, near the end of which a pair of spectacles was perched. It resembled the face of a sheep, and the voice, too, had a sheep-like quality. Goldstein was delivering his usual venomous attack upon the doctrines of the Party--an attack so exaggerated and perverse that a child should have been able to see through it, and yet just plausible enough to fill one with an alarmed feeling that other people, less level-headed than oneself, might be taken in by it. He was abusing Big Brother, he was denouncing the dictatorship of the Party, he was demanding the immediate conclusion of peace with Eurasia, he was advocating freedom of speech, freedom of the Press, freedom of assembly, freedom of thought, he was crying hysterically that the revolution had been betrayed--and all this in rapid polysyllabic speech which was a sort of parody of the habitual style of the orators of the Party, and even contained Newspeak words: more Newspeak words, indeed, than any Party member would normally use in real life. And all the while, lest one should be in any doubt as to the reality which Goldstein's specious claptrap covered, behind his head on the telescreen there marched the endless columns of the Eurasian army--row after row of solid-looking men with expressionless Asiatic faces, who swam up to the surface of the screen and vanished, to be replaced by others exactly similar. The dull rhythmic tramp of the soldiers' boots formed the background to Goldstein's bleating voice.

Before the Hate had proceeded for thirty seconds, uncontrollable exclamations of rage were breaking out from half the people in the room. The self-satisfied sheep-like face on the screen, and the terrifying power of the Eurasian army behind it, were too much to be borne: besides, the sight or even the thought of Goldstein produced fear and anger automatically. He was an object of hatred more constant than either Eurasia or Eastasia, since when Oceania was at war with one of these Powers it was generally at peace with the other. But what was strange was that although Goldstein was hated and despised by everybody, although every day and a thousand times a day, on platforms, on the telescreen, in newspapers, in books, his theories were refuted, smashed, ridiculed, held up to the general gaze for the pitiful rubbish that they were--in spite of all this, his influence never seemed to grow less. Always there were fresh dupes waiting to be seduced by him. A day never passed when spies and saboteurs acting under his directions were not unmasked by the Thought Police. He was the commander of a vast shadowy army, an underground network of conspirators dedicated to the overthrow of the State. The Brotherhood, its name was supposed to be. There were also whispered stories of a terrible book, a compendium of all the heresies, of which Goldstein was the author and which circulated clandestinely here and there. It was a book without a title. People referred to it, if at all, simply as THE BOOK. But one knew of such things only through vague rumours. Neither the Brotherhood nor THE BOOK was a subject that any ordinary Party member would mention if there was a way of avoiding it.

In its second minute the Hate rose to a frenzy. People were leaping up and down in their places and shouting at the tops of their voices in an effort to drown the maddening bleating voice that came from the screen. The little sandy-haired woman had turned bright pink, and her mouth was opening and shutting like that of a landed fish. Even O'Brien's heavy face was flushed. He was sitting very straight in his chair, his powerful chest swelling and quivering as though he were standing up to the assault of a wave. The dark-haired girl behind Winston had begun crying out 'Swine! Swine! Swine!' and suddenly she picked up a heavy Newspeak dictionary and flung it at the screen. It struck Goldstein's nose and bounced off; the voice continued inexorably. In a lucid moment Winston found that he was shouting with the others and kicking his heel violently against the rung of his chair. The horrible thing about the Two Minutes Hate was not that one was obliged to act a part, but, on the contrary, that it was impossible to avoid joining in. Within thirty seconds any pretence was always unnecessary. A hideous ecstasy of fear and vindictiveness, a desire to kill, to torture, to smash faces in with a sledge-hammer, seemed to flow through the whole group of people like an electric current, turning one even against one's will into a grimacing, screaming lunatic. And yet the rage that one felt was an abstract, undirected emotion which could be switched from one object to another like the flame of a blowlamp. Thus, at one moment Winston's hatred was not turned against Goldstein at all, but, on the contrary, against Big Brother, the Party, and the Thought Police; and at such moments his heart went out to the lonely, derided heretic on the screen, sole guardian of truth and sanity in a world of lies. And yet the very next instant he was at one with the people about him, and all that was said of Goldstein seemed to him to be true. At those moments his secret loathing of Big Brother changed into adoration, and Big Brother seemed to tower up, an invincible, fearless protector, standing like a rock against the hordes of Asia, and Goldstein, in spite of his isolation, his helplessness, and the doubt that hung about his very existence, seemed like some sinister enchanter, capable by the mere power of his voice of wrecking the structure of civilization.

It was even possible, at moments, to switch one's hatred this way or that by a voluntary act. Suddenly, by the sort of violent effort with which one wrenches one's head away from the pillow in a nightmare, Winston succeeded in transferring his hatred from the face on the screen to the dark-haired girl behind him. Vivid, beautiful hallucinations flashed through his mind. He would flog her to death with a rubber truncheon. He would tie her naked to a stake and shoot her full of arrows like Saint Sebastian. He would ravish her and cut her throat at the moment of climax. Better than before, moreover, he realized WHY it was that he hated her. He hated her because she was young and pretty and sexless, because he wanted to go to bed with her and would never do so, because round her sweet supple waist, which seemed to ask you to encircle it with your arm, there was only the odious scarlet sash, aggressive symbol of chastity.

The Hate rose to its climax. The voice of Goldstein had become an actual sheep's bleat, and for an instant the face changed into that of a sheep. Then the sheep-face melted into the figure of a Eurasian soldier who seemed to be advancing, huge and terrible, his sub-machine gun roaring, and seeming to spring out of the surface of the screen, so that some of the people in the front row actually flinched backwards in their seats. But in the same moment, drawing a deep sigh of relief from everybody, the hostile figure melted into the face of Big Brother, black-haired, black-moustachio'd, full of power and mysterious calm, and so vast that it almost filled up the screen. Nobody heard what Big Brother was saying. It was merely a few words of encouragement, the sort of words that are uttered in the din of battle, not distinguishable individually but restoring confidence by the fact of being spoken. Then the face of Big Brother faded away again, and instead the three slogans of the Party stood out in bold capitals: 

 WAR IS PEACE FREEDOM IS SLAVERY IGNORANCE IS STRENGTH 

But the face of Big Brother seemed to persist for several seconds on the screen, as though the impact that it had made on everyone's eyeballs was too vivid to wear off immediately. The little sandy-haired woman had flung herself forward over the back of the chair in front of her. With a tremulous murmur that sounded like 'My Saviour!' she extended her arms towards the screen. Then she buried her face in her hands. It was apparent that she was uttering a prayer.

At this moment the entire group of people broke into a deep, slow, rhythmical chant of 'B-B!...B-B!'--over and over again, very slowly, with a long pause between the first 'B' and the second--a heavy, murmurous sound, somehow curiously savage, in the background of which one seemed to hear the stamp of naked feet and the throbbing of tom-toms. For perhaps as much as thirty seconds they kept it up. It was a refrain that was often heard in moments of overwhelming emotion. Partly it was a sort of hymn to the wisdom and majesty of Big Brother, but still more it was an act of self-hypnosis, a deliberate drowning of consciousness by means of rhythmic noise. Winston's entrails seemed to grow cold. In the Two Minutes Hate he could not help sharing in the general delirium, but this sub-human chanting of 'B-B!...B-B!' always filled him with horror. Of course he chanted with the rest: it was impossible to do otherwise. To dissemble your feelings, to control your face, to do what everyone else was doing, was an instinctive reaction. But there was a space of a couple of seconds during which the expression of his eyes might conceivably have betrayed him. And it was exactly at this moment that the significant thing happened--if, indeed, it did happen.

Momentarily he caught O'Brien's eye. O'Brien had stood up. He had taken off his spectacles and was in the act of resettling them on his nose with his characteristic gesture. But there was a fraction of a second when their eyes met, and for as long as it took to happen Winston knew--yes, he KNEW!--that O'Brien was thinking the same thing as himself. An unmistakable message had passed. It was as though their two minds had opened and the thoughts were flowing from one into the other through their eyes. 'I am with you,' O'Brien seemed to be saying to him. 'I know precisely what you are feeling. I know all about your contempt, your hatred, your disgust. But don't worry, I am on your side!' And then the flash of intelligence was gone, and O'Brien's face was as inscrutable as everybody else's.

That was all, and he was already uncertain whether it had happened. Such incidents never had any sequel. All that they did was to keep alive in him the belief, or hope, that others besides himself were the enemies of the Party. Perhaps the rumours of vast underground conspiracies were true after all--perhaps the Brotherhood really existed! It was impossible, in spite of the endless arrests and confessions and executions, to be sure that the Brotherhood was not simply a myth. Some days he believed in it, some days not. There was no evidence, only fleeting glimpses that might mean anything or nothing: snatches of overheard conversation, faint scribbles on lavatory walls--once, even, when two strangers met, a small movement of the hand which had looked as though it might be a signal of recognition. It was all guesswork: very likely he had imagined everything. He had gone back to his cubicle without looking at O'Brien again. The idea of following up their momentary contact hardly crossed his mind. It would have been inconceivably dangerous even if he had known how to set about doing it. For a second, two seconds, they had exchanged an equivocal glance, and that was the end of the story. But even that was a memorable event, in the locked loneliness in which one had to live.

Winston roused himself and sat up straighter. He let out a belch. The gin was rising from his stomach.

His eyes re-focused on the page. He discovered that while he sat helplessly musing he had also been writing, as though by automatic action. And it was no longer the same cramped, awkward handwriting as before. His pen had slid voluptuously over the smooth paper, printing in large neat capitals-- 

 DOWN WITH BIG BROTHER DOWN WITH BIG BROTHER DOWN WITH BIG BROTHER DOWN WITH BIG BROTHER DOWN WITH BIG BROTHER 

over and over again, filling half a page.

He could not help feeling a twinge of panic. It was absurd, since the writing of those particular words was not more dangerous than the initial act of opening the diary, but for a moment he was tempted to tear out the spoiled pages and abandon the enterprise altogether.

He did not do so, however, because he knew that it was useless. Whether he wrote DOWN WITH BIG BROTHER, or whether he refrained from writing it, made no difference. Whether he went on with the diary, or whether he did not go on with it, made no difference. The Thought Police would get him just the same. He had committed--would still have committed, even if he had never set pen to paper--the essential crime that contained all others in itself. Thoughtcrime, they called it. Thoughtcrime was not a thing that could be concealed for ever. You might dodge successfully for a while, even for years, but sooner or later they were bound to get you.

It was always at night--the arrests invariably happened at night. The sudden jerk out of sleep, the rough hand shaking your shoulder, the lights glaring in your eyes, the ring of hard faces round the bed. In the vast majority of cases there was no trial, no report of the arrest. People simply disappeared, always during the night. Your name was removed from the registers, every record of everything you had ever done was wiped out, your one-time existence was denied and then forgotten. You were abolished, annihilated: VAPORIZED was the usual word.

For a moment he was seized by a kind of hysteria. He began writing in a hurried untidy scrawl: 

 theyll shoot me i don't care theyll shoot me in the back of the neck i dont care down with big brother they always shoot you in the back of the neck i dont care down with big brother---- 

He sat back in his chair, slightly ashamed of himself, and laid down the pen. The next moment he started violently. There was a knocking at the door.

Already! He sat as still as a mouse, in the futile hope that whoever it was might go away after a single attempt. But no, the knocking was repeated. The worst thing of all would be to delay. His heart was thumping like a drum, but his face, from long habit, was probably expressionless. He got up and moved heavily towards the door.
 Chapter I

Out to Sea 

I had this story from one who had no business to tell it to me, or to any other. I may credit the seductive influence of an old vintage upon the narrator for the beginning of it, and my own skeptical incredulity during the days that followed for the balance of the strange tale.

When my convivial host discovered that he had told me so much, and that I was prone to doubtfulness, his foolish pride assumed the task the old vintage had commenced, and so he unearthed written evidence in the form of musty manuscript, and dry official records of the British Colonial Office to support many of the salient features of his remarkable narrative.

I do not say the story is true, for I did not witness the happenings which it portrays, but the fact that in the telling of it to you I have taken fictitious names for the principal characters quite sufficiently evidences the sincerity of my own belief that it MAY be true.

The yellow, mildewed pages of the diary of a man long dead, and the records of the Colonial Office dovetail perfectly with the narrative of my convivial host, and so I give you the story as I painstakingly pieced it out from these several various agencies.

If you do not find it credible you will at least be as one with me in acknowledging that it is unique, remarkable, and interesting.

From the records of the Colonial Office and from the dead man's diary we learn that a certain young English nobleman, whom we shall call John Clayton, Lord Greystoke, was commissioned to make a peculiarly delicate investigation of conditions in a British West Coast African Colony from whose simple native inhabitants another European power was known to be recruiting soldiers for its native army, which it used solely for the forcible collection of rubber and ivory from the savage tribes along the Congo and the Aruwimi. The natives of the British Colony complained that many of their young men were enticed away through the medium of fair and glowing promises, but that few if any ever returned to their families.

The Englishmen in Africa went even further, saying that these poor blacks were held in virtual slavery, since after their terms of enlistment expired their ignorance was imposed upon by their white officers, and they were told that they had yet several years to serve.

And so the Colonial Office appointed John Clayton to a new post in British West Africa, but his confidential instructions centered on a thorough investigation of the unfair treatment of black British subjects by the officers of a friendly European power. Why he was sent, is, however, of little moment to this story, for he never made an investigation, nor, in fact, did he ever reach his destination.

Clayton was the type of Englishman that one likes best to associate with the noblest monuments of historic achievement upon a thousand victorious battlefields--a strong, virile man--mentally, morally, and physically.

In stature he was above the average height; his eyes were gray, his features regular and strong; his carriage that of perfect, robust health influenced by his years of army training.

Political ambition had caused him to seek transference from the army to the Colonial Office and so we find him, still young, entrusted with a delicate and important commission in the service of the Queen.

When he received this appointment he was both elated and appalled. The preferment seemed to him in the nature of a well-merited reward for painstaking and intelligent service, and as a stepping stone to posts of greater importance and responsibility; but, on the other hand, he had been married to the Hon. Alice Rutherford for scarce a three months, and it was the thought of taking this fair young girl into the dangers and isolation of tropical Africa that appalled him.

For her sake he would have refused the appointment, but she would not have it so. Instead she insisted that he accept, and, indeed, take her with him.

There were mothers and brothers and sisters, and aunts and cousins to express various opinions on the subject, but as to what they severally advised history is silent.

We know only that on a bright May morning in 1888, John, Lord Greystoke, and Lady Alice sailed from Dover on their way to Africa.

A month later they arrived at Freetown where they chartered a small sailing vessel, the Fuwalda, which was to bear them to their final destination.

And here John, Lord Greystoke, and Lady Alice, his wife, vanished from the eyes and from the knowledge of men.

Two months after they weighed anchor and cleared from the port of Freetown a half dozen British war vessels were scouring the south Atlantic for trace of them or their little vessel, and it was almost immediately that the wreckage was found upon the shores of St. Helena which convinced the world that the Fuwalda had gone down with all on board, and hence the search was stopped ere it had scarce begun; though hope lingered in longing hearts for many years.

The Fuwalda, a barkentine of about one hundred tons, was a vessel of the type often seen in coastwise trade in the far southern Atlantic, their crews composed of the offscourings of the sea--unhanged murderers and cutthroats of every race and every nation.

The Fuwalda was no exception to the rule. Her officers were swarthy bullies, hating and hated by their crew. The captain, while a competent seaman, was a brute in his treatment of his men. He knew, or at least he used, but two arguments in his dealings with them--a belaying pin and a revolver--nor is it likely that the motley aggregation he signed would have understood aught else.

So it was that from the second day out from Freetown John Clayton and his young wife witnessed scenes upon the deck of the Fuwalda such as they had believed were never enacted outside the covers of printed stories of the sea.

It was on the morning of the second day that the first link was forged in what was destined to form a chain of circumstances ending in a life for one then unborn such as has never been paralleled in the history of man.

Two sailors were washing down the decks of the Fuwalda, the first mate was on duty, and the captain had stopped to speak with John Clayton and Lady Alice.

The men were working backwards toward the little party who were facing away from the sailors. Closer and closer they came, until one of them was directly behind the captain. In another moment he would have passed by and this strange narrative would never have been recorded.

But just that instant the officer turned to leave Lord and Lady Greystoke, and, as he did so, tripped against the sailor and sprawled headlong upon the deck, overturning the water-pail so that he was drenched in its dirty contents.

For an instant the scene was ludicrous; but only for an instant. With a volley of awful oaths, his face suffused with the scarlet of mortification and rage, the captain regained his feet, and with a terrific blow felled the sailor to the deck.

The man was small and rather old, so that the brutality of the act was thus accentuated. The other seaman, however, was neither old nor small--a huge bear of a man, with fierce black mustachios, and a great bull neck set between massive shoulders.

As he saw his mate go down he crouched, and, with a low snarl, sprang upon the captain crushing him to his knees with a single mighty blow.

From scarlet the officer's face went white, for this was mutiny; and mutiny he had met and subdued before in his brutal career. Without waiting to rise he whipped a revolver from his pocket, firing point blank at the great mountain of muscle towering before him; but, quick as he was, John Clayton was almost as quick, so that the bullet which was intended for the sailor's heart lodged in the sailor's leg instead, for Lord Greystoke had struck down the captain's arm as he had seen the weapon flash in the sun.

Words passed between Clayton and the captain, the former making it plain that he was disgusted with the brutality displayed toward the crew, nor would he countenance anything further of the kind while he and Lady Greystoke remained passengers.

The captain was on the point of making an angry reply, but, thinking better of it, turned on his heel and black and scowling, strode aft.

He did not care to antagonize an English official, for the Queen's mighty arm wielded a punitive instrument which he could appreciate, and which he feared--England's far-reaching navy.

The two sailors picked themselves up, the older man assisting his wounded comrade to rise. The big fellow, who was known among his mates as Black Michael, tried his leg gingerly, and, finding that it bore his weight, turned to Clayton with a word of gruff thanks.

Though the fellow's tone was surly, his words were evidently well meant. Ere he had scarce finished his little speech he had turned and was limping off toward the forecastle with the very apparent intention of forestalling any further conversation.

They did not see him again for several days, nor did the captain accord them more than the surliest of grunts when he was forced to speak to them.

They took their meals in his cabin, as they had before the unfortunate occurrence; but the captain was careful to see that his duties never permitted him to eat at the same time.

The other officers were coarse, illiterate fellows, but little above the villainous crew they bullied, and were only too glad to avoid social intercourse with the polished English noble and his lady, so that the Claytons were left very much to themselves.

This in itself accorded perfectly with their desires, but it also rather isolated them from the life of the little ship so that they were unable to keep in touch with the daily happenings which were to culminate so soon in bloody tragedy.

There was in the whole atmosphere of the craft that undefinable something which presages disaster. Outwardly, to the knowledge of the Claytons, all went on as before upon the little vessel; but that there was an undertow leading them toward some unknown danger both felt, though they did not speak of it to each other.

On the second day after the wounding of Black Michael, Clayton came on deck just in time to see the limp body of one of the crew being carried below by four of his fellows while the first mate, a heavy belaying pin in his hand, stood glowering at the little party of sullen sailors.

Clayton asked no questions--he did not need to--and the following day, as the great lines of a British battleship grew out of the distant horizon, he half determined to demand that he and Lady Alice be put aboard her, for his fears were steadily increasing that nothing but harm could result from remaining on the lowering, sullen Fuwalda.

Toward noon they were within speaking distance of the British vessel, but when Clayton had nearly decided to ask the captain to put them aboard her, the obvious ridiculousness of such a request became suddenly apparent. What reason could he give the officer commanding her majesty's ship for desiring to go back in the direction from which he had just come!

What if he told them that two insubordinate seamen had been roughly handled by their officers? They would but laugh in their sleeves and attribute his reason for wishing to leave the ship to but one thing--cowardice.

John Clayton, Lord Greystoke, did not ask to be transferred to the British man-of-war. Late in the afternoon he saw her upper works fade below the far horizon, but not before he learned that which confirmed his greatest fears, and caused him to curse the false pride which had restrained him from seeking safety for his young wife a few short hours before, when safety was within reach--a safety which was now gone forever.

It was mid-afternoon that brought the little old sailor, who had been felled by the captain a few days before, to where Clayton and his wife stood by the ship's side watching the ever diminishing outlines of the great battleship. The old fellow was polishing brasses, and as he came edging along until close to Clayton he said, in an undertone:

"'Ell's to pay, sir, on this 'ere craft, an' mark my word for it, sir. 'Ell's to pay."

"What do you mean, my good fellow?" asked Clayton.

"Wy, hasn't ye seen wats goin' on? Hasn't ye 'eard that devil's spawn of a capting an' is mates knockin' the bloomin' lights outen 'arf the crew?

"Two busted 'eads yeste'day, an' three to-day. Black Michael's as good as new agin an' 'e's not the bully to stand fer it, not 'e; an' mark my word for it, sir."

"You mean, my man, that the crew contemplates mutiny?" asked Clayton.

"Mutiny!" exclaimed the old fellow. "Mutiny! They means murder, sir, an' mark my word for it, sir."

"When?"

"Hit's comin', sir; hit's comin' but I'm not a-sayin' wen, an' I've said too damned much now, but ye was a good sort t'other day an' I thought it no more'n right to warn ye. But keep a still tongue in yer 'ead an' when ye 'ear shootin' git below an' stay there.

"That's all, only keep a still tongue in yer 'ead, or they'll put a pill between yer ribs, an' mark my word for it, sir," and the old fellow went on with his polishing, which carried him away from where the Claytons were standing.

"Deuced cheerful outlook, Alice," said Clayton.

"You should warn the captain at once, John. Possibly the trouble may yet be averted," she said.

"I suppose I should, but yet from purely selfish motives I am almost prompted to 'keep a still tongue in my 'ead.' Whatever they do now they will spare us in recognition of my stand for this fellow Black Michael, but should they find that I had betrayed them there would be no mercy shown us, Alice."

"You have but one duty, John, and that lies in the interest of vested authority. If you do not warn the captain you are as much a party to whatever follows as though you had helped to plot and carry it out with your own head and hands."

"You do not understand, dear," replied Clayton. "It is of you I am thinking--there lies my first duty. The captain has brought this condition upon himself, so why then should I risk subjecting my wife to unthinkable horrors in a probably futile attempt to save him from his own brutal folly? You have no conception, dear, of what would follow were this pack of cutthroats to gain control of the Fuwalda."

"Duty is duty, John, and no amount of sophistries may change it. I would be a poor wife for an English lord were I to be responsible for his shirking a plain duty. I realize the danger which must follow, but I can face it with you."

"Have it as you will then, Alice," he answered, smiling. "Maybe we are borrowing trouble. While I do not like the looks of things on board this ship, they may not be so bad after all, for it is possible that the 'Ancient Mariner' was but voicing the desires of his wicked old heart rather than speaking of real facts.

"Mutiny on the high sea may have been common a hundred years ago, but in this good year 1888 it is the least likely of happenings.

"But there goes the captain to his cabin now. If I am going to warn him I might as well get the beastly job over for I have little stomach to talk with the brute at all."

So saying he strolled carelessly in the direction of the companionway through which the captain had passed, and a moment later was knocking at his door.

"Come in," growled the deep tones of that surly officer.

And when Clayton had entered, and closed the door behind him:

"Well?"

"I have come to report the gist of a conversation I heard to-day, because I feel that, while there may be nothing to it, it is as well that you be forearmed. In short, the men contemplate mutiny and murder."

"It's a lie!" roared the captain. "And if you have been interfering again with the discipline of this ship, or meddling in affairs that don't concern you you can take the consequences, and be damned. I don't care whether you are an English lord or not. I'm captain of this here ship, and from now on you keep your meddling nose out of my business."

The captain had worked himself up to such a frenzy of rage that he was fairly purple of face, and he shrieked the last words at the top of his voice, emphasizing his remarks by a loud thumping of the table with one huge fist, and shaking the other in Clayton's face.

Greystoke never turned a hair, but stood eying the excited man with level gaze.

"Captain Billings," he drawled finally, "if you will pardon my candor, I might remark that you are something of an ass."

Whereupon he turned and left the captain with the same indifferent ease that was habitual with him, and which was more surely calculated to raise the ire of a man of Billings' class than a torrent of invective.

So, whereas the captain might easily have been brought to regret his hasty speech had Clayton attempted to conciliate him, his temper was now irrevocably set in the mold in which Clayton had left it, and the last chance of their working together for their common good was gone.

"Well, Alice," said Clayton, as he rejoined his wife, "I might have saved my breath. The fellow proved most ungrateful. Fairly jumped at me like a mad dog.

"He and his blasted old ship may hang, for aught I care; and until we are safely off the thing I shall spend my energies in looking after our own welfare. And I rather fancy the first step to that end should be to go to our cabin and look over my revolvers. I am sorry now that we packed the larger guns and the ammunition with the stuff below."

They found their quarters in a bad state of disorder. Clothing from their open boxes and bags strewed the little apartment, and even their beds had been torn to pieces.

"Evidently someone was more anxious about our belongings than we," said Clayton. "Let's have a look around, Alice, and see what's missing."

A thorough search revealed the fact that nothing had been taken but Clayton's two revolvers and the small supply of ammunition he had saved out for them.

"Those are the very things I most wish they had left us," said Clayton, "and the fact that they wished for them and them alone is most sinister."

"What are we to do, John?" asked his wife. "Perhaps you were right in that our best chance lies in maintaining a neutral position.

"If the officers are able to prevent a mutiny, we have nothing to fear, while if the mutineers are victorious our one slim hope lies in not having attempted to thwart or antagonize them."

"Right you are, Alice. We'll keep in the middle of the road."

As they started to straighten up their cabin, Clayton and his wife simultaneously noticed the corner of a piece of paper protruding from beneath the door of their quarters. As Clayton stooped to reach for it he was amazed to see it move further into the room, and then he realized that it was being pushed inward by someone from without.

Quickly and silently he stepped toward the door, but, as he reached for the knob to throw it open, his wife's hand fell upon his wrist.

"No, John," she whispered. "They do not wish to be seen, and so we cannot afford to see them. Do not forget that we are keeping to the middle of the road."

Clayton smiled and dropped his hand to his side. Thus they stood watching the little bit of white paper until it finally remained at rest upon the floor just inside the door.

Then Clayton stooped and picked it up. It was a bit of grimy, white paper roughly folded into a ragged square. Opening it they found a crude message printed almost illegibly, and with many evidences of an unaccustomed task.

Translated, it was a warning to the Claytons to refrain from reporting the loss of the revolvers, or from repeating what the old sailor had told them--to refrain on pain of death.

"I rather imagine we'll be good," said Clayton with a rueful smile. "About all we can do is to sit tight and wait for whatever may come." 

 Chapter II

The Savage Home 

Nor did they have long to wait, for the next morning as Clayton was emerging on deck for his accustomed walk before breakfast, a shot rang out, and then another, and another.

The sight which met his eyes confirmed his worst fears. Facing the little knot of officers was the entire motley crew of the Fuwalda, and at their head stood Black Michael.

At the first volley from the officers the men ran for shelter, and from points of vantage behind masts, wheel-house and cabin they returned the fire of the five men who represented the hated authority of the ship.

Two of their number had gone down before the captain's revolver. They lay where they had fallen between the combatants. But then the first mate lunged forward upon his face, and at a cry of command from Black Michael the mutineers charged the remaining four. The crew had been able to muster but six firearms, so most of them were armed with boat hooks, axes, hatchets and crowbars.

The captain had emptied his revolver and was reloading as the charge was made. The second mate's gun had jammed, and so there were but two weapons opposed to the mutineers as they bore down upon the officers, who now started to give back before the infuriated rush of their men.

Both sides were cursing and swearing in a frightful manner, which, together with the reports of the firearms and the screams and groans of the wounded, turned the deck of the Fuwalda to the likeness of a madhouse.

Before the officers had taken a dozen backward steps the men were upon them. An ax in the hands of a burly Negro cleft the captain from forehead to chin, and an instant later the others were down: dead or wounded from dozens of blows and bullet wounds.

Short and grisly had been the work of the mutineers of the Fuwalda, and through it all John Clayton had stood leaning carelessly beside the companionway puffing meditatively upon his pipe as though he had been but watching an indifferent cricket match.

As the last officer went down he thought it was time that he returned to his wife lest some members of the crew find her alone below.

Though outwardly calm and indifferent, Clayton was inwardly apprehensive and wrought up, for he feared for his wife's safety at the hands of these ignorant, half-brutes into whose hands fate had so remorselessly thrown them.

As he turned to descend the ladder he was surprised to see his wife standing on the steps almost at his side.

"How long have you been here, Alice?"

"Since the beginning," she replied. "How awful, John. Oh, how awful! What can we hope for at the hands of such as those?"

"Breakfast, I hope," he answered, smiling bravely in an attempt to allay her fears.

"At least," he added, "I'm going to ask them. Come with me, Alice. We must not let them think we expect any but courteous treatment."

The men had by this time surrounded the dead and wounded officers, and without either partiality or compassion proceeded to throw both living and dead over the sides of the vessel. With equal heartlessness they disposed of their own dead and dying.

Presently one of the crew spied the approaching Claytons, and with a cry of: "Here's two more for the fishes," rushed toward them with uplifted ax.

But Black Michael was even quicker, so that the fellow went down with a bullet in his back before he had taken a half dozen steps.

With a loud roar, Black Michael attracted the attention of the others, and, pointing to Lord and Lady Greystoke, cried:

"These here are my friends, and they are to be left alone. D'ye understand?

"I'm captain of this ship now, an' what I says goes," he added, turning to Clayton. "Just keep to yourselves, and nobody'll harm ye," and he looked threateningly on his fellows.

The Claytons heeded Black Michael's instructions so well that they saw but little of the crew and knew nothing of the plans the men were making.

Occasionally they heard faint echoes of brawls and quarreling among the mutineers, and on two occasions the vicious bark of firearms rang out on the still air. But Black Michael was a fit leader for this band of cutthroats, and, withal held them in fair subjection to his rule.

On the fifth day following the murder of the ship's officers, land was sighted by the lookout. Whether island or mainland, Black Michael did not know, but he announced to Clayton that if investigation showed that the place was habitable he and Lady Greystoke were to be put ashore with their belongings.

"You'll be all right there for a few months," he explained, "and by that time we'll have been able to make an inhabited coast somewhere and scatter a bit. Then I'll see that yer gover'ment's notified where you be an' they'll soon send a man-o'war to fetch ye off.

"It would be a hard matter to land you in civilization without a lot o' questions being asked, an' none o' us here has any very convincin' answers up our sleeves."

Clayton remonstrated against the inhumanity of landing them upon an unknown shore to be left to the mercies of savage beasts, and, possibly, still more savage men.

But his words were of no avail, and only tended to anger Black Michael, so he was forced to desist and make the best he could of a bad situation.

About three o'clock in the afternoon they came about off a beautiful wooded shore opposite the mouth of what appeared to be a land-locked harbor.

Black Michael sent a small boat filled with men to sound the entrance in an effort to determine if the Fuwalda could be safely worked through the entrance.

In about an hour they returned and reported deep water through the passage as well as far into the little basin.

Before dark the barkentine lay peacefully at anchor upon the bosom of the still, mirror-like surface of the harbor.

The surrounding shores were beautiful with semitropical verdure, while in the distance the country rose from the ocean in hill and tableland, almost uniformly clothed by primeval forest.

No signs of habitation were visible, but that the land might easily support human life was evidenced by the abundant bird and animal life of which the watchers on the Fuwalda's deck caught occasional glimpses, as well as by the shimmer of a little river which emptied into the harbor, insuring fresh water in plenitude.

As darkness settled upon the earth, Clayton and Lady Alice still stood by the ship's rail in silent contemplation of their future abode. From the dark shadows of the mighty forest came the wild calls of savage beasts--the deep roar of the lion, and, occasionally, the shrill scream of a panther.

The woman shrank closer to the man in terror-stricken anticipation of the horrors lying in wait for them in the awful blackness of the nights to come, when they should be alone upon that wild and lonely shore.

Later in the evening Black Michael joined them long enough to instruct them to make their preparations for landing on the morrow. They tried to persuade him to take them to some more hospitable coast near enough to civilization so that they might hope to fall into friendly hands. But no pleas, or threats, or promises of reward could move him.

"I am the only man aboard who would not rather see ye both safely dead, and, while I know that's the sensible way to make sure of our own necks, yet Black Michael's not the man to forget a favor. Ye saved my life once, and in return I'm goin' to spare yours, but that's all I can do.

"The men won't stand for any more, and if we don't get ye landed pretty quick they may even change their minds about giving ye that much show. I'll put all yer stuff ashore with ye as well as cookin' utensils an' some old sails for tents, an' enough grub to last ye until ye can find fruit and game.

"With yer guns for protection, ye ought to be able to live here easy enough until help comes. When I get safely hid away I'll see to it that the British gover'ment learns about where ye be; for the life of me I couldn't tell 'em exactly where, for I don't know myself. But they'll find ye all right."

After he had left them they went silently below, each wrapped in gloomy forebodings.

Clayton did not believe that Black Michael had the slightest intention of notifying the British government of their whereabouts, nor was he any too sure but that some treachery was contemplated for the following day when they should be on shore with the sailors who would have to accompany them with their belongings.

Once out of Black Michael's sight any of the men might strike them down, and still leave Black Michael's conscience clear.

And even should they escape that fate was it not but to be faced with far graver dangers? Alone, he might hope to survive for years; for he was a strong, athletic man.

But what of Alice, and that other little life so soon to be launched amidst the hardships and grave dangers of a primeval world?

The man shuddered as he meditated upon the awful gravity, the fearful helplessness, of their situation. But it was a merciful Providence which prevented him from foreseeing the hideous reality which awaited them in the grim depths of that gloomy wood.

Early next morning their numerous chests and boxes were hoisted on deck and lowered to waiting small boats for transportation to shore.

There was a great quantity and variety of stuff, as the Claytons had expected a possible five to eight years' residence in their new home. Thus, in addition to the many necessities they had brought, there were also many luxuries.

Black Michael was determined that nothing belonging to the Claytons should be left on board. Whether out of compassion for them, or in furtherance of his own self-interests, it would be difficult to say.

There was no question but that the presence of property of a missing British official upon a suspicious vessel would have been a difficult thing to explain in any civilized port in the world.

So zealous was he in his efforts to carry out his intentions that he insisted upon the return of Clayton's revolvers to him by the sailors in whose possession they were.

Into the small boats were also loaded salt meats and biscuit, with a small supply of potatoes and beans, matches, and cooking vessels, a chest of tools, and the old sails which Black Michael had promised them.

As though himself fearing the very thing which Clayton had suspected, Black Michael accompanied them to shore, and was the last to leave them when the small boats, having filled the ship's casks with fresh water, were pushed out toward the waiting Fuwalda.

As the boats moved slowly over the smooth waters of the bay, Clayton and his wife stood silently watching their departure--in the breasts of both a feeling of impending disaster and utter hopelessness.

And behind them, over the edge of a low ridge, other eyes watched--close set, wicked eyes, gleaming beneath shaggy brows.

As the Fuwalda passed through the narrow entrance to the harbor and out of sight behind a projecting point, Lady Alice threw her arms about Clayton's neck and burst into uncontrolled sobs.

Bravely had she faced the dangers of the mutiny; with heroic fortitude she had looked into the terrible future; but now that the horror of absolute solitude was upon them, her overwrought nerves gave way, and the reaction came.

He did not attempt to check her tears. It were better that nature have her way in relieving these long-pent emotions, and it was many minutes before the girl--little more than a child she was--could again gain mastery of herself.

"Oh, John," she cried at last, "the horror of it. What are we to do? What are we to do?"

"There is but one thing to do, Alice," and he spoke as quietly as though they were sitting in their snug living room at home, "and that is work. Work must be our salvation. We must not give ourselves time to think, for in that direction lies madness.

"We must work and wait. I am sure that relief will come, and come quickly, when once it is apparent that the Fuwalda has been lost, even though Black Michael does not keep his word to us."

"But John, if it were only you and I," she sobbed, "we could endure it I know; but--"

"Yes, dear," he answered, gently, "I have been thinking of that, also; but we must face it, as we must face whatever comes, bravely and with the utmost confidence in our ability to cope with circumstances whatever they may be.

"Hundreds of thousands of years ago our ancestors of the dim and distant past faced the same problems which we must face, possibly in these same primeval forests. That we are here today evidences their victory.

"What they did may we not do? And even better, for are we not armed with ages of superior knowledge, and have we not the means of protection, defense, and sustenance which science has given us, but of which they were totally ignorant? What they accomplished, Alice, with instruments and weapons of stone and bone, surely that may we accomplish also."

"Ah, John, I wish that I might be a man with a man's philosophy, but I am but a woman, seeing with my heart rather than my head, and all that I can see is too horrible, too unthinkable to put into words.

"I only hope you are right, John. I will do my best to be a brave primeval woman, a fit mate for the primeval man."

Clayton's first thought was to arrange a sleeping shelter for the night; something which might serve to protect them from prowling beasts of prey.

He opened the box containing his rifles and ammunition, that they might both be armed against possible attack while at work, and then together they sought a location for their first night's sleeping place.

A hundred yards from the beach was a little level spot, fairly free of trees; here they decided eventually to build a permanent house, but for the time being they both thought it best to construct a little platform in the trees out of reach of the larger of the savage beasts in whose realm they were.

To this end Clayton selected four trees which formed a rectangle about eight feet square, and cutting long branches from other trees he constructed a framework around them, about ten feet from the ground, fastening the ends of the branches securely to the trees by means of rope, a quantity of which Black Michael had furnished him from the hold of the Fuwalda.

Across this framework Clayton placed other smaller branches quite close together. This platform he paved with the huge fronds of elephant's ear which grew in profusion about them, and over the fronds he laid a great sail folded into several thicknesses.

Seven feet higher he constructed a similar, though lighter platform to serve as roof, and from the sides of this he suspended the balance of his sailcloth for walls.

When completed he had a rather snug little nest, to which he carried their blankets and some of the lighter luggage.

It was now late in the afternoon, and the balance of the daylight hours were devoted to the building of a rude ladder by means of which Lady Alice could mount to her new home.

All during the day the forest about them had been filled with excited birds of brilliant plumage, and dancing, chattering monkeys, who watched these new arrivals and their wonderful nest building operations with every mark of keenest interest and fascination.

Notwithstanding that both Clayton and his wife kept a sharp lookout they saw nothing of larger animals, though on two occasions they had seen their little simian neighbors come screaming and chattering from the near-by ridge, casting frightened glances back over their little shoulders, and evincing as plainly as though by speech that they were fleeing some terrible thing which lay concealed there.

Just before dusk Clayton finished his ladder, and, filling a great basin with water from the near-by stream, the two mounted to the comparative safety of their aerial chamber.

As it was quite warm, Clayton had left the side curtains thrown back over the roof, and as they sat, like Turks, upon their blankets, Lady Alice, straining her eyes into the darkening shadows of the wood, suddenly reached out and grasped Clayton's arms.

"John," she whispered, "look! What is it, a man?"

As Clayton turned his eyes in the direction she indicated, he saw silhouetted dimly against the shadows beyond, a great figure standing upright upon the ridge.

For a moment it stood as though listening and then turned slowly, and melted into the shadows of the jungle.

"What is it, John?"

"I do not know, Alice," he answered gravely, "it is too dark to see so far, and it may have been but a shadow cast by the rising moon."

"No, John, if it was not a man it was some huge and grotesque mockery of man. Oh, I am afraid."

He gathered her in his arms, whispering words of courage and love into her ears.

Soon after, he lowered the curtain walls, tying them securely to the trees so that, except for a little opening toward the beach, they were entirely enclosed.

As it was now pitch dark within their tiny aerie they lay down upon their blankets to try to gain, through sleep, a brief respite of forgetfulness.

Clayton lay facing the opening at the front, a rifle and a brace of revolvers at his hand.

Scarcely had they closed their eyes than the terrifying cry of a panther rang out from the jungle behind them. Closer and closer it came until they could hear the great beast directly beneath them. For an hour or more they heard it sniffing and clawing at the trees which supported their platform, but at last it roamed away across the beach, where Clayton could see it clearly in the brilliant moonlight--a great, handsome beast, the largest he had ever seen.

During the long hours of darkness they caught but fitful snatches of sleep, for the night noises of a great jungle teeming with myriad animal life kept their overwrought nerves on edge, so that a hundred times they were startled to wakefulness by piercing screams, or the stealthy moving of great bodies beneath them. 

 Chapter III

Life and Death 

Morning found them but little, if at all refreshed, though it was with a feeling of intense relief that they saw the day dawn.

As soon as they had made their meager breakfast of salt pork, coffee and biscuit, Clayton commenced work upon their house, for he realized that they could hope for no safety and no peace of mind at night until four strong walls effectually barred the jungle life from them.

The task was an arduous one and required the better part of a month, though he built but one small room. He constructed his cabin of small logs about six inches in diameter, stopping the chinks with clay which he found at the depth of a few feet beneath the surface soil.

At one end he built a fireplace of small stones from the beach. These also he set in clay and when the house had been entirely completed he applied a coating of the clay to the entire outside surface to the thickness of four inches.

In the window opening he set small branches about an inch in diameter both vertically and horizontally, and so woven that they formed a substantial grating that could withstand the strength of a powerful animal. Thus they obtained air and proper ventilation without fear of lessening the safety of their cabin.

The A-shaped roof was thatched with small branches laid close together and over these long jungle grass and palm fronds, with a final coating of clay.

The door he built of pieces of the packing-boxes which had held their belongings, nailing one piece upon another, the grain of contiguous layers running transversely, until he had a solid body some three inches thick and of such great strength that they were both moved to laughter as they gazed upon it.

Here the greatest difficulty confronted Clayton, for he had no means whereby to hang his massive door now that he had built it. After two days' work, however, he succeeded in fashioning two massive hardwood hinges, and with these he hung the door so that it opened and closed easily.

The stuccoing and other final touches were added after they moved into the house, which they had done as soon as the roof was on, piling their boxes before the door at night and thus having a comparatively safe and comfortable habitation.

The building of a bed, chairs, table, and shelves was a relatively easy matter, so that by the end of the second month they were well settled, and, but for the constant dread of attack by wild beasts and the ever growing loneliness, they were not uncomfortable or unhappy.

At night great beasts snarled and roared about their tiny cabin, but, so accustomed may one become to oft repeated noises, that soon they paid little attention to them, sleeping soundly the whole night through.

Thrice had they caught fleeting glimpses of great man-like figures like that of the first night, but never at sufficiently close range to know positively whether the half-seen forms were those of man or brute.

The brilliant birds and the little monkeys had become accustomed to their new acquaintances, and as they had evidently never seen human beings before they presently, after their first fright had worn off, approached closer and closer, impelled by that strange curiosity which dominates the wild creatures of the forest and the jungle and the plain, so that within the first month several of the birds had gone so far as even to accept morsels of food from the friendly hands of the Claytons.

One afternoon, while Clayton was working upon an addition to their cabin, for he contemplated building several more rooms, a number of their grotesque little friends came shrieking and scolding through the trees from the direction of the ridge. Ever as they fled they cast fearful glances back of them, and finally they stopped near Clayton jabbering excitedly to him as though to warn him of approaching danger.

At last he saw it, the thing the little monkeys so feared--the man-brute of which the Claytons had caught occasional fleeting glimpses.

It was approaching through the jungle in a semi-erect position, now and then placing the backs of its closed fists upon the ground--a great anthropoid ape, and, as it advanced, it emitted deep guttural growls and an occasional low barking sound.

Clayton was at some distance from the cabin, having come to fell a particularly perfect tree for his building operations. Grown careless from months of continued safety, during which time he had seen no dangerous animals during the daylight hours, he had left his rifles and revolvers all within the little cabin, and now that he saw the great ape crashing through the underbrush directly toward him, and from a direction which practically cut him off from escape, he felt a vague little shiver play up and down his spine.

He knew that, armed only with an ax, his chances with this ferocious monster were small indeed--and Alice; O God, he thought, what will become of Alice?

There was yet a slight chance of reaching the cabin. He turned and ran toward it, shouting an alarm to his wife to run in and close the great door in case the ape cut off his retreat.

Lady Greystoke had been sitting a little way from the cabin, and when she heard his cry she looked up to see the ape springing with almost incredible swiftness, for so large and awkward an animal, in an effort to head off Clayton.

With a low cry she sprang toward the cabin, and, as she entered, gave a backward glance which filled her soul with terror, for the brute had intercepted her husband, who now stood at bay grasping his ax with both hands ready to swing it upon the infuriated animal when he should make his final charge.

"Close and bolt the door, Alice," cried Clayton. "I can finish this fellow with my ax."

But he knew he was facing a horrible death, and so did she.

The ape was a great bull, weighing probably three hundred pounds. His nasty, close-set eyes gleamed hatred from beneath his shaggy brows, while his great canine fangs were bared in a horrid snarl as he paused a moment before his prey.

Over the brute's shoulder Clayton could see the doorway of his cabin, not twenty paces distant, and a great wave of horror and fear swept over him as he saw his young wife emerge, armed with one of his rifles.

She had always been afraid of firearms, and would never touch them, but now she rushed toward the ape with the fearlessness of a lioness protecting its young.

"Back, Alice," shouted Clayton, "for God's sake, go back."

But she would not heed, and just then the ape charged, so that Clayton could say no more.

The man swung his ax with all his mighty strength, but the powerful brute seized it in those terrible hands, and tearing it from Clayton's grasp hurled it far to one side.

With an ugly snarl he closed upon his defenseless victim, but ere his fangs had reached the throat they thirsted for, there was a sharp report and a bullet entered the ape's back between his shoulders.

Throwing Clayton to the ground the beast turned upon his new enemy. There before him stood the terrified girl vainly trying to fire another bullet into the animal's body; but she did not understand the mechanism of the firearm, and the hammer fell futilely upon an empty cartridge.

Almost simultaneously Clayton regained his feet, and without thought of the utter hopelessness of it, he rushed forward to drag the ape from his wife's prostrate form.

With little or no effort he succeeded, and the great bulk rolled inertly upon the turf before him--the ape was dead. The bullet had done its work.

A hasty examination of his wife revealed no marks upon her, and Clayton decided that the huge brute had died the instant he had sprung toward Alice.

Gently he lifted his wife's still unconscious form, and bore her to the little cabin, but it was fully two hours before she regained consciousness.

Her first words filled Clayton with vague apprehension. For some time after regaining her senses, Alice gazed wonderingly about the interior of the little cabin, and then, with a satisfied sigh, said:

"O, John, it is so good to be really home! I have had an awful dream, dear. I thought we were no longer in London, but in some horrible place where great beasts attacked us."

"There, there, Alice," he said, stroking her forehead, "try to sleep again, and do not worry your head about bad dreams."

That night a little son was born in the tiny cabin beside the primeval forest, while a leopard screamed before the door, and the deep notes of a lion's roar sounded from beyond the ridge.

Lady Greystoke never recovered from the shock of the great ape's attack, and, though she lived for a year after her baby was born, she was never again outside the cabin, nor did she ever fully realize that she was not in England.

Sometimes she would question Clayton as to the strange noises of the nights; the absence of servants and friends, and the strange rudeness of the furnishings within her room, but, though he made no effort to deceive her, never could she grasp the meaning of it all.

In other ways she was quite rational, and the joy and happiness she took in the possession of her little son and the constant attentions of her husband made that year a very happy one for her, the happiest of her young life.

That it would have been beset by worries and apprehension had she been in full command of her mental faculties Clayton well knew; so that while he suffered terribly to see her so, there were times when he was almost glad, for her sake, that she could not understand.

Long since had he given up any hope of rescue, except through accident. With unremitting zeal he had worked to beautify the interior of the cabin.

Skins of lion and panther covered the floor. Cupboards and bookcases lined the walls. Odd vases made by his own hand from the clay of the region held beautiful tropical flowers. Curtains of grass and bamboo covered the windows, and, most arduous task of all, with his meager assortment of tools he had fashioned lumber to neatly seal the walls and ceiling and lay a smooth floor within the cabin.

That he had been able to turn his hands at all to such unaccustomed labor was a source of mild wonder to him. But he loved the work because it was for her and the tiny life that had come to cheer them, though adding a hundredfold to his responsibilities and to the terribleness of their situation.

During the year that followed, Clayton was several times attacked by the great apes which now seemed to continually infest the vicinity of the cabin; but as he never again ventured outside without both rifle and revolvers he had little fear of the huge beasts.

He had strengthened the window protections and fitted a unique wooden lock to the cabin door, so that when he hunted for game and fruits, as it was constantly necessary for him to do to insure sustenance, he had no fear that any animal could break into the little home.

At first he shot much of the game from the cabin windows, but toward the end the animals learned to fear the strange lair from whence issued the terrifying thunder of his rifle.

In his leisure Clayton read, often aloud to his wife, from the store of books he had brought for their new home. Among these were many for little children--picture books, primers, readers--for they had known that their little child would be old enough for such before they might hope to return to England.

At other times Clayton wrote in his diary, which he had always been accustomed to keep in French, and in which he recorded the details of their strange life. This book he kept locked in a little metal box.

A year from the day her little son was born Lady Alice passed quietly away in the night. So peaceful was her end that it was hours before Clayton could awake to a realization that his wife was dead.

The horror of the situation came to him very slowly, and it is doubtful that he ever fully realized the enormity of his sorrow and the fearful responsibility that had devolved upon him with the care of that wee thing, his son, still a nursing babe.

The last entry in his diary was made the morning following her death, and there he recites the sad details in a matter-of-fact way that adds to the pathos of it; for it breathes a tired apathy born of long sorrow and hopelessness, which even this cruel blow could scarcely awake to further suffering: 

My little son is crying for nourishment--O Alice, Alice, what shall I do? 

And as John Clayton wrote the last words his hand was destined ever to pen, he dropped his head wearily upon his outstretched arms where they rested upon the table he had built for her who lay still and cold in the bed beside him.

For a long time no sound broke the deathlike stillness of the jungle midday save the piteous wailing of the tiny man-child. 


Mowgli's Brothers

 Now Rann the Kite brings home the night That Mang the Bat sets free-- The herds are shut in byre and hut For loosed till dawn are we. This is the hour of pride and power, Talon and tush and claw. Oh, hear the call!--Good hunting all That keep the Jungle Law! Night-Song in the Jungle

It was seven o'clock of a very warm evening in the Seeonee hills when Father Wolf woke up from his day's rest, scratched himself, yawned, and spread out his paws one after the other to get rid of the sleepy feeling in their tips. Mother Wolf lay with her big gray nose dropped across her four tumbling, squealing cubs, and the moon shone into the mouth of the cave where they all lived. "Augrh!" said Father Wolf. "It is time to hunt again." He was going to spring down hill when a little shadow with a bushy tail crossed the threshold and whined: "Good luck go with you, O Chief of the Wolves. And good luck and strong white teeth go with noble children that they may never forget the hungry in this world."

It was the jackal--Tabaqui, the Dish-licker--and the wolves of India despise Tabaqui because he runs about making mischief, and telling tales, and eating rags and pieces of leather from the village rubbish-heaps. But they are afraid of him too, because Tabaqui, more than anyone else in the jungle, is apt to go mad, and then he forgets that he was ever afraid of anyone, and runs through the forest biting everything in his way. Even the tiger runs and hides when little Tabaqui goes mad, for madness is the most disgraceful thing that can overtake a wild creature. We call it hydrophobia, but they call it dewanee--the madness--and run.

"Enter, then, and look," said Father Wolf stiffly, "but there is no food here."

"For a wolf, no," said Tabaqui, "but for so mean a person as myself a dry bone is a good feast. Who are we, the Gidur-log [the jackal people], to pick and choose?" He scuttled to the back of the cave, where he found the bone of a buck with some meat on it, and sat cracking the end merrily.

"All thanks for this good meal," he said, licking his lips. "How beautiful are the noble children! How large are their eyes! And so young too! Indeed, indeed, I might have remembered that the children of kings are men from the beginning."

Now, Tabaqui knew as well as anyone else that there is nothing so unlucky as to compliment children to their faces. It pleased him to see Mother and Father Wolf look uncomfortable.

Tabaqui sat still, rejoicing in the mischief that he had made, and then he said spitefully:

"Shere Khan, the Big One, has shifted his hunting grounds. He will hunt among these hills for the next moon, so he has told me."

Shere Khan was the tiger who lived near the Waingunga River, twenty miles away.

"He has no right!" Father Wolf began angrily--"By the Law of the Jungle he has no right to change his quarters without due warning. He will frighten every head of game within ten miles, and I--I have to kill for two, these days."

"His mother did not call him Lungri [the Lame One] for nothing," said Mother Wolf quietly. "He has been lame in one foot from his birth. That is why he has only killed cattle. Now the villagers of the Waingunga are angry with him, and he has come here to make our villagers angry. They will scour the jungle for him when he is far away, and we and our children must run when the grass is set alight. Indeed, we are very grateful to Shere Khan!"

"Shall I tell him of your gratitude?" said Tabaqui.

"Out!" snapped Father Wolf. "Out and hunt with thy master. Thou hast done harm enough for one night."

"I go," said Tabaqui quietly. "Ye can hear Shere Khan below in the thickets. I might have saved myself the message."

Father Wolf listened, and below in the valley that ran down to a little river he heard the dry, angry, snarly, singsong whine of a tiger who has caught nothing and does not care if all the jungle knows it.

"The fool!" said Father Wolf. "To begin a night's work with that noise! Does he think that our buck are like his fat Waingunga bullocks?"

"H'sh. It is neither bullock nor buck he hunts to-night," said Mother Wolf. "It is Man."

The whine had changed to a sort of humming purr that seemed to come from every quarter of the compass. It was the noise that bewilders woodcutters and gypsies sleeping in the open, and makes them run sometimes into the very mouth of the tiger.

"Man!" said Father Wolf, showing all his white teeth. "Faugh! Are there not enough beetles and frogs in the tanks that he must eat Man, and on our ground too!"

The Law of the Jungle, which never orders anything without a reason, forbids every beast to eat Man except when he is killing to show his children how to kill, and then he must hunt outside the hunting grounds of his pack or tribe. The real reason for this is that man-killing means, sooner or later, the arrival of white men on elephants, with guns, and hundreds of brown men with gongs and rockets and torches. Then everybody in the jungle suffers. The reason the beasts give among themselves is that Man is the weakest and most defenseless of all living things, and it is unsportsmanlike to touch him. They say too--and it is true--that man-eaters become mangy, and lose their teeth.

The purr grew louder, and ended in the full-throated "Aaarh!" of the tiger's charge.

Then there was a howl--an untigerish howl--from Shere Khan. "He has missed," said Mother Wolf. "What is it?"

Father Wolf ran out a few paces and heard Shere Khan muttering and mumbling savagely as he tumbled about in the scrub.

"The fool has had no more sense than to jump at a woodcutter's campfire, and has burned his feet," said Father Wolf with a grunt. "Tabaqui is with him."

"Something is coming uphill," said Mother Wolf, twitching one ear. "Get ready."

The bushes rustled a little in the thicket, and Father Wolf dropped with his haunches under him, ready for his leap. Then, if you had been watching, you would have seen the most wonderful thing in the world--the wolf checked in mid-spring. He made his bound before he saw what it was he was jumping at, and then he tried to stop himself. The result was that he shot up straight into the air for four or five feet, landing almost where he left ground.

"Man!" he snapped. "A man's cub. Look!"

Directly in front of him, holding on by a low branch, stood a naked brown baby who could just walk--as soft and as dimpled a little atom as ever came to a wolf's cave at night. He looked up into Father Wolf's face, and laughed.

"Is that a man's cub?" said Mother Wolf. "I have never seen one. Bring it here."

A Wolf accustomed to moving his own cubs can, if necessary, mouth an egg without breaking it, and though Father Wolf's jaws closed right on the child's back not a tooth even scratched the skin as he laid it down among the cubs.

"How little! How naked, and--how bold!" said Mother Wolf softly. The baby was pushing his way between the cubs to get close to the warm hide. "Ahai! He is taking his meal with the others. And so this is a man's cub. Now, was there ever a wolf that could boast of a man's cub among her children?"

"I have heard now and again of such a thing, but never in our Pack or in my time," said Father Wolf. "He is altogether without hair, and I could kill him with a touch of my foot. But see, he looks up and is not afraid."

The moonlight was blocked out of the mouth of the cave, for Shere Khan's great square head and shoulders were thrust into the entrance. Tabaqui, behind him, was squeaking: "My lord, my lord, it went in here!"

"Shere Khan does us great honor," said Father Wolf, but his eyes were very angry. "What does Shere Khan need?"

"My quarry. A man's cub went this way," said Shere Khan. "Its parents have run off. Give it to me."

Shere Khan had jumped at a woodcutter's campfire, as Father Wolf had said, and was furious from the pain of his burned feet. But Father Wolf knew that the mouth of the cave was too narrow for a tiger to come in by. Even where he was, Shere Khan's shoulders and forepaws were cramped for want of room, as a man's would be if he tried to fight in a barrel.

"The Wolves are a free people," said Father Wolf. "They take orders from the Head of the Pack, and not from any striped cattle-killer. The man's cub is ours--to kill if we choose."

"Ye choose and ye do not choose! What talk is this of choosing? By the bull that I killed, am I to stand nosing into your dog's den for my fair dues? It is I, Shere Khan, who speak!"

The tiger's roar filled the cave with thunder. Mother Wolf shook herself clear of the cubs and sprang forward, her eyes, like two green moons in the darkness, facing the blazing eyes of Shere Khan.

"And it is I, Raksha [The Demon], who answers. The man's cub is mine, Lungri--mine to me! He shall not be killed. He shall live to run with the Pack and to hunt with the Pack; and in the end, look you, hunter of little naked cubs--frog-eater--fish-killer--he shall hunt thee! Now get hence, or by the Sambhur that I killed (I eat no starved cattle), back thou goest to thy mother, burned beast of the jungle, lamer than ever thou camest into the world! Go!"

Father Wolf looked on amazed. He had almost forgotten the days when he won Mother Wolf in fair fight from five other wolves, when she ran in the Pack and was not called The Demon for compliment's sake. Shere Khan might have faced Father Wolf, but he could not stand up against Mother Wolf, for he knew that where he was she had all the advantage of the ground, and would fight to the death. So he backed out of the cave mouth growling, and when he was clear he shouted:

"Each dog barks in his own yard! We will see what the Pack will say to this fostering of man-cubs. The cub is mine, and to my teeth he will come in the end, O bush-tailed thieves!"

Mother Wolf threw herself down panting among the cubs, and Father Wolf said to her gravely:

"Shere Khan speaks this much truth. The cub must be shown to the Pack. Wilt thou still keep him, Mother?"

"Keep him!" she gasped. "He came naked, by night, alone and very hungry; yet he was not afraid! Look, he has pushed one of my babes to one side already. And that lame butcher would have killed him and would have run off to the Waingunga while the villagers here hunted through all our lairs in revenge! Keep him? Assuredly I will keep him. Lie still, little frog. O thou Mowgli--for Mowgli the Frog I will call thee--the time will come when thou wilt hunt Shere Khan as he has hunted thee."

"But what will our Pack say?" said Father Wolf.

The Law of the Jungle lays down very clearly that any wolf may, when he marries, withdraw from the Pack he belongs to. But as soon as his cubs are old enough to stand on their feet he must bring them to the Pack Council, which is generally held once a month at full moon, in order that the other wolves may identify them. After that inspection the cubs are free to run where they please, and until they have killed their first buck no excuse is accepted if a grown wolf of the Pack kills one of them. The punishment is death where the murderer can be found; and if you think for a minute you will see that this must be so.

Father Wolf waited till his cubs could run a little, and then on the night of the Pack Meeting took them and Mowgli and Mother Wolf to the Council Rock--a hilltop covered with stones and boulders where a hundred wolves could hide. Akela, the great gray Lone Wolf, who led all the Pack by strength and cunning, lay out at full length on his rock, and below him sat forty or more wolves of every size and color, from badger-colored veterans who could handle a buck alone to young black three-year-olds who thought they could. The Lone Wolf had led them for a year now. He had fallen twice into a wolf trap in his youth, and once he had been beaten and left for dead; so he knew the manners and customs of men. There was very little talking at the Rock. The cubs tumbled over each other in the center of the circle where their mothers and fathers sat, and now and again a senior wolf would go quietly up to a cub, look at him carefully, and return to his place on noiseless feet. Sometimes a mother would push her cub far out into the moonlight to be sure that he had not been overlooked. Akela from his rock would cry: "Ye know the Law--ye know the Law. Look well, O Wolves!" And the anxious mothers would take up the call: "Look--look well, O Wolves!"

At last--and Mother Wolf's neck bristles lifted as the time came--Father Wolf pushed "Mowgli the Frog," as they called him, into the center, where he sat laughing and playing with some pebbles that glistened in the moonlight.

Akela never raised his head from his paws, but went on with the monotonous cry: "Look well!" A muffled roar came up from behind the rocks--the voice of Shere Khan crying: "The cub is mine. Give him to me. What have the Free People to do with a man's cub?" Akela never even twitched his ears. All he said was: "Look well, O Wolves! What have the Free People to do with the orders of any save the Free People? Look well!"

There was a chorus of deep growls, and a young wolf in his fourth year flung back Shere Khan's question to Akela: "What have the Free People to do with a man's cub?" Now, the Law of the Jungle lays down that if there is any dispute as to the right of a cub to be accepted by the Pack, he must be spoken for by at least two members of the Pack who are not his father and mother.

"Who speaks for this cub?" said Akela. "Among the Free People who speaks?" There was no answer and Mother Wolf got ready for what she knew would be her last fight, if things came to fighting.

Then the only other creature who is allowed at the Pack Council--Baloo, the sleepy brown bear who teaches the wolf cubs the Law of the Jungle: old Baloo, who can come and go where he pleases because he eats only nuts and roots and honey--rose upon his hind quarters and grunted.

"The man's cub--the man's cub?" he said. "I speak for the man's cub. There is no harm in a man's cub. I have no gift of words, but I speak the truth. Let him run with the Pack, and be entered with the others. I myself will teach him."

"We need yet another," said Akela. "Baloo has spoken, and he is our teacher for the young cubs. Who speaks besides Baloo?"

A black shadow dropped down into the circle. It was Bagheera the Black Panther, inky black all over, but with the panther markings showing up in certain lights like the pattern of watered silk. Everybody knew Bagheera, and nobody cared to cross his path; for he was as cunning as Tabaqui, as bold as the wild buffalo, and as reckless as the wounded elephant. But he had a voice as soft as wild honey dripping from a tree, and a skin softer than down.

"O Akela, and ye the Free People," he purred, "I have no right in your assembly, but the Law of the Jungle says that if there is a doubt which is not a killing matter in regard to a new cub, the life of that cub may be bought at a price. And the Law does not say who may or may not pay that price. Am I right?"

"Good! Good!" said the young wolves, who are always hungry. "Listen to Bagheera. The cub can be bought for a price. It is the Law."

"Knowing that I have no right to speak here, I ask your leave."

"Speak then," cried twenty voices.

"To kill a naked cub is shame. Besides, he may make better sport for you when he is grown. Baloo has spoken in his behalf. Now to Baloo's word I will add one bull, and a fat one, newly killed, not half a mile from here, if ye will accept the man's cub according to the Law. Is it difficult?"

There was a clamor of scores of voices, saying: "What matter? He will die in the winter rains. He will scorch in the sun. What harm can a naked frog do us? Let him run with the Pack. Where is the bull, Bagheera? Let him be accepted." And then came Akela's deep bay, crying: "Look well--look well, O Wolves!"

Mowgli was still deeply interested in the pebbles, and he did not notice when the wolves came and looked at him one by one. At last they all went down the hill for the dead bull, and only Akela, Bagheera, Baloo, and Mowgli's own wolves were left. Shere Khan roared still in the night, for he was very angry that Mowgli had not been handed over to him.

"Ay, roar well," said Bagheera, under his whiskers, "for the time will come when this naked thing will make thee roar to another tune, or I know nothing of man."

"It was well done," said Akela. "Men and their cubs are very wise. He may be a help in time."

"Truly, a help in time of need; for none can hope to lead the Pack forever," said Bagheera.

Akela said nothing. He was thinking of the time that comes to every leader of every pack when his strength goes from him and he gets feebler and feebler, till at last he is killed by the wolves and a new leader comes up--to be killed in his turn.

"Take him away," he said to Father Wolf, "and train him as befits one of the Free People."

And that is how Mowgli was entered into the Seeonee Wolf Pack for the price of a bull and on Baloo's good word.

Now you must be content to skip ten or eleven whole years, and only guess at all the wonderful life that Mowgli led among the wolves, because if it were written out it would fill ever so many books. He grew up with the cubs, though they, of course, were grown wolves almost before he was a child. And Father Wolf taught him his business, and the meaning of things in the jungle, till every rustle in the grass, every breath of the warm night air, every note of the owls above his head, every scratch of a bat's claws as it roosted for a while in a tree, and every splash of every little fish jumping in a pool meant just as much to him as the work of his office means to a business man. When he was not learning he sat out in the sun and slept, and ate and went to sleep again. When he felt dirty or hot he swam in the forest pools; and when he wanted honey (Baloo told him that honey and nuts were just as pleasant to eat as raw meat) he climbed up for it, and that Bagheera showed him how to do. Bagheera would lie out on a branch and call, "Come along, Little Brother," and at first Mowgli would cling like the sloth, but afterward he would fling himself through the branches almost as boldly as the gray ape. He took his place at the Council Rock, too, when the Pack met, and there he discovered that if he stared hard at any wolf, the wolf would be forced to drop his eyes, and so he used to stare for fun. At other times he would pick the long thorns out of the pads of his friends, for wolves suffer terribly from thorns and burs in their coats. He would go down the hillside into the cultivated lands by night, and look very curiously at the villagers in their huts, but he had a mistrust of men because Bagheera showed him a square box with a drop gate so cunningly hidden in the jungle that he nearly walked into it, and told him that it was a trap. He loved better than anything else to go with Bagheera into the dark warm heart of the forest, to sleep all through the drowsy day, and at night see how Bagheera did his killing. Bagheera killed right and left as he felt hungry, and so did Mowgli--with one exception. As soon as he was old enough to understand things, Bagheera told him that he must never touch cattle because he had been bought into the Pack at the price of a bull's life. "All the jungle is thine," said Bagheera, "and thou canst kill everything that thou art strong enough to kill; but for the sake of the bull that bought thee thou must never kill or eat any cattle young or old. That is the Law of the Jungle." Mowgli obeyed faithfully.

And he grew and grew strong as a boy must grow who does not know that he is learning any lessons, and who has nothing in the world to think of except things to eat.

Mother Wolf told him once or twice that Shere Khan was not a creature to be trusted, and that some day he must kill Shere Khan. But though a young wolf would have remembered that advice every hour, Mowgli forgot it because he was only a boy--though he would have called himself a wolf if he had been able to speak in any human tongue.

Shere Khan was always crossing his path in the jungle, for as Akela grew older and feebler the lame tiger had come to be great friends with the younger wolves of the Pack, who followed him for scraps, a thing Akela would never have allowed if he had dared to push his authority to the proper bounds. Then Shere Khan would flatter them and wonder that such fine young hunters were content to be led by a dying wolf and a man's cub. "They tell me," Shere Khan would say, "that at Council ye dare not look him between the eyes." And the young wolves would growl and bristle.

Bagheera, who had eyes and ears everywhere, knew something of this, and once or twice he told Mowgli in so many words that Shere Khan would kill him some day. Mowgli would laugh and answer: "I have the Pack and I have thee; and Baloo, though he is so lazy, might strike a blow or two for my sake. Why should I be afraid?"

It was one very warm day that a new notion came to Bagheera--born of something that he had heard. Perhaps Ikki the Porcupine had told him; but he said to Mowgli when they were deep in the jungle, as the boy lay with his head on Bagheera's beautiful black skin, "Little Brother, how often have I told thee that Shere Khan is thy enemy?"

"As many times as there are nuts on that palm," said Mowgli, who, naturally, could not count. "What of it? I am sleepy, Bagheera, and Shere Khan is all long tail and loud talk--like Mao, the Peacock."

"But this is no time for sleeping. Baloo knows it; I know it; the Pack know it; and even the foolish, foolish deer know. Tabaqui has told thee too."

"Ho! ho!" said Mowgli. "Tabaqui came to me not long ago with some rude talk that I was a naked man's cub and not fit to dig pig-nuts. But I caught Tabaqui by the tail and swung him twice against a palm-tree to teach him better manners."

"That was foolishness, for though Tabaqui is a mischief-maker, he would have told thee of something that concerned thee closely. Open those eyes, Little Brother. Shere Khan dare not kill thee in the jungle. But remember, Akela is very old, and soon the day comes when he cannot kill his buck, and then he will be leader no more. Many of the wolves that looked thee over when thou wast brought to the Council first are old too, and the young wolves believe, as Shere Khan has taught them, that a man-cub has no place with the Pack. In a little time thou wilt be a man."

"And what is a man that he should not run with his brothers?" said Mowgli. "I was born in the jungle. I have obeyed the Law of the Jungle, and there is no wolf of ours from whose paws I have not pulled a thorn. Surely they are my brothers!"

Bagheera stretched himself at full length and half shut his eyes. "Little Brother," said he, "feel under my jaw."

Mowgli put up his strong brown hand, and just under Bagheera's silky chin, where the giant rolling muscles were all hid by the glossy hair, he came upon a little bald spot.

"There is no one in the jungle that knows that I, Bagheera, carry that mark--the mark of the collar; and yet, Little Brother, I was born among men, and it was among men that my mother died--in the cages of the king's palace at Oodeypore. It was because of this that I paid the price for thee at the Council when thou wast a little naked cub. Yes, I too was born among men. I had never seen the jungle. They fed me behind bars from an iron pan till one night I felt that I was Bagheera--the Panther--and no man's plaything, and I broke the silly lock with one blow of my paw and came away. And because I had learned the ways of men, I became more terrible in the jungle than Shere Khan. Is it not so?"

"Yes," said Mowgli, "all the jungle fear Bagheera--all except Mowgli."

"Oh, thou art a man's cub," said the Black Panther very tenderly. "And even as I returned to my jungle, so thou must go back to men at last--to the men who are thy brothers--if thou art not killed in the Council."

"But why--but why should any wish to kill me?" said Mowgli.

"Look at me," said Bagheera. And Mowgli looked at him steadily between the eyes. The big panther turned his head away in half a minute.

"That is why," he said, shifting his paw on the leaves. "Not even I can look thee between the eyes, and I was born among men, and I love thee, Little Brother. The others they hate thee because their eyes cannot meet thine; because thou art wise; because thou hast pulled out thorns from their feet--because thou art a man."

"I did not know these things," said Mowgli sullenly, and he frowned under his heavy black eyebrows.

"What is the Law of the Jungle? Strike first and then give tongue. By thy very carelessness they know that thou art a man. But be wise. It is in my heart that when Akela misses his next kill--and at each hunt it costs him more to pin the buck--the Pack will turn against him and against thee. They will hold a jungle Council at the Rock, and then--and then--I have it!" said Bagheera, leaping up. "Go thou down quickly to the men's huts in the valley, and take some of the Red Flower which they grow there, so that when the time comes thou mayest have even a stronger friend than I or Baloo or those of the Pack that love thee. Get the Red Flower."

By Red Flower Bagheera meant fire, only no creature in the jungle will call fire by its proper name. Every beast lives in deadly fear of it, and invents a hundred ways of describing it.

"The Red Flower?" said Mowgli. "That grows outside their huts in the twilight. I will get some."

"There speaks the man's cub," said Bagheera proudly. "Remember that it grows in little pots. Get one swiftly, and keep it by thee for time of need."

"Good!" said Mowgli. "I go. But art thou sure, O my Bagheera"--he slipped his arm around the splendid neck and looked deep into the big eyes--"art thou sure that all this is Shere Khan's doing?"

"By the Broken Lock that freed me, I am sure, Little Brother."

"Then, by the Bull that bought me, I will pay Shere Khan full tale for this, and it may be a little over," said Mowgli, and he bounded away.

"That is a man. That is all a man," said Bagheera to himself, lying down again. "Oh, Shere Khan, never was a blacker hunting than that frog-hunt of thine ten years ago!"

Mowgli was far and far through the forest, running hard, and his heart was hot in him. He came to the cave as the evening mist rose, and drew breath, and looked down the valley. The cubs were out, but Mother Wolf, at the back of the cave, knew by his breathing that something was troubling her frog.

"What is it, Son?" she said.

"Some bat's chatter of Shere Khan," he called back. "I hunt among the plowed fields tonight," and he plunged downward through the bushes, to the stream at the bottom of the valley. There he checked, for he heard the yell of the Pack hunting, heard the bellow of a hunted Sambhur, and the snort as the buck turned at bay. Then there were wicked, bitter howls from the young wolves: "Akela! Akela! Let the Lone Wolf show his strength. Room for the leader of the Pack! Spring, Akela!"

The Lone Wolf must have sprung and missed his hold, for Mowgli heard the snap of his teeth and then a yelp as the Sambhur knocked him over with his forefoot.

He did not wait for anything more, but dashed on; and the yells grew fainter behind him as he ran into the croplands where the villagers lived.

"Bagheera spoke truth," he panted, as he nestled down in some cattle fodder by the window of a hut. "To-morrow is one day both for Akela and for me."

Then he pressed his face close to the window and watched the fire on the hearth. He saw the husbandman's wife get up and feed it in the night with black lumps. And when the morning came and the mists were all white and cold, he saw the man's child pick up a wicker pot plastered inside with earth, fill it with lumps of red-hot charcoal, put it under his blanket, and go out to tend the cows in the byre.

"Is that all?" said Mowgli. "If a cub can do it, there is nothing to fear." So he strode round the corner and met the boy, took the pot from his hand, and disappeared into the mist while the boy howled with fear.

"They are very like me," said Mowgli, blowing into the pot as he had seen the woman do. "This thing will die if I do not give it things to eat"; and he dropped twigs and dried bark on the red stuff. Halfway up the hill he met Bagheera with the morning dew shining like moonstones on his coat.

"Akela has missed," said the Panther. "They would have killed him last night, but they needed thee also. They were looking for thee on the hill."

"I was among the plowed lands. I am ready. See!" Mowgli held up the fire-pot.

"Good! Now, I have seen men thrust a dry branch into that stuff, and presently the Red Flower blossomed at the end of it. Art thou not afraid?"

"No. Why should I fear? I remember now--if it is not a dream--how, before I was a Wolf, I lay beside the Red Flower, and it was warm and pleasant."

All that day Mowgli sat in the cave tending his fire pot and dipping dry branches into it to see how they looked. He found a branch that satisfied him, and in the evening when Tabaqui came to the cave and told him rudely enough that he was wanted at the Council Rock, he laughed till Tabaqui ran away. Then Mowgli went to the Council, still laughing.

Akela the Lone Wolf lay by the side of his rock as a sign that the leadership of the Pack was open, and Shere Khan with his following of scrap-fed wolves walked to and fro openly being flattered. Bagheera lay close to Mowgli, and the fire pot was between Mowgli's knees. When they were all gathered together, Shere Khan began to speak--a thing he would never have dared to do when Akela was in his prime.

"He has no right," whispered Bagheera. "Say so. He is a dog's son. He will be frightened."

Mowgli sprang to his feet. "Free People," he cried, "does Shere Khan lead the Pack? What has a tiger to do with our leadership?"

"Seeing that the leadership is yet open, and being asked to speak--" Shere Khan began.

"By whom?" said Mowgli. "Are we all jackals, to fawn on this cattle butcher? The leadership of the Pack is with the Pack alone."

There were yells of "Silence, thou man's cub!" "Let him speak. He has kept our Law"; and at last the seniors of the Pack thundered: "Let the Dead Wolf speak." When a leader of the Pack has missed his kill, he is called the Dead Wolf as long as he lives, which is not long.

Akela raised his old head wearily:--

"Free People, and ye too, jackals of Shere Khan, for twelve seasons I have led ye to and from the kill, and in all that time not one has been trapped or maimed. Now I have missed my kill. Ye know how that plot was made. Ye know how ye brought me up to an untried buck to make my weakness known. It was cleverly done. Your right is to kill me here on the Council Rock, now. Therefore, I ask, who comes to make an end of the Lone Wolf? For it is my right, by the Law of the Jungle, that ye come one by one."

There was a long hush, for no single wolf cared to fight Akela to the death. Then Shere Khan roared: "Bah! What have we to do with this toothless fool? He is doomed to die! It is the man-cub who has lived too long. Free People, he was my meat from the first. Give him to me. I am weary of this man-wolf folly. He has troubled the jungle for ten seasons. Give me the man-cub, or I will hunt here always, and not give you one bone. He is a man, a man's child, and from the marrow of my bones I hate him!"

Then more than half the Pack yelled: "A man! A man! What has a man to do with us? Let him go to his own place."

"And turn all the people of the villages against us?" clamored Shere Khan. "No, give him to me. He is a man, and none of us can look him between the eyes."

Akela lifted his head again and said, "He has eaten our food. He has slept with us. He has driven game for us. He has broken no word of the Law of the Jungle."

"Also, I paid for him with a bull when he was accepted. The worth of a bull is little, but Bagheera's honor is something that he will perhaps fight for," said Bagheera in his gentlest voice.

"A bull paid ten years ago!" the Pack snarled. "What do we care for bones ten years old?"

"Or for a pledge?" said Bagheera, his white teeth bared under his lip. "Well are ye called the Free People!"

"No man's cub can run with the people of the jungle," howled Shere Khan. "Give him to me!"

"He is our brother in all but blood," Akela went on, "and ye would kill him here! In truth, I have lived too long. Some of ye are eaters of cattle, and of others I have heard that, under Shere Khan's teaching, ye go by dark night and snatch children from the villager's doorstep. Therefore I know ye to be cowards, and it is to cowards I speak. It is certain that I must die, and my life is of no worth, or I would offer that in the man-cub's place. But for the sake of the Honor of the Pack,--a little matter that by being without a leader ye have forgotten,--I promise that if ye let the man-cub go to his own place, I will not, when my time comes to die, bare one tooth against ye. I will die without fighting. That will at least save the Pack three lives. More I cannot do; but if ye will, I can save ye the shame that comes of killing a brother against whom there is no fault--a brother spoken for and bought into the Pack according to the Law of the Jungle."

"He is a man--a man--a man!" snarled the Pack. And most of the wolves began to gather round Shere Khan, whose tail was beginning to switch.

"Now the business is in thy hands," said Bagheera to Mowgli. "We can do no more except fight."

Mowgli stood upright--the fire pot in his hands. Then he stretched out his arms, and yawned in the face of the Council; but he was furious with rage and sorrow, for, wolflike, the wolves had never told him how they hated him. "Listen you!" he cried. "There is no need for this dog's jabber. Ye have told me so often tonight that I am a man (and indeed I would have been a wolf with you to my life's end) that I feel your words are true. So I do not call ye my brothers any more, but sag [dogs], as a man should. What ye will do, and what ye will not do, is not yours to say. That matter is with me; and that we may see the matter more plainly, I, the man, have brought here a little of the Red Flower which ye, dogs, fear."

He flung the fire pot on the ground, and some of the red coals lit a tuft of dried moss that flared up, as all the Council drew back in terror before the leaping flames.

Mowgli thrust his dead branch into the fire till the twigs lit and crackled, and whirled it above his head among the cowering wolves.

"Thou art the master," said Bagheera in an undertone. "Save Akela from the death. He was ever thy friend."

Akela, the grim old wolf who had never asked for mercy in his life, gave one piteous look at Mowgli as the boy stood all naked, his long black hair tossing over his shoulders in the light of the blazing branch that made the shadows jump and quiver.

"Good!" said Mowgli, staring round slowly. "I see that ye are dogs. I go from you to my own people--if they be my own people. The jungle is shut to me, and I must forget your talk and your companionship. But I will be more merciful than ye are. Because I was all but your brother in blood, I promise that when I am a man among men I will not betray ye to men as ye have betrayed me." He kicked the fire with his foot, and the sparks flew up. "There shall be no war between any of us in the Pack. But here is a debt to pay before I go." He strode forward to where Shere Khan sat blinking stupidly at the flames, and caught him by the tuft on his chin. Bagheera followed in case of accidents. "Up, dog!" Mowgli cried. "Up, when a man speaks, or I will set that coat ablaze!"

Shere Khan's ears lay flat back on his head, and he shut his eyes, for the blazing branch was very near.

"This cattle-killer said he would kill me in the Council because he had not killed me when I was a cub. Thus and thus, then, do we beat dogs when we are men. Stir a whisker, Lungri, and I ram the Red Flower down thy gullet!" He beat Shere Khan over the head with the branch, and the tiger whimpered and whined in an agony of fear.

"Pah! Singed jungle cat--go now! But remember when next I come to the Council Rock, as a man should come, it will be with Shere Khan's hide on my head. For the rest, Akela goes free to live as he pleases. Ye will not kill him, because that is not my will. Nor do I think that ye will sit here any longer, lolling out your tongues as though ye were somebodies, instead of dogs whom I drive out--thus! Go!" The fire was burning furiously at the end of the branch, and Mowgli struck right and left round the circle, and the wolves ran howling with the sparks burning their fur. At last there were only Akela, Bagheera, and perhaps ten wolves that had taken Mowgli's part. Then something began to hurt Mowgli inside him, as he had never been hurt in his life before, and he caught his breath and sobbed, and the tears ran down his face.

"What is it? What is it?" he said. "I do not wish to leave the jungle, and I do not know what this is. Am I dying, Bagheera?"

"No, Little Brother. That is only tears such as men use," said Bagheera. "Now I know thou art a man, and a man's cub no longer. The jungle is shut indeed to thee henceforward. Let them fall, Mowgli. They are only tears." So Mowgli sat and cried as though his heart would break; and he had never cried in all his life before.

"Now," he said, "I will go to men. But first I must say farewell to my mother." And he went to the cave where she lived with Father Wolf, and he cried on her coat, while the four cubs howled miserably.

"Ye will not forget me?" said Mowgli.

"Never while we can follow a trail," said the cubs. "Come to the foot of the hill when thou art a man, and we will talk to thee; and we will come into the croplands to play with thee by night."

"Come soon!" said Father Wolf. "Oh, wise little frog, come again soon; for we be old, thy mother and I."

"Come soon," said Mother Wolf, "little naked son of mine. For, listen, child of man, I loved thee more than ever I loved my cubs."

"I will surely come," said Mowgli. "And when I come it will be to lay out Shere Khan's hide upon the Council Rock. Do not forget me! Tell them in the jungle never to forget me!"

The dawn was beginning to break when Mowgli went down the hillside alone, to meet those mysterious things that are called men. 
 Australia Buddhist Connecticut Czechoslovakia February Parmesan Presbyterian Pyrrhic Teutonic Tuesday Wednesday a cappella aardvark abandon abbreviate abscond absorbent absorption abstinence abundance abundant abysmal abyss academy acceptable acceptably acceptance accessible accidentally accommodate accordion ache achieve acknowledgment acoustic acquiesce acquit
 across acrylic actor actually adamant adequate adhesive adieu adjacency adjacent adjective adjustment adolescent advantageous adversary aegis aerator aerial aesthetic aficionado afterwards against aggravate aggressive agitate aisle alchemy algae align all right allege allegiance allowance almond already amalgam amateur ambidextrous ameliorate amoeba amphibian amphitheater analyst analyze anarchistic ancestor ancestral ancillary anecdote aneurysm annealing annihilate anniversary annoyance annoyed annul anomalous anomaly anonymous
 antecedent anxiety anxious apart apartheid apathetic aperture aphelion apologize apologized apology apostrophe appalled apparatus apparently appreciation aqueous arachnid archaeology arctic argument arithmetic armageddon armament armistice arrow asbestos asphalt assimilate asterisk asteroid asthma asymmetric asymptote  asymptotic attorney auditorium aurora austere autumn auxiliary avocado azimuth baccalaureate 
 bachelor badminton bailiwick baloney baluster bankruptcy banquet bargain baroque bayonet bayou bazaar beautiful because behavior behavioral beige belie believe benefit benign beret bestiary biased bicycle biscuit bivouac bivouacking bizarre blossom
 bologna bougainvillea bouillon boulevard boundary bouquet bourbon bourgeois bourgeoisie boutique boycott brief broccoli brochure brogue bruise brusque buffet built buoy buoyant bureau bureaucratic burgeon business
 cabinet caesar cafe caffeine calf callus calves camouflage campaign canaille candidate cannibal cannibalize canoe cantaloupe captain captor carafe carcass career caribou carousel carriage cartilage casserole
 cataclysm catastrophe catchup category caterpillar cauliflower cavern cease celebration cellar cello cemetery cerebral chalk chameleon champagne chandelier charades charisma charlatan chartreuse chasm chassis chateaux chauffeur chauvinism cheetah chenille chicane
 chimera chimney chisel chocolate choir cholera chorale choreograph chorus chronicle chronological chutzpah cigarette circuit circumstance clairvoyant clerestory clich� cloisonn� coalesce coalescence coax cocoon coercion cognac cognizant
 cohabiting coiffure collaboration colleague collegiate cologne colonel column comb commission commitment communiqu� compass compete competitive complexion concatenate conceit conceivable condemn connoisseur connotation conquer conscience conscious consider consistent contagion continuum contractor convince coordinate
 corduroy cormorant correlate corrugated cougar council councilor counsel counterfeit coup couple courage course courteous courtesy coyote cr�che creator creche creosote cretaceous criticize critique crochet crocodile croissant croquet crotch crucifixion cruise cuckoo cuisine cul-de-sac culottes cumulative
 cupboard curiosity curious curmudgeon curriculum curvaceous cushion cynic cyst czar dachshund daiquiri dalmatian damn dearth debris debut decided decision deficient definable delimiter demolition dependency depot derriere description desiccation desirable dessert determine deterrence deterrent
 detour devastating develop development diagonal diamond diarrhea diaspora dichotomy diesel different dilate dilemma diphtheria diphthong dirigible disappointed disciple discipline disguise disgusting dissection dissemination dissertation dissipate dissolve divot doctoral doorjamb dormant
 double doubly doubt dropping drought dumb dungeon dying dysfunctional eager easy eavesdrop ecstasy ecstatic editing eerie eight electoral elegant elementary embankment embarrass embedded embrace eminently encompass
 endeavor endure ennui enormous enough ensemble ensue enthusiastic enticement entrance entrepreneur environment equivalent estuary etiquette etymology eulogy eunuch eunuchs euphoric euthanasia exaggerate examine excel excellent excerpt excitement
 executive exhilarate existence exorbitant expatriate explanation extension extraordinary extreme facade facetious famous farce fascinate fashion fasten fastened fatigue fault feasibility feasible february feign fertile feud fianc�e fiery filament fillet finesse fix flexible flood
 flotation fluorescent fluoride focuses forcibly forehead foreign foreman forfeit forty frou-frou fuchsia fugue fulfill funeral futile gadget gaiety gauge geisha genealogy generally genuine geyser ghastly ghetto ghost ghoul gingham giraffe glycerin gnarled gnome goatee gourd gourmet government
 governor grammar granary grandeur grandiose grateful grocery grotesque growth gruesome guarantee guard guava gubernatorial guerrilla guess guillotine guilty guinea guitar gymnast haggis hallelujah handkerchief handsome harass
 haughty hearse hearth heavy heifer height heinous heir (air heirloom heist hemorrhage heuristic hiatus hierarchy hindrance history hoax holocaust homage homogeneity horrible hors d'oeuvre hurricane hustle hydraulics hyena hygiene hygienic hymn hyperbole icicle idiosyncrasy illegal
 illegitimate illustrate imbalance immediately immense immigrate impasse impede impressed impugn inception inconsistent indict (the indiscriminate individual infamous inferable infinitesimal inflammation ingenue inheritance innocence inoculate instantiation instrument intelligence intelligible intent intercollegiate interest interfere interference interim interpret interpretation interrupt intrigue
 intuitive invocation invoke island isthmus jagged jaguar jalousie jealous jealousy jeopardize jewel jodhpurs jostle journal journey judgment kaleidoscope kayak ketchup khaki kibbutz kibosh kidnap kindergarten kiosk knife
 knowledge knowledgeable label laboratory labyrinth lachrymose lacquer laid lambaste larvae lasagna laugh league legion legionnaire legitimacy legitimate leisure lenient leopard leprechaun leukemia lewd liaison lieu lieutenant
 light lightning likable likelihood limousine lingerie liquor literature llama loathe luau luggage luscious macaque machete maelstrom maestro maintain maintenance malice malicious malign mammoth maneuver mannequin marquee
 marriage marshal marshmallow martyr masochist masquerade massacre masseur masseuse mastectomy matinee mausoleum mayonnaise meadow measure mechanical medieval mediocre meerkat memento memoirs menace mention merely meringue mesmerize messiah metallic metaphor mezzanine milieu millennium
 mimic miniature minuscule miscellaneous mischievous missile misspell misspelled mistletoe misunderstood mnemonic moccasin montage months morgue mortar mortgage mosquito motif muscle mustache myrrh mystery mystic mystique naive
 naivete narrative nasturtium nauseous necessarily necessary neighbor neither neural neutral niche night ninety nirvana nostalgia notable noticeable notorious nourishment noxious nuance nuisance nutritious nymph
 obelisk obey oblique occasion occurred occurrence occurring ocher octave odyssey of officially often ogre omelet omniscience once onomatopoeia opaque opinion opportunity oracle orangutan orchestrate orchid oregano oscillate oscilloscope
 ostrich ovation overwhelm pageant paradigm parallel paranoia paraphernalia parfait pariah parliament parquet partially participate pasteurize pastry peace pedestal peignoir penguin peninsula penitentiary people perform perhaps perimeter peripheral persistence
 persistent personnel pertain pertinent pewter pharaoh pharmaceutical pharmacist pheasant philosophical phlegm phonetic phyllo physician physicist physique picayune picnic picnicking picturesque piedmont pigeon pilgrimage pinochle piranha pirouette plagiarism plagiarize
 plague plaid plaque plateau playwright pleiotropy pneumatic pneumonia poignant poinsettia politicking pollinate pompeii porcelain portrayal position possession posthumous postpone potpourri poultry practitioner prairie precede precious precursor preferred
 prejudice preparation prerogative presence preserve prestigious primeval primitive privilege proceed proficiency proficient prohibitive proliferate prolix pronunciation proprietary proprietor protein protocol pseudonym psychology ptarmigan pterodactyl pumpkin pundit pursue
 purview pylon quadruped quadruple quantity questionnaire queue quiche quizzes quotient rabbit raccoon radius rapport raspberry rather realm receipt receive receptacle recipe reckoned recommend reconnaissance recruit recurrence reducible referred regardless
 rehearsal reindeer relevance relevant relief religion remain reminisce reminiscent renaissance rendezvous renege renown repertoire replenish requiem reservoir responsibility responsible restaurant retinue rhapsody rhetoric rhetorical rheumatic rhinoceros rhubarb rhythm ricochet
 riddled ridge ridiculous riposte rudimentary saboteur saccharin sacrilegious safety salmon salve samurai sandwich sanity sapphire satellite sauerbraten saute savvy scaffolding scenario schizophrenic school scissors scourge scythe
 seduction segue seismograph seismology seize seizure sense sensible sentinel separate sepulchral sergeant serious several severe shepherd sherbet should shoulder siege sienna sieve silhouette singly sleight sleuth solder
 soldier solemn solitaire somersault sophisticated sophomore soup souvenir sovereign spaghetti spatial special specific specter sphagnum sporadic squirrel stalactite stalk stochastic stomach strand subconscious subpoena subterfuge subtle
 succeed success successful successfully succinct succinctly succumb suet suicide superfluous supersede superseded supplement suppress surgeon surveillance susceptible suspicion sword syllable syllabus symmetric synagogue synonymous syringe
 tableau taboret talk tarpaulin technician technique tedious temperature temporary temptation tendency terrain terrible terrific their theorem theory therapeutic thereby thief thieves thirtieth thistle
 thorough thought threshold tithe tomato tomb tomorrow tongue torque tortellini tortoise toucan tournament toxin tragic trajectory transcend transition transmission trauma treasure trestle triathlon tries
 trigonometric trinket triptych triskaidekaphobia troglodyte trolley troubadour trousseau trudging true truly turquoise twelfth unanimous unduly unlabeled upholstery usability useful vaccination vacuum valet variant variation variegated
 vaudeville vegetarian vehement vehicle vengeance ventilate verbatim verbiage verification vermilion vermin vermouth versatile veterinarian vicious victim vigilante vignette vinaigrette vinegar vinyl virtue visceral visualization
 vitiate volunteer voyeuristic vulnerable weapon weasel weave wednesday weird wherever whisper whistle wholly wildebeest withdrawal women wondrous would wrestle writable writhe xylophone yacht
 yarmulke yellow yeoman zealot zephyr zinc zucchini
abduction abembryonic adaxial adduction affect afferent agammaglobulinaemic agglutination anaemia anaerobe anaesthesia angina pectoris angiogenesis antenatal anterior anticoagulant antidromic anxiolytic apnoea appendicectomy arthritis atrophy aural auriscope biceps bicuspid brachial artery brachialgia bradycardia bradylalia bronchitis bronchospasm cardiac muscle cardiomegaly cephalalgia cephalocele chondrocyte corona capitis coronal plane costal groove cyst cystalgia cystitis cytokinesis cytology dehydrogenase dialysis diarrhoea diarrhoea dipeptide diplegia disaccharide disaccharide disinfection dislocation distal dorsal dorsoventral dysgenesis dyspnoea dystrophy effect efferent effusion endoderm endogenous epicardium epidermis erythema erythrocyte eupepsia eupnoea evaginate exogenous exothermic expiration extension extraembryonic coelom extrapleural fissure flexion fossa ovalis gastrotomy glomerulus haemolysis hemianaesthesia hemicolectomy hemiplegia hepatic artery hepatoma heterotopia heterozygous histogenesis histology homeostasis homogeneous homogenous homologous horizontal hydrocele hydrocephalus hypercalcaemia hyperglycaemia hyperglycaemia hyperkalaemia hypertrophy hyperventilate hypocalcaemia hypodermic hypokalaemia hypophysis hypotension iliac fossa in vitro in vivo intercellular intercostals intercostals intracellular intraperitoneal ipsilateral isodactylism isotonic lactase lateral lateral lobectomy lobotomy lymphoma median plane sagittal mediastinum meningitis mucociliary mucosa myoblast myocardial infarction natriuresis natriuretic factor nephritis nephrology nephron neurolemma neurone neurotropic virus normocapnic normotensive oblique fissure oral cavity orthodontics orthopaedics paranasal parathyroid perinatal perineurium peritonitis phototropism pneumocephalus pneumonectomy pneumonia pneumothorax polysaccharide polysaccharide polysome posterior posteroanterior proximal quadriceps quadriplegia renal artery rhinorrhoea sagittal stasis stoma sub-lingual subcutaneous superficial superior supine suprapubic region suprarenal tachycardia tachypnoea thermoreceptor topical topography toxaemia toxin transfer transverse transverse triceps tricuspid valve tuberculosis nephrosis unilateral vasectomy vasoactive ventral colostomy contraceptive diuresis exogenous ferric ferritin ferrous compounds flexure haematocrit haemorrhage haemostasis ileostomy menorrhagia proteinuresis tracheostomy tubule ventricle ventro-medial
"Moral indignation is jealousy with a halo."
    - H. G. Wells (1866-1946)

"Glory is fleeting, but obscurity is forever."
    - Napoleon Bonaparte (1769-1821)

"The whole problem with the world is that fools and fanatics are always so certain of themselves, and wiser people so full of doubts."
    - Bertrand Russell (1872-1970)

"Victory goes to the player who makes the next-to-last mistake."
    - Chessmaster Savielly Grigorievitch Tartakower (1887-1956)

"Don't be so humble - you are not that great."
    - Golda Meir (1898-1978) to a visiting diplomat

"His ignorance is encyclopedic"
    - Abba Eban (1915-2002)

"If a man does his best, what else is there?"
    - General George S. Patton (1885-1945)

"Political correctness is tyranny with manners."
    - Charlton Heston (1924-2008)

"You can avoid reality, but you cannot avoid the consequences of avoiding reality."
    - Ayn Rand (1905-1982)

"When one person suffers from a delusion it is called insanity; when many people suffer from a delusion it is called religion."
    - Robert Pirsig (1948-)

"Sex and religion are closer to each other than either might prefer."
    - Saint Thomas More (1478-1535)

"I can write better than anybody who can write faster, and I can write faster than anybody who can write better."
    - A. J. Liebling (1904-1963)

"People demand freedom of speech to make up for the freedom of thought which they avoid."
    - Soren Aabye Kierkegaard (1813-1855)

"Give me chastity and continence, but not yet."
    - Saint Augustine (354-430)

"Not everything that can be counted counts, and not everything that counts can be counted."
    - Albert Einstein (1879-1955)

"Only two things are infinite, the universe and human stupidity, and I'm not sure about the former."
    - Albert Einstein (1879-1955)

"A lie gets halfway around the world before the truth has a chance to get its pants on."
    - Sir Winston Churchill (1874-1965)

"You may not be interested in war, but war is interested in you."
    - Leon Trotsky (1879-1940)

"I do not feel obliged to believe that the same God who has endowed us with sense, reason, and intellect has intended us to forgo their use."
    - Galileo Galilei (1564-1642)

"We are all atheists about most of the gods humanity has ever believed in. Some of us just go one god further."
    - Richard Dawkins (1941-)

"The artist is nothing without the gift, but the gift is nothing without work."
    - Emile Zola (1840-1902)

"This book fills a much-needed gap."
    - Moses Hadas (1900-1966) in a review

"The full use of your powers along lines of excellence."
    - definition of "happiness" by John F. Kennedy (1917-1963)

"I'm living so far beyond my income that we may almost be said to be living apart."
    - e e cummings (1894-1962)

"Give me a museum and I'll fill it."
    - Pablo Picasso (1881-1973)

"Assassins!"
    - Arturo Toscanini (1867-1957) to his orchestra

"I'll moider da bum."
    - Heavyweight boxer Tony Galento, when asked what he thought of William Shakespeare

"In theory, there is no difference between theory and practice. But in practice, there is."
    - Yogi Berra

"I find that the harder I work, the more luck I seem to have."
    - Thomas Jefferson (1743-1826)

"Each problem that I solved became a rule which served afterwards to solve other problems."
    - Rene Descartes (1596-1650), "Discours de la Methode"

"In the End, we will remember not the words of our enemies, but the silence of our friends."
    - Martin Luther King Jr. (1929-1968)

"Whether you think that you can, or that you can't, you are usually right."
    - Henry Ford (1863-1947)

"Do, or do not. There is no 'try'."
    - Yoda ('The Empire Strikes Back')

"The only way to get rid of a temptation is to yield to it."
    - Oscar Wilde (1854-1900)

"Don't stay in bed, unless you can make money in bed."
    - George Burns (1896-1996)

"I don't know why we are here, but I'm pretty sure that it is not in order to enjoy ourselves."
    - Ludwig Wittgenstein (1889-1951)

"There are no facts, only interpretations."
    - Friedrich Nietzsche (1844-1900)

"Nothing in the world is more dangerous than sincere ignorance and conscientious stupidity."
    - Martin Luther King Jr. (1929-1968)

"The use of COBOL cripples the mind; its teaching should, therefore, be regarded as a criminal offense."
    - Edsgar Dijkstra (1930-2002)

"C makes it easy to shoot yourself in the foot; C++ makes it harder, but when you do, it blows away your whole leg."
    - Bjarne Stroustrup

"A mathematician is a device for turning coffee into theorems."
    - Paul Erdos (1913-1996)

"Problems worthy of attack prove their worth by fighting back."
    - Paul Erdos (1913-1996)

"Happiness equals reality minus expectations."
    - Tom Magliozzi (1937-2014)

"Try to learn something about everything and everything about something."
    - Thomas Henry Huxley (1825-1895)

"Dancing is silent poetry."
    - Simonides (556-468bc)

"The only difference between me and a madman is that I'm not mad."
    - Salvador Dali (1904-1989)

"If you can't get rid of the skeleton in your closet, you'd best teach it to dance."
    - George Bernard Shaw (1856-1950)

"But at my back I always hear Time's winged chariot hurrying near."
    - Andrew Marvell (1621-1678)

"Good people do not need laws to tell them to act responsibly, while bad people will find a way around the laws."
    - Plato (427-347 B.C.)

"The power of accurate observation is frequently called cynicism by those who don't have it."
    - George Bernard Shaw (1856-1950)

"Whenever I climb I am followed by a dog called 'Ego'."
    - Friedrich Nietzsche (1844-1900)

"Everybody pities the weak; jealousy you have to earn."
    - Arnold Schwarzenegger (1947-)

"Against stupidity, the gods themselves contend in vain."
    - Friedrich von Schiller (1759-1805)

"We have art to save ourselves from the truth."
    - Friedrich Nietzsche (1844-1900)

"Never interrupt your enemy when he is making a mistake."
    - Napoleon Bonaparte (1769-1821)

"I have never killed anyone, but I have read some obituary notices with great satisfaction."
    - Clarence Darrow (1857-1938)

"I think 'Hail to the Chief' has a nice ring to it."
    - John F. Kennedy (1917-1963) when asked what is his favorite song

"I have nothing to declare except my genius."
    - Oscar Wilde (1854-1900) upon arriving at U.S. customs 1882

"Human history becomes more and more a race between education and catastrophe."
    - H. G. Wells (1866-1946)

"Talent does what it can; genius does what it must."
    - Edward George Bulwer-Lytton (1803-1873)

"The difference between 'involvement' and 'commitment' is like an eggs-and-ham breakfast: the chicken was 'involved' - the pig was 'committed'."
    - unknown

"Women might be able to fake orgasms. But men can fake a whole relationship."
    - Sharon Stone

"If you are going through hell, keep going."
    - Sir Winston Churchill (1874-1965)

"Life isn't about waiting for the storm to pass; it's about learning to dance in the rain."
    - Vivian Greene

"He who has a 'why' to live, can bear with almost any 'how'."
    - Friedrich Nietzsche (1844-1900)

"Many wealthy people are little more than janitors of their possessions."
    - Frank Lloyd Wright (1868-1959)

"I'm all in favor of keeping dangerous weapons out of the hands of fools. Let's start with typewriters."
    - Frank Lloyd Wright (1868-1959)

"Some cause happiness wherever they go; others, whenever they go."
    - Oscar Wilde (1854-1900)

"God is a comedian playing to an audience too afraid to laugh."
    - Voltaire (1694-1778)

"He is one of those people who would be enormously improved by death."
    - H. H. Munro (Saki) (1870-1916)

"I am ready to meet my Maker. Whether my Maker is prepared for the great ordeal of meeting me is another matter."
    - Sir Winston Churchill (1874-1965)

"I shall not waste my days in trying to prolong them."
    - Ian L. Fleming (1908-1964)

"If you can count your money, you don't have a billion dollars."
    - J. Paul Getty (1892-1976)

"Facts are the enemy of truth."
    - Don Quixote - "Man of La Mancha"

"When you do the common things in life in an uncommon way, you will command the attention of the world."
    - George Washington Carver (1864-1943)

"How wrong it is for a woman to expect the man to build the world she wants, rather than to create it herself."
    - Anais Nin (1903-1977)

"I have not failed. I've just found 10,000 ways that won't work."
    - Thomas Alva Edison (1847-1931)

"I begin by taking. I shall find scholars later to demonstrate my perfect right."
    - Frederick (II) the Great

"Maybe this world is another planet's Hell."
    - Aldous Huxley (1894-1963)

"Blessed is the man, who having nothing to say, abstains from giving wordy evidence of the fact."
    - George Eliot (1819-1880)

"Once you eliminate the impossible, whatever remains, no matter how improbable, must be the truth."
    - Sherlock Holmes (by Sir Arthur Conan Doyle, 1859-1930)

"Black holes are where God divided by zero."
    - Steven Wright

"I've had a wonderful time, but this wasn't it."
    - Groucho Marx (1895-1977)

"It's kind of fun to do the impossible."
    - Walt Disney (1901-1966)

"We didn't lose the game; we just ran out of time."
    - Vince Lombardi

"The optimist proclaims that we live in the best of all possible worlds, and the pessimist fears this is true."
    - James Branch Cabell

"A friendship founded on business is better than a business founded on friendship."
    - John D. Rockefeller (1874-1960)

"All are lunatics, but he who can analyze his delusion is called a philosopher."
    - Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914)

"You can only find truth with logic if you have already found truth without it."
    - Gilbert Keith Chesterton (1874-1936)

"An inconvenience is only an adventure wrongly considered; an adventure is an inconvenience rightly considered."
    - Gilbert Keith Chesterton (1874-1936)

"I have come to believe that the whole world is an enigma, a harmless enigma that is made terrible by our own mad attempt to interpret it as though it had an underlying truth."
    - Umberto Eco

"Be nice to people on your way up because you meet them on your way down."
    - Jimmy Durante

"The true measure of a man is how he treats someone who can do him absolutely no good."
    - Samuel Johnson (1709-1784)

"A people that values its privileges above its principles soon loses both."
    - Dwight D. Eisenhower (1890-1969), Inaugural Address, January 20, 1953

"The significant problems we face cannot be solved at the same level of thinking we were at when we created them."
    - Albert Einstein (1879-1955)

"Basically, I no longer work for anything but the sensation I have while working."
    - Albert Giacometti (sculptor)

"There's a limit to how many times you can read how great you are and what an inspiration you are, but I'm not there yet."
    - Randy Pausch (1960-2008)

"It is far better to grasp the Universe as it really is than to persist in delusion, however satisfying and reassuring."
    - Carl Sagan (1934-1996)

"All truth passes through three stages. First, it is ridiculed. Second, it is violently opposed. Third, it is accepted as being self-evident."
    - Arthur Schopenhauer (1788-1860)

"Many a man's reputation would not know his character if they met on the street."
    - Elbert Hubbard (1856-1915)

"There is more stupidity than hydrogen in the universe, and it has a longer shelf life."
    - Frank Zappa

"Perfection is achieved, not when there is nothing more to add, but when there is nothing left to take away."
    - Antoine de Saint Exupery

"Life is pleasant. Death is peaceful. It's the transition that's troublesome."
    - Isaac Asimov

"If you want to make an apple pie from scratch, you must first create the universe."
    - Carl Sagan (1934-1996)

"It is much more comfortable to be mad and know it, than to be sane and have one's doubts."
    - G. B. Burgin

"Once is happenstance. Twice is coincidence. Three times is enemy action."
    - Auric Goldfinger, in "Goldfinger" by Ian L. Fleming (1908-1964)

"To love oneself is the beginning of a lifelong romance"
    - Oscar Wilde (1854-1900)

"Knowledge speaks, but wisdom listens."
    - Jimi Hendrix

"A clever man commits no minor blunders."
    - Goethe (1749-1832)

"Unable to suppress love, the Church wanted at least to disinfect it, and it created marriage."
    - Charles Baudelaire (1821-1867)

"Argue for your limitations, and sure enough they're yours."
    - Richard Bach

"A witty saying proves nothing."
    - Voltaire (1694-1778)

"Sleep is an excellent way of listening to an opera."
    - James Stephens (1882-1950)

"The nice thing about being a celebrity is that if you bore people they think it's their fault."
    - Henry Kissinger (1923-)

"Education is a progressive discovery of our own ignorance."
    - Will Durant

"I have often regretted my speech, never my silence."
    - Xenocrates (396-314 B.C.)

"It was the experience of mystery -- even if mixed with fear -- that engendered religion."
    - Albert Einstein (1879-1955)

"If everything seems under control, you're just not going fast enough."
    - Mario Andretti

"I do not consider it an insult, but rather a compliment to be called an agnostic. I do not pretend to know where many ignorant men are sure -- that is all that agnosticism means."
    - Clarence Darrow, Scopes trial, 1925.

"Obstacles are those frightful things you see when you take your eyes off your goal."
    - Henry Ford (1863-1947)

"I'll sleep when I'm dead."
    - Warren Zevon (1947-2003)

"There are people in the world so hungry, that God cannot appear to them except in the form of bread."
    - Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)

"When you gaze long into the abyss, the abyss also gazes into you."
    - Friedrich Nietzsche (1844-1900)

"The instinct of nearly all societies is to lock up anybody who is truly free. First, society begins by trying to beat you up. If this fails, they try to poison you. If this fails too, they finish by loading honors on your head."
    - Jean Cocteau (1889-1963)

"Everyone is a genius at least once a year; a real genius has his original ideas closer together."
    - Georg Lichtenberg (1742-1799)

"Success usually comes to those who are too busy to be looking for it"
    - Henry David Thoreau (1817-1862)

"While we are postponing, life speeds by."
    - Seneca (3BC - 65AD)

"Where are we going, and why am I in this handbasket?"
    - Bumper Sticker

"God, please save me from your followers!"
    - Bumper Sticker

"Fill what's empty, empty what's full, and scratch where it itches."
    - the Duchess of Windsor, when asked what is the secret of a long and happy life

"First they ignore you, then they laugh at you, then they fight you, then you win."
    - Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948)

"Luck is the residue of design."
    - Branch Rickey - former owner of the Brooklyn Dodger Baseball Team

"Tragedy is when I cut my finger. Comedy is when you walk into an open sewer and die."
    - Mel Brooks

"Most people would sooner die than think; in fact, they do so."
    - Bertrand Russell (1872-1970)

"Wit is educated insolence."
    - Aristotle (384-322 B.C.)

"My advice to you is get married: if you find a good wife you'll be happy; if not, you'll become a philosopher."
    - Socrates (470-399 B.C.)

"Advice is what we ask for when we already know the answer but wish we didn't"
    - Erica Jong (1942-)

"Show me a woman who doesn't feel guilty and I'll show you a man."
    - Erica Jong (1942-)

"I've learned that people will forget what you said, people will forget what you did, but people will never forget how you made them feel."
    - Maya Angelou (1928-)

"Egotist: a person more interested in himself than in me."
    - Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914)

"A narcissist is someone better looking than you are."
    - Gore Vidal

"Wise men make proverbs, but fools repeat them."
    - Samuel Palmer (1805-80)

"It has become appallingly obvious that our technology has exceeded our humanity."
    - Albert Einstein (1879-1955)

"The secret of success is to know something nobody else knows."
    - Aristotle Onassis (1906-1975)

"Sometimes when reading Goethe I have the paralyzing suspicion that he is trying to be funny."
    - Guy Davenport

"When you have to kill a man, it costs nothing to be polite."
    - Sir Winston Churchill (1874-1965)

"Any man who is under 30, and is not a liberal, has no heart; and any man who is over 30, and is not a conservative, has no brains."
    - Sir Winston Churchill (1874-1965)

"The opposite of a correct statement is a false statement. The opposite of a profound truth may well be another profound truth."
    - Niels Bohr (1885-1962)

"We all agree that your theory is crazy, but is it crazy enough?"
    - Niels Bohr (1885-1962)

"When I am working on a problem I never think about beauty. I only think about how to solve the problem. But when I have finished, if the solution is not beautiful, I know it is wrong."
    - Buckminster Fuller (1895-1983)

"In science one tries to tell people, in such a way as to be understood by everyone, something that no one ever knew before. But in poetry, it's the exact opposite."
    - Paul Dirac (1902-1984)

"I would have made a good Pope."
    - Richard M. Nixon (1913-1994)

"In any contest between power and patience, bet on patience."
    - W.B. Prescott

"Anyone who considers arithmetical methods of producing random digits is, of course, in a state of sin."
    - John von Neumann (1903-1957)

"The mistakes are all waiting to be made."
    - chessmaster Savielly Grigorievitch Tartakower (1887-1956) on the game's opening position

"It is unbecoming for young men to utter maxims."
    - Aristotle (384-322 B.C.)

"Grove giveth and Gates taketh away."
    - Bob Metcalfe (inventor of Ethernet) on the trend of hardware speedups not being able to keep up with software demands

"Reality is merely an illusion, albeit a very persistent one."
    - Albert Einstein (1879-1955)

"One of the symptoms of an approaching nervous breakdown is the belief that one's work is terribly important."
    - Bertrand Russell (1872-1970)

"A little inaccuracy sometimes saves a ton of explanation."
    - H. H. Munro (Saki) (1870-1916)

"There are two ways of constructing a software design; one way is to make it so simple that there are obviously no deficiencies, and the other way is to make it so complicated that there are no obvious deficiencies. The first method is far more difficult."
    - C. A. R. Hoare

"Make everything as simple as possible, but not simpler."
    - Albert Einstein (1879-1955)

"What do you take me for, an idiot?"
    - General Charles de Gaulle (1890-1970), when a journalist asked him if he was happy

"I heard someone tried the monkeys-on-typewriters bit trying for the plays of W. Shakespeare, but all they got was the collected works of Francis Bacon."
    - Bill Hirst

"Three o'clock is always too late or too early for anything you want to do."
    - Jean-Paul Sartre (1905-1980)

"A doctor can bury his mistakes but an architect can only advise his clients to plant vines."
    - Frank Lloyd Wright (1868-1959)

"It is dangerous to be sincere unless you are also stupid."
    - George Bernard Shaw (1856-1950)

"If you haven't got anything nice to say about anybody, come sit next to me."
    - Alice Roosevelt Longworth (1884-1980)

"A man can't be too careful in the choice of his enemies."
    - Oscar Wilde (1854-1900)

"Forgive your enemies, but never forget their names."
    - John F. Kennedy (1917-1963)

"Logic is in the eye of the logician."
    - Gloria Steinem

"No one can earn a million dollars honestly."
    - William Jennings Bryan (1860-1925)

"Everything has been figured out, except how to live."
    - Jean-Paul Sartre (1905-1980)

"Well-timed silence hath more eloquence than speech."
    - Martin Fraquhar Tupper

"Thank you for sending me a copy of your book - I'll waste no time reading it."
    - Moses Hadas (1900-1966)

"From the moment I picked your book up until I laid it down I was convulsed with laughter. Some day I intend reading it."
    - Groucho Marx (1895-1977)

"It is better to have a permanent income than to be fascinating."
    - Oscar Wilde (1854-1900)

"When ideas fail, words come in very handy."
    - Goethe (1749-1832)

"In the end, everything is a gag."
    - Charlie Chaplin (1889-1977)

"The nice thing about egotists is that they don't talk about other people."
    - Lucille S. Harper

"You got to be careful if you don't know where you're going, because you might not get there."
    - Yogi Berra

"I love Mickey Mouse more than any woman I have ever known."
    - Walt Disney (1901-1966)

"He who hesitates is a damned fool."
    - Mae West (1892-1980)

"Good teaching is one-fourth preparation and three-fourths theater."
    - Gail Godwin

"University politics are vicious precisely because the stakes are so small."
    - Henry Kissinger (1923-)

"The graveyards are full of indispensable men."
    - Charles de Gaulle (1890-1970)

"You can pretend to be serious; you can't pretend to be witty."
    - Sacha Guitry (1885-1957)

"Behind every great fortune there is a crime."
    - Honore de Balzac (1799-1850)

"If women didn't exist, all the money in the world would have no meaning."
    - Aristotle Onassis (1906-1975)

"I am not young enough to know everything."
    - Oscar Wilde (1854-1900)

"Bigamy is having one wife too many. Monogamy is the same."
    - Oscar Wilde (1854-1900)

"The object of war is not to die for your country but to make the other bastard die for his."
    - General George Patton (1885-1945)

"Sometimes a scream is better than a thesis."
    - Ralph Waldo Emerson (1803-1882)

"There is no sincerer love than the love of food."
    - George Bernard Shaw (1856-1950)

"I don't even butter my bread; I consider that cooking."
    - Katherine Cebrian

"I have an existential map; it has 'you are here' written all over it."
    - Steven Wright

"Mr. Wagner has beautiful moments but bad quarters of an hour."
    - Gioacchino Rossini (1792-1868)

"Manuscript: something submitted in haste and returned at leisure."
    - Oliver Herford (1863-1935)

"I have read your book and much like it."
    - Moses Hadas (1900-1966)

"The covers of this book are too far apart."
    - Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914)

"Everywhere I go I'm asked if I think the university stifles writers. My opinion is that they don't stifle enough of them."
    - Flannery O'Connor (1925-1964)

"Too many pieces of music finish too long after the end."
    - Igor Stravinsky (1882-1971)

"Anything that is too stupid to be spoken is sung."
    - Voltaire (1694-1778)

"When choosing between two evils, I always like to try the one I've never tried before."
    - Mae West (1892-1980)

"I don't know anything about music. In my line you don't have to."
    - Elvis Presley (1935-1977)

"No Sane man will dance."
    - Cicero (106-43 B.C.)

"Hell is a half-filled auditorium."
    - Robert Frost (1874-1963)

"Show me a sane man and I will cure him for you."
    - Carl Gustav Jung (1875-1961)

"Vote early and vote often."
    - Al Capone (1899-1947)

"If I were two-faced, would I be wearing this one?"
    - Abraham Lincoln (1809-1865)

"Few things are harder to put up with than a good example."
    - Mark Twain (1835-1910)

"Hell is other people."
    - Jean-Paul Sartre (1905-1980)

"Now I am become death, the destroyer of worlds."
    - Robert J. Oppenheimer (1904-1967) (citing from the Bhagavad Gita, after witnessing the world's first nuclear explosion)

"Happiness is good health and a bad memory."
    - Ingrid Bergman (1917-1982)

"Friends may come and go, but enemies accumulate."
    - Thomas Jones

"You can get more with a kind word and a gun than you can with a kind word alone."
    - Al Capone (1899-1947)

"The gods too are fond of a joke."
    - Aristotle (384-322 B.C.)

"Distrust any enterprise that requires new clothes."
    - Henry David Thoreau (1817-1862)

"The difference between pornography and erotica is lighting."
    - Gloria Leonard

"It is time I stepped aside for a less experienced and less able man."
    - Professor Scott Elledge on his retirement from Cornell

"Every day I get up and look through the Forbes list of the richest people in America. If I'm not there, I go to work."
    - Robert Orben

"The cynics are right nine times out of ten."
    - Henry Louis Mencken (1880-1956)

"There are some experiences in life which should not be demanded twice from any man, and one of them is listening to the Brahms Requiem."
    - George Bernard Shaw (1856-1950)

"And I looked, and behold a pale horse: and his name that sat on him was Death, and Hell followed with him."
    - Revelation 6:8

"Attention to health is life's greatest hindrance."
    - Plato (427-347 B.C.)

"Plato was a bore."
    - Friedrich Nietzsche (1844-1900)

"Nietzsche was stupid and abnormal."
    - Leo Tolstoy (1828-1910)

"I'm not going to get into the ring with Tolstoy."
    - Ernest Hemingway (1899-1961)

"Hemingway was a jerk."
    - Harold Robbins

"Men are not disturbed by things, but the view they take of things."
    - Epictetus (55-135 A.D.)

"What about things like bullets?"
    - Herb Kimmel, Behavioralist, Professor of Psychology, upon hearing the above quote (1981)

"How can I lose to such an idiot?"
    - A shout from chessmaster Aaron Nimzovich (1886-1935)

"Not only is there no God, but try finding a plumber on Sunday."
    - Woody Allen (1935-)

"I don't feel good."
    - The last words of Luther Burbank (1849-1926)

"Nothing is wrong with California that a rise in the ocean level wouldn't cure."
    - Ross MacDonald (1915-1983)

"Men have become the tools of their tools."
    - Henry David Thoreau (1817-1862)

"I have never let my schooling interfere with my education."
    - Mark Twain (1835-1910)

"It is now possible for a flight attendant to get a pilot pregnant."
    - Richard J. Ferris, president of United Airlines

"I never miss a chance to have sex or appear on television."
    - Gore Vidal

"I don't want to achieve immortality through my work; I want to achieve immortality through not dying."
    - Woody Allen (1935-)

"Men and nations behave wisely once they have exhausted all the other alternatives."
    - Abba Eban (1915-2002)

"A consensus means that everyone agrees to say collectively what no one believes individually."
    - Abba Eban (1915-2002)

"To sit alone with my conscience will be judgment enough for me."
    - Charles William Stubbs

"Sanity is a madness put to good uses."
    - George Santayana (1863-1952)

"Imitation is the sincerest form of television."
    - Fred Allen (1894-1956)

"Always do right- this will gratify some and astonish the rest."
    - Mark Twain (1835-1910)

"In America, anybody can be president. That's one of the risks you take."
    - Adlai Stevenson (1900-1965)

"Copy from one, it's plagiarism; copy from two, it's research."
    - Wilson Mizner (1876-1933)

"Why don't you write books people can read?"
    - Nora Joyce to her husband James (1882-1941)

"Some editors are failed writers, but so are most writers."
    - T. S. Eliot (1888-1965)

"Criticism is prejudice made plausible."
    - Henry Louis Mencken (1880-1956)

"It is better to be quotable than to be honest."
    - Tom Stoppard

"Being on the tightrope is living; everything else is waiting."
    - Karl Wallenda

"Opportunities multiply as they are seized."
    - Sun Tzu

"A scholar who cherishes the love of comfort is not fit to be deemed a scholar."
    - Lao-Tzu (570?-490? BC)

" The best way to predict the future is to invent it."
    - Alan Kay

"Never mistake motion for action."
    - Ernest Hemingway (1899-1961)

"I contend that we are both atheists. I just believe in one fewer god than you do. When you understand why you dismiss all the other possible gods, you will understand why I dismiss yours."
    - Sir Stephen Henry Roberts (1901-1971)

"Hell is paved with good samaritans."
    - William M. Holden

"The longer I live the more I see that I am never wrong about anything, and that all the pains that I have so humbly taken to verify my notions have only wasted my time."
    - George Bernard Shaw (1856-1950)

"Silence is argument carried out by other means."
    - Ernesto"Che"Guevara (1928-1967)

"Well done is better than well said."
    - Benjamin Franklin (1706-1790)

"The average person thinks he isn't."
    - Father Larry Lorenzoni

"Heav'n hath no rage like love to hatred turn'd, Nor Hell a fury, like a woman scorn'd."
    - William Congreve (1670-1729)

"A husband is what is left of the lover after the nerve has been extracted."
    - Helen Rowland (1876-1950)

"Learning is what most adults will do for a living in the 21st century."
    - Lewis Perelman

"Dogma is the sacrifice of wisdom to consistency."
    - Lewis Perelman

"Sometimes it is not enough that we do our best; we must do what is required."
    - Sir Winston Churchill (1874-1965)

"The man who goes alone can start today; but he who travels with another must wait till that other is ready."
    - Henry David Thoreau (1817-1862)

"There is a country in Europe where multiple-choice tests are illegal."
    - Sigfried Hulzer

"Ask her to wait a moment - I am almost done."
    - Carl Friedrich Gauss (1777-1855), while working, when informed that his wife is dying

"A pessimist sees the difficulty in every opportunity; an optimist sees the opportunity in every difficulty."
    - Sir Winston Churchill (1874-1965)

"I think there is a world market for maybe five computers."
    - Thomas Watson (1874-1956), Chairman of IBM, 1943

"I think it would be a good idea."
    - Mahatma Gandhi (1869-1948), when asked what he thought of Western civilization

"The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good men to do nothing."
    - Edmund Burke (1729-1797)

"I'm not a member of any organized political party, I'm a Democrat!"
    - Will Rogers (1879-1935)

"If stupidity got us into this mess, then why can't it get us out?" "
    - Will Rogers (1879-1935)

"The backbone of surprise is fusing speed with secrecy."
    - Von Clausewitz (1780-1831)

"Democracy does not guarantee equality of conditions - it only guarantees equality of opportunity."
    - Irving Kristol

"There is no reason anyone would want a computer in their home."
    - Ken Olson, president, chairman and founder of Digital Equipment Corp., 1977

"The concept is interesting and well-formed, but in order to earn better than a 'C', the idea must be feasible."
    - A Yale University management professor in response to student Fred Smith's paper proposing reliable overnight delivery service (Smith went on to found Federal Express Corp.)

"Who the hell wants to hear actors talk?"
    - H. M. Warner (1881-1958), founder of Warner Brothers, in 1927

"We don't like their sound, and guitar music is on the way out."
    - Decca Recording Co. rejecting the Beatles, 1962

"Everything that can be invented has been invented."
    - Charles H. Duell, Commissioner, U.S. Office of Patents, 1899

"Denial ain't just a river in Egypt."
    - Mark Twain (1835-1910)

"A pint of sweat saves a gallon of blood."
    - General George S. Patton (1885-1945)

"After I'm dead I'd rather have people ask why I have no monument than why I have one."
    - Cato the Elder (234-149 BC, AKA Marcus Porcius Cato)

"He can compress the most words into the smallest idea of any man I know."
    - Abraham Lincoln (1809-1865)

"Don't let it end like this. Tell them I said something."
    - last words of Pancho Villa (1877-1923)

"The right to swing my fist ends where the other man's nose begins."
    - Oliver Wendell Holmes (1841-1935)

"The difference between fiction and reality? Fiction has to make sense."
    - Tom Clancy

"It's not the size of the dog in the fight, it's the size of the fight in the dog."
    - Mark Twain (1835-1910)

"It is better to be feared than loved, if you cannot be both."
    - Niccolo Machiavelli (1469-1527), "The Prince"

"Whatever is begun in anger ends in shame."
    - Benjamin Franklin (1706-1790)

"The President has kept all of the promises he intended to keep."
    - Clinton aide George Stephanopolous speaking on Larry King Live

"We're going to turn this team around 360 degrees."
    - Jason Kidd, upon his drafting to the Dallas Mavericks

"Half this game is ninety percent mental."
    - Yogi Berra

"There is only one nature - the division into science and engineering is a human imposition, not a natural one. Indeed, the division is a human failure; it reflects our limited capacity to comprehend the whole."
    - Bill Wulf

"There's many a bestseller that could have been prevented by a good teacher."
    - Flannery O'Connor (1925-1964)

"He has all the virtues I dislike and none of the vices I admire."
    - Sir Winston Churchill (1874-1965)

"Write drunk; edit sober."
    - Ernest Hemingway (1899-1961)

"I criticize by creation - not by finding fault."
    - Cicero (106-43 B.C.)

"Love is friendship set on fire."
    - Jeremy Taylor

"God gave men both a penis and a brain, but unfortunately not enough blood supply to run both at the same time."
    - Robin Williams, commenting on the Clinton/Lewinsky affair

"My occupation now, I suppose, is jail inmate."
    - Unibomber Theodore Kaczynski, when asked in court what his current profession was

"Woman was God's second mistake."
    - Friedrich Nietzsche (1844-1900)

"This isn't right, this isn't even wrong."
    - Wolfgang Pauli (1900-1958), upon reading a young physicist's paper

"For centuries, theologians have been explaining the unknowable in terms of the-not-worth-knowing."
    - Henry Louis Mencken (1880-1956)

"Pray, v.: To ask that the laws of the universe be annulled on behalf of a single petitioner confessedly unworthy."
    - Ambrose Bierce (1842-1914)

"Every normal man must be tempted at times to spit upon his hands, hoist the black flag, and begin slitting throats."
    - Henry Louis Mencken (1880-1956)

"Now, now my good man, this is no time for making enemies."
    - Voltaire (1694-1778) on his deathbed in response to a priest asking that he renounce Satan.

"Fill the unforgiving minute with sixty seconds worth of distance run."
    - Rudyard Kipling (1865-1936)

"He would make a lovely corpse."
    - Charles Dickens (1812-1870)

"I've just learned about his illness. Let's hope it's nothing trivial."
    - Irvin S. Cobb

"I worship the quicksand he walks in."
    - Art Buchwald

"Wagner's music is better than it sounds."
    - Mark Twain (1835-1910)

"A poem is never finished, only abandoned."
    - Paul Valery (1871-1945)

"We are not retreating - we are advancing in another Direction."
    - General Douglas MacArthur (1880-1964)

"With or without religion, good people can behave well and bad people can do evil; but for good people to do evil, that takes religion."
    - Steven Weinberg (1933-)

"If you were plowing a field, which would you rather use? Two strong oxen or 1024 chickens?"
    - Seymour Cray (1925-1996), father of supercomputing

"#3 pencils and quadrille pads."
    - Seymoure Cray (1925-1996) when asked what CAD tools he used to design the Cray I supercomputer; he also recommended using the back side of the pages so that the grid lines were not so dominant.

"Interesting - I use a Mac to help me design the next Cray."
    - Seymoure Cray (1925-1996) when he was told that Apple Inc. had recently bought a Cray supercomputer to help them design the next Mac.

"Your Highness, I have no need of this hypothesis."
    - Pierre Laplace (1749-1827), to Napoleon on why his works on celestial mechanics make no mention of God.

"I choose a block of marble and chop off whatever I don't need."
    - Francois-Auguste Rodin (1840-1917), when asked how he managed to make his remarkable statues

"The man who does not read good books has no advantage over the man who cannot read them."
    - Mark Twain (1835-1910)

"The truth is more important than the facts."
    - Frank Lloyd Wright (1868-1959)

"Research is what I'm doing when I don't know what I'm doing."
    - Wernher Von Braun (1912-1977)

"There are only two tragedies in life: one is not getting what one wants, and the other is getting it."
    - Oscar Wilde (1854-1900)

"There are only two ways to live your life. One is as though nothing is a miracle. The other is as though everything is a miracle."
    - Albert Einstein (1879-1955)

1. The Way that can be followed is not the eternal Way

The Way that can be followed is not the eternal Way.

The name that can be named is not the eternal name.

The nameless is the origin of heaven and earth

While naming is the origin of the myriad things.

Therefore, always desireless, you see the mystery

Ever desiring, you see the manifestations.

These two are the same—

When they appear they are named differently.

 

This sameness is the mystery,

Mystery within mystery;

 

The door to all marvels.


2. All in the world recognize the beautiful as beautiful

All in the world recognize the beautiful as beautiful.

Herein lies ugliness.

All recognize the good as good.

Herein lies evil.

 

Therefore

Presence and absence produce each other.

Difficulty and ease bring about each other.

Long and short delimit each other.

High and low rest on each other.

Sound and voice harmonize each other.

Front and back follow each other.

 

Therefore the sage abides in the condition of wu-wei (unattached action).

And carries out the wordless teaching.

Here, the myriad things are made, yet not separated.

 

Therefore the sage produces without possessing,

Acts without expectations

And accomplishes without abiding in her accomplishments.

 

It is precisely because she does not abide in them

That they never leave her.

 


3. If you do not adulate the worthy...

If you do not adulate the worthy, you will make others non-contentious.

If you do not value rare treasures, you will stop others from stealing.

If people do not see desirables, they will not be agitated.

 

Therefore, when the sage governs,

He clears people's minds,

Fills their bellies,

Weakens their ambition and

Strengthens their bones.

 

If the people are kept without cleverness and desire

It will make the intellectuals not dare to meddle.

 

Acting without contrivance, there is no lack of manageability.

4. The Way is so vast...

The Way is so vast that when you use it, something is always left.

How deep it is!

It seems to be the ancestor of the myriad things.

It blunts sharpness

Untangles knots

Softens the glare

Unifies with the mundane.

It is so full!

It seems to have remainder.

 

It is the child of I-don't-know-who.

And prior to the primeval Lord-on-high.


5. Heaven and Earth are not humane...

Heaven and Earth are not humane,

And regard the people as straw dogs.

The sage is not humane,

And regards all things as straw dogs.

The space between Heaven and Earth is just like a bellows:

Empty it, it is not exhausted.

Squeeze it and more comes out.

 

Investigating it with a lot of talk

Is not like holding to the center.


6. The valley spirit never dies...

The valley spirit never dies.

It is called "the mysterious female."

The opening of the mysterious female

Is called "the root of Heaven and Earth."

Continuous, seeming to remain.

 

Use it without exertion.


7. Heaven and Earth last forever...

Heaven and Earth last forever.

The reason that Heaven and Earth are able to last forever

Is because they do not give birth to themselves.

Therefore, they are always alive.

Hence, the sage puts herself last and is first.

She is outside herself and therefore her self lasts.

 

Is it not through her selflessness

That she is able to perfect herself?


8. The highest goodness is like water...

The highest goodness is like water.

Water easily benefits all things without struggle.

Yet it abides in places that men hate.

Therefore it is like the Way.

 

For dwelling, the Earth is good.

For the mind, depth is good.

The goodness of giving is in the timing.

The goodness of speech is in honesty.

In government, self-mastery is good.

In handling affairs, ability is good.

 

If you do not wrangle, you will not be blamed.


9. To hold until full is not as good as stopping...

To hold until full is not as good as stopping.

An oversharpened sword cannot last long.

A room filled with gold and jewels cannot be protected.

Boasting of wealth and virtue brings your demise.

After finishing the work, withdraw.

 

This is the Way of Heaven.


10. Pacifying the agitated material soul...

Pacifying the agitated material soul and holding to oneness:

Are you able to avoid separation?

Focusing your energy on the release of tension:

Can you be like an infant?

In purifying your insight:

Can you un-obstruct it?

Loving the people and ruling the state:

Can you avoid over-manipulation?

In opening and closing the gate of Heaven:

Can you be the female?

In illuminating the whole universe:

Can you be free of rationality?

 

Give birth to it and nourish it.

Produce it but don't possess it.

Act without expectation.

Excel, but don't take charge.

 

This is called Mysterious Virtue.


11. Thirty spokes join together in the hub...

Thirty spokes join together in the hub.

It is because of what is not there that the cart is useful.

Clay is formed into a vessel.

It is because of its emptiness that the vessel is useful.

Cut doors and windows to make a room.

It is because of its emptiness that the room is useful.

Therefore, what is present is used for profit.

 

But it is in absence that there is usefulness.


12. The five colors blind our eyes...

The five colors blind our eyes.

The five tones deafen our ears.

The five flavors confuse our taste.

Racing and hunting madden our minds.

Possessing rare treasures brings about harmful behavior.

Therefore the sage acts from his gut, and not from his eyes.

 

He lets go of that and chooses this.


13. Accept humiliation as a surprise...

Accept humiliation as a surprise.

Value great misfortune as your own self.

 

What do I mean by "Accept humiliation as a surprise"?

When you are humble

Attainment is a surprise

And so is loss.

That's why I say, "Accept humiliation as a surprise."

 

What do I mean by "Value great misfortune as your own self"?

 

If I have no self, how could I experience misfortune?

 

Therefore, if you dedicate your life for the benefit of the world,

You can rely on the world.

If you love dedicating yourself in this way,

You can be entrusted with the world.


14. Look for it, it cannot be seen...

Look for it, it cannot be seen.

It is called the distant.

Listen for it, it cannot be heard.

It is called the rare.

Reach for it, it cannot be gotten.

It is called the subtle.

These three ultimately cannot be fathomed.

Therefore they join to become one.

 

Its top is not bright;

Its bottom is not dark;

Existing continuously, it cannot be named and it returns to no-thingness.

 

Thus, it is called the formless form,

The image of no-thing.

This is called the most obscure.

 

Go to meet it, you cannot see its face.

Follow it, you cannot see its back.

 

By holding to the ancient Way

You can manage present existence

And know the primordial beginning.

 

This is called the very beginning thread of the Way.


15. The ancient masters of the Way...

The ancient masters of the Way

Had subtle marvelous mystic penetration

A depth that cannot be known.

It is exactly because that they are unknowable

That we are forced to pay attention to their appearance.

Hesitant, like one crossing an ice-covered river.

Ready, like one afraid of his neighbors on all sides.

Dignified, like a guest.

Loose, like ice about to melt.

Straightforward, like an uncarved block of wood.

Open, like a valley.

Obscure, like muddy water.

 

Who can be muddled, and use clarity to gradually become lucid?

Who can be calm, and use constant application for eventual success?

 

The one who holds to this path does not crave fulfillment.

Precisely because he does not crave fulfillment

He can be shattered

And do without quick restitution.


16. Effect vacuity to the extreme...

Effect vacuity to the extreme.

Keep stillness whole.

Myriad things act in concert.

I therefore watch their return.

All things flourish and each returns to its root.

 

Returning to the root is called quietude.

Quietude is called returning to life.

Return to life is called constant.

Knowing this constant is called illumination.

Acting arbitrarily without knowing the constant is harmful.

Knowing the constant is receptivity, which is impartial.

 

Impartiality is kingship.

Kingship is Heaven.

Heaven is the Way

the Way is eternal.

 

Though you lose the body, you do not die.


17. From great antiquity forth they have known and possessed it...

From great antiquity forth they have known and possessed it.

Those of the next level loved and praised it.

The next were in awe of it.

And the next despised it.

 

If you lack sincerity no one will believe you.

 

How careful she is with her precious words!

When her work is complete and her job is finished,

Everybody says: "We did it!"


18. When the great Way perishes...

When the great Way perishes

There is humaneness and justice.

When intelligence is manifest

There is great deception.

When the six relationships are not in harmony

There is filial piety and compassion.

When the country is in chaos

Loyal ministers appear.


19. Get rid of "holiness"...

Get rid of "holiness"and abandon "wisdom"and the people will benefit a
hundredfold.

 

Get rid of "humaneness"and abandon "rightness"and the people will return
to filial piety and compassion.

 

Get rid of cleverness and abandon profit, and thieves and gangsters will
not exist.

 

Since the above three are merely words, they are not sufficient.

Therefore there must be something to include them all.

 

See the origin and keep the non-differentiated state.

Lessen selfishness and decrease desire.


20. Get rid of "learning"...

Get rid of "learning"and there will be no anxiety.

How much difference is there between "yes"and "no"?

How far removed from each other are "good"and "evil"?

Yet what the people are in awe of cannot be disregarded.

 

I am scattered, never having been in a comfortable center.

All the people enjoy themselves, as if they are at the festival of the
great sacrifice,

Or climbing the Spring Platform.

I alone remain, not yet having shown myself.

Like an infant who has not yet laughed.

Weary, like one despairing of no home to return to.

 

All the people enjoy extra

While I have left everything behind.

I am ignorant of the minds of others.

So dull!

While average people are clear and bright, I alone am dull and dim.

Average people know everything.

To me alone all seems covered.

So flat!

Like the ocean.

Blowing around!

It seems there is no place to rest.

Everybody has a goal in mind.

I alone am as ignorant as a bumpkin.

I alone differ from people.

 

I enjoy being nourished by the mother.


21. The form of great virtue...

The form of great virtue is something that only the Way can follow.

The Way as a "thing"is only vague and obscure.

How obscure! How vague! In it there is form.

How vague! How obscure! In it are things.

How deep! How dark! In it there is an essence.

 

The essence is so real—therein is belief.

 

From the present to antiquity, its name has never left it, so we can
examine all origins.

How do I know the form of all origins?

 

By this.


22. The imperfect is completed...

The imperfect is completed.

The crooked is straightened.

The empty is filled.

The old is renewed.

With few there is attainment.

With much there is confusion.

Therefore the sage grasps the one and becomes the model for all.

 

She does not show herself, and therefore is apparent.

She does not affirm herself, and therefore is acknowledged.

She does not boast and therefore has merit.

She does not strive and is therefore successful.

It is exactly because she does not contend, that nobody can contend with
her.

 

How could the ancient saying, "The imperfect is completed" be regarded
as empty talk?

 

Believe in the complete and return to it.


23. To speak little is natural...

To speak little is natural.

Therefore a gale does not blow a whole morning

Nor does a downpour last a whole day.

Who does these things? Heaven and Earth.

If even Heaven and Earth cannot force perfect continuity

How can people expect to?

 

Therefore there is such a thing as aligning one's actions with the Way.

If you accord with the Way you become one with it.

If you accord with virtue you become one with it.

If you accord with loss you become one with it.

 

The Way accepts this accordance gladly.

Virtue accepts this accordance gladly.

Loss also accepts accordance gladly.

 

If you are untrustworthy, people will not trust you.


24. Standing on tiptoe, you are unsteady...

Standing on tiptoe, you are unsteady.

Straddle-legged, you cannot go.

If you show yourself, you will not be seen.

If you affirm yourself, you will not shine.

If you boast, you will have no merit.

If you promote yourself, you will have no success.

 

Those who abide in the Way call these

 

Leftover food and wasted action

And all things dislike them.

 

Therefore the person of the Way does not act like this.


25. There is something that is perfect in its disorder...

There is something that is perfect in its disorder

Which is born before Heaven and Earth.

 

So silent and desolate! It establishes itself without renewal.

Functions universally without lapse.

We can regard it as the Mother of Everything.

 

I don't know its name.

 

Hence, when forced to name it, I call it "Way."

When forced to categorize it, I call it "great."

 

Greatness entails transcendence.

Transcendence entails going-far.

Going-far entails return.

 

Hence, the Way is great, Heaven is great, the Earth is great

And the human is also great.

 

Within our realm there are four greatnesses and the human being is one
of them.

 

Human beings follow the Earth.

Earth follows Heaven

Heaven follows the Way

The Way follows things as they are.


26. Heaviness is the root of lightness...

Heaviness is the root of lightness.

Composure is the ruler of instability.

Therefore the sage travels all day

Without putting down his heavy load.

Though there may be spectacles to see

He easily passes them by.

 

This being so

How could the ruler of a large state

Be so concerned with himself as to ignore the people?

 

If you take them lightly you will lose your roots.

If you are unstable, you will lose your rulership.


27. A good traveler leaves no tracks...

A good traveler leaves no tracks.

Good speech lacks faultfinding.

A good counter needs no calculator.

A well-shut door will stay closed without a latch.

Skillful fastening will stay tied without knots.

 

It is in this manner that the sage is always skillful in elevating people.

Therefore she does not discard anybody.

 

She is always skillful in helping things

Therefore she does not discard anything.

This is called "the actualization of her luminosity."

 

Hence, the good are the teachers of the not-so-good.

And the not-so-good are the charges of the good.

 

Not valuing your teacher or not loving your students:

Even if you are smart, you are gravely in error.

 

This is called Essential Subtlety.

28. Know the Masculine, cleave to the Feminine...

Know the Masculine, cleave to the Feminine

Be the valley for everyone.

Being the valley for everyone

You are always in virtue without lapse

And you return to infancy.

 

Know the White, cleave to the Black

Be a model for everyone.

Being the model for everyone

You are always in virtue and free from error

You return to limitlessness.

Know Glory but cleave to Humiliation

Be the valley for everyone.

When your constancy in virtue is complete

You return to the state of the "uncarved block."

 

The block is cut into implements.

If the sage uses it, he ends up being an official.

 

Therefore the great tailor does not cut.

29. If you want to grab the world and run it...

If you want to grab the world and run it

I can see that you will not succeed.

The world is a spiritual vessel, which can't be controlled.

 

Manipulators mess things up.

Grabbers lose it. Therefore:

 

Sometimes you lead

Sometimes you follow

Sometimes you are stifled

Sometimes you breathe easy

Sometimes you are strong

Sometimes you are weak

Sometimes you destroy

And sometimes you are destroyed.

 

Hence, the sage shuns excess

Shuns grandiosity

Shuns arrogance.


30. If you used the Way as a principle for ruling...

If you used the Way as a principle for ruling

You would not dominate the people by military force.

 

What goes around comes around.

 

Where the general has camped

Thorns and brambles grow.

In the wake of a great army

Come years of famine.

If you know what you are doing

You will do what is necessary and stop there, not daring to use force.

 

Accomplish but don't boast

Accomplish without show

Accomplish without arrogance

Accomplish without grabbing

Accomplish without forcing.

 

When things flourish they decline.

 

This is called non-Way

The non-Way is short-lived.


31. Sharp weapons are inauspicious instruments...

Sharp weapons are inauspicious instruments.

Everyone hates them.

Therefore the man of the Way is not comfortable with them.

 

In the domestic affairs of the gentleman

The left is the position of honor.

In military affairs the right is the position of honor.

Since weapons are inauspicious instruments, they are not the instruments
of the gentleman

So he uses them without enjoyment

And values plainness.

 

Victory is never sweet.

 

Those for whom victory is sweet

Are those who enjoy killing.

If you enjoy killing, you cannot gain the trust of the people.

 

On auspicious occasions the place of honor is on the left.

On inauspicious occasions the place of honor is on the right.

The lieutenant commander stands on the left.

The commander-in-chief stands on the right.

And they speak, using the funerary rites to bury them.

 

The common people, from whom all the dead have come

Weep in lamentation.

The victors bury them with funerary rites.


32. The Way is always nameless...

The Way is always nameless.

And even though a sapling might be small

No one can make it be his subject.

If rulers could embody this principle

The myriad things would follow on their own.

Heaven and Earth would be in perfect accord

And rain sweet dew.

 

People, unable to deal with It on its own terms

Make adjustments;

And so you have the beginning of division into names.

Since there are already plenty of names

You should know where to stop.

Knowing where to stop, you can avoid danger.

 

The Way's existence in the world

 

Is like valley streams running into the rivers and seas.


33. If you understand others you are smart...

If you understand others you are smart.

If you understand yourself you are illuminated.

If you overcome others you are powerful.

If you overcome yourself you have strength.

If you know how to be satisfied you are rich.

If you can act with vigor, you have a will.

If you don't lose your objectives you can be long-lasting.

 

If you die without loss, you are eternal.


34. The Way is like a great flooding river...

The Way is like a great flooding river. How can it be directed to the
left or right?

The myriad things rely on it for their life but do not distinguish it.

It brings to completion but cannot be said to exist.

It clothes and feeds all things without lording over them.

 

It is always desireless, so we call it "the small."

The myriad things return to it and it doesn't exact lordship

Thus it can be called "great."

Till the end, it does not regard itself as Great.

 

Therefore it actualizes its greatness.


35. Holding to the Great Form...

Holding to the Great Form

All pass away.

They pass away unharmed, resting in Great Peace.

 

It is for food and music that the passing traveler stops.

 

When the Way appears from its opening

It is so subtle, it has no taste.

Look at it, you cannot see it.

Listen, you cannot hear it.

Use it

 

You cannot exhaust it.


36. That which will be shrunk...

That which will be shrunk

Must first be stretched.

That which will be weakened

Must first be strengthened.

That which will be torn down

Must first be raised up.

That which will be taken

Must first be given.

 

This is called "subtle illumination."

 

The gentle and soft overcomes the hard and aggressive.

 

A fish cannot leave the water.

 

The country's potent weapons

Should not be shown to its people.


37. The Way is always "not-doing"...

The Way is always "not-doing"

Yet there is nothing it doesn't do.

If the ruler is able to embody it

Everything will naturally change.

 

Being changed, they desire to act.

 

So I must restrain them, using the nameless "uncarved block (original
mind)."

 

Using the nameless uncarved block

They become desireless.

Desireless, they are tranquil and

All-under-Heaven is naturally settled.


38. Superior virtue is not virtuous...

Superior virtue is not virtuous

Therefore it has virtue.

Inferior virtue never fails to be virtuous

Therefore it has no virtue.

 

Superior virtue does not "act"

And has no intentions.

Inferior virtue "acts"

And always has intentions.

Superior humaneness"acts"

But has no intentions.

Superior rightness "acts"

But but has intentions.

Superior propriety "acts"and if you don't respond

 

They will roll up their sleeves and threaten you.

 

Thus, when the Way is lost there is virtue

When virtue is lost there is humaneness

When humaneness is lost there is rightness

And when rightness is lost there is propriety.

 

Now "propriety"is the external appearance of loyalty and sincerity

And the beginning of disorder.

 

Occult abilities are just flowers of the Way

And the beginning of foolishness.

 

Therefore the Great Person dwells in the substantial

And not in the superficial.

Rests in the fruit and not in the flower.

 

So let go of that and grasp this.


39. These in the past have attained wholeness...

These in the past have attained wholeness:

 

Heaven attains wholeness with its clarity;

The Earth attains wholeness with its firmness;

The Spirit attains wholeness with its transcendence;

The Valley attain wholeness when filled;

The Myriad Things attain wholeness in life;

The Ruler attains wholeness in the correct governance of the people.

 

In effecting this:

If Heaven lacked clarity it would be divided;

If the Earth lacked firmness it would fly away;

If the spirit lacked transcendence it would be exhausted;

If the valley lacked fullness it would be depleted;

If the myriad things lacked life they would vanish.

If the ruler lacks nobility and loftiness he will be tripped up.

 

Hence

Nobility has lowliness as its root

The High has the Low as its base.

Thus the kings call themselves "the orphan, the lowly, the unworthy."

 

Is this not taking lowliness as the fundamental? Isn't it?

 

In this way you can bring about great effect without burden.

Not desiring the rarity of gems

Or the manyness of grains of sand.

40. Return is the motion of the Way...

Return is the motion of the Way.

Softening is its function.

All things in the cosmos arise from being.

Being arises from non-being.


41. When superior students hear of the Way...


When superior students hear of the Way

They strive to practice it.

When middling students hear of the Way

They sometimes keep it and sometimes lose it.

When inferior students hear of the Way

They have a big laugh.

 

But "not laughing"in itself is not sufficient to be called the Way, and
therefore it is said:

 

The sparkling Way seems dark

Advancing in the Way seems like regression.

Settling into the Way seems rough.

True virtue is like a valley.

The immaculate seems humble.

Extensive virtue seems insufficient.

Established virtue seems deceptive.

The face of reality seems to change.

The great square has no corners.

Great ability takes a long time to perfect.

Great sound is hard to hear.

The great form has no shape.

 

The Way is hidden and nameless.

 

This is exactly why the Way is good at developing and perfecting.


42. The Way produces one, one produces two...

The Way produces one, one produces two.

The two produce the three and the three produce all things.

All things submit to yin and embrace yang.

They soften their energy to achieve harmony.

 

People hate to think of themselves as "orphan,""lowly," and "unworthy"

Yet the kings call themselves by these names.

 

Some lose and yet gain,

Others gain and yet lose.

That which is taught by the people

I also teach:

"The forceful do not choose their place of death."

I regard this as the father of all teachings.


43. The softest thing in the world...

The softest thing in the world

Will overcome the hardest.

Non-being can enter where there is no space.

Therefore I know the benefit of unattached action.

The wordless teaching and unattached action

 

Are rarely seen.


44. Which is dearer, fame or your life?

Which is dearer, fame or your life?

Which is greater, your life or possessions?

Which is more painful, gain or loss?

Therefore we always pay a great price for excessive love

And suffer deep loss for great accumulation.

Knowing what is enough, you will not be humiliated.

Knowing where to stop, you will not be imperiled

 

And can be long-lasting.


45. Great perfection seems flawed...

Great perfection seems flawed, yet functions without a hitch.

Great fullness seems empty, yet functions without exhaustion.

Great straightness seems crooked,

Great skill seems clumsy,

Great eloquence seems stammering.

 

Excitement overcomes cold, stillness overcomes heat.

Clarity and stillness set everything right.


46. When the Way prevails in the land...

When the Way prevails in the land

Fine horses leisurely graze and fertilize the ground.

When the Way is lacking in the land

War horses are bred outside the city.

Natural disasters are not as bad as not knowing what is enough.

Loss is not as bad as wanting more.

 

Therefore the sufficiency that comes from knowing what is enough is an
eternal sufficiency.


47. Without going out the door, knowing everything...

Without going out the door, knowing everything,

Without peeking out the window shades, seeing the Way of Heaven.

 

The further you go, the less you know.

 

Hence the sage

Understands without having to go through the whole process.

Discerns1 <#note-47-1> without looking.

Is perfected without striving.


48. In studying, each day something is gained...

In studying, each day something is gained.

In following the Way, each day something is lost.

Lost and again lost.

Until there is nothing left to do.

Not-doing, nothing is left undone.

You can possess the world by never manipulating it.

No matter how much you manipulate

You can never possess the world.


49. The sage has no fixed mind...

The sage has no fixed mind,

She takes the mind of the people as her mind.

 

I treat the good as good, I also treat the evil as good.

This is true goodness.

I trust the trustworthy, I also trust the untrustworthy.

This is real trust.

 

When the sage lives with people, she harmonizes with them

And conceals her mind for them.

The sages treat them as their little children.


50. Coming into life and entering death...

Coming into life and entering death,

The followers of life are three in ten.

The followers of death are three in ten.

Those whose life activity is their death ground are three in ten.

Why is this?

Because they live life grasping for its rich taste.

 

Now I have heard that those who are expert in handling life

Can travel the land without meeting tigers and rhinos,

Can enter battle without being wounded.

The rhino has no place to plant its horn,

The tiger has no place to place its claws,

Weapons find no place to receive their sharp edges.

Why?

 

Because he has no death-ground.


51. Way gives birth to it...


Way gives birth to it,

Virtue rears it,

Materiality shapes it,

Activity perfects it.

Therefore, there are none of the myriad things who do not venerate the
Way or esteem its virtue.

This veneration of the Way and esteeming of its virtue is something they
do naturally, without being forced.

Therefore, the Way gives birth.

Its virtue rears, develops, raises, adjusts and disciplines,

Nourishes, covers and protects,

Produces but does not possess,

Acts without expectation,

Leads without forcing.

 

This is called "Mysterious Virtue."


52. All things have a beginning, which we can regard as their Mother...

All things have a beginning, which we can regard as their Mother.

Knowing the mother, we can know its children.

Knowing the children, yet still cleaving to the mother

You can die without pain.

 

Stop up the holes

Shut the doors,

You can finish your life without anxiety.

 

Open the doors,

Increase your involvements,

In the end you can't be helped.

 

Seeing the subtle is called illumination.

Keeping flexible is called strength.

Use the illumination, but return to the light.

Don't bring harm to yourself.

 

This is called "practicing the eternal."


53. If I had just a little bit of wisdom...

If I had just a little bit of wisdom

I should walk the Great Path and fear only straying from it.

Though the Way is quite broad

People love shortcuts.

 

The court is immaculate,

While the fields are overgrown with weeds,

And the granaries are empty.

They wear silk finery,

Carry sharp swords,

Sate themselves on food and drink

Having wealth in excess.

They are called thieving braggarts.

 

This is definitely not the Way.


54. The well-established cannot be uprooted...

The well-established cannot be uprooted.

The well-grasped does not slip away.

Generation after generation carries out the ancestor worship without break.

 

Cultivate it in yourself and virtue will be real.

Cultivate it in the family and virtue will overflow.

Cultivate it in the town and virtue will be great.

Cultivate it in the country and virtue will abundant.

Cultivate it in the world and virtue will be everywhere.

 

Therefore, take yourself and observe yourself.

Take the family and observe the family.

Take the town and observe the town.

Take the country and observe the country.

Take the world and observe the world.

 

How do I know the world as it is?

 

By this.


55. One who remains rich in virtuous power...

One who remains rich in virtuous power

Is like a newborn baby.

Bees, scorpions and venomous snakes do not bite it,

The wild beasts do not attack it,

Birds of prey do not sink their claws into it.

Though its bones are weak

And muscles soft,

Its grip is strong.

Without knowing of the blending of male and female

S/he is a perfect production,

The ultimate in vitality.

S/he cries all day without getting hoarse.

S/he is the ultimate in harmony.

 

Understanding harmony is called the Constant.

Knowing the Constant is called illumination.

Nourishing life is called blessing.

Having control of your breath is called strength.

 

After things blossom they decay, and

This is called the non-Way.

 

The non-Way expires quickly.


56. One who knows does not speak...

One who knows does not speak.

One who speaks does not know.

Close your holes, shut your doors,

Soften your sharpness, loosen your knots.

Soften your glare and merge with the everyday.

 

This is called mysteriously attaining oneness.

 

Though you cannot possess it, you are intimate with it

And at the same time, distant.

Though you cannot possess it, you are benefitted by it,

And harmed by it.

You cannot possess it, but are esteemed through it

And humbled by it.

 

Therefore the world values you.


57. Use fairness in governing the state...

Use fairness in governing the state.

Use surprise tactics in war.

Be unconcerned and you will have the world.

How do I know it is like this?

Because:

The more regulations there are,

The poorer people become.

The more people own lethal weapons,

The more darkened are the country and clans.

The more clever the people are,

The more extraordinary actions they take.

The more picky the laws are,

The more thieves and gangsters there are.

 

Therefore the sages say:

I do not force my way and the people transform themselves.

I enjoy my serenity and the people correct themselves.

I do not interfere and the people enrich themselves.

 

I have no desires

 

And the people find their original mind.


58. When the government is laid back...

When the government is laid back

The people are relaxed.

When the government is nitpicking

The people have anxiety.

Misfortune depends upon fortune.

Fortune conceals misfortune.

What has a definite delimitation?

Or abnormality?

The normal reverts to strangeness.

Goodness reverts to perversion.

 

People certainly have been confused for a long time.

 

Therefore the sage squares things without cutting.

Edges without separating.

Straightens without lining up.

 

Shines but does not glare.


59. In governing the country and serving Heaven...

In governing the country and serving Heaven

There is nothing like frugality.

Only by being frugal can you recover quickly.

When you recover quickly you accumulate virtue.

Having accumulated virtue,

There is nothing you can't overcome.

When there is nothing you can't overcome

Who knows the limits of your capabilities?

These limits being unfathomable

You can possess the country.

 

The Mother who possesses the country can be long-living.

This is called "planting the roots deeply and firmly."

 

The way to long life and eternal vision.


60. Governing a large country is like cooking a small fish...

Governing a large country is like cooking a small fish.

When you govern people with the Way

Demons will have no power.

Not that they don't have power,

But their power will not harm people.

 

Not only does their power not harm people:

The sage also doesn't harm people,

Since the two do not harm each other.

 

They share in each other's virtue.


61. The great state should be like a river basin...

The great state should be like a river basin.

The mixing place of the world,

The feminine of the world.

The feminine always overcomes the masculine by softness

Because softness is lesser.

Therefore if a large state serves a small state

It will gain the small state.

If a small state serves a large state

It will gain the large state.

 

Therefore some serve in order to gain

And some gain despite their servitude.

 

The large state wants nothing more

Than to unite and feed its people.

The small state wants nothing more

Than to enter into the service of the right person.

Thus both get what they want.

 

Greatness lies in placing oneself below.


62. The Way is hidden deeply in all things...

The Way is hidden deeply in all things.

It is the treasure of the good

And the refuge of the not-so-good.

With skillful words you can be successful.

With honorable actions you can be included.

 

People may not be so good, but how can you deny them?

 

Therefore, even though there are great jewels brought in by teams of
horses at the coronation of the emperor and the installation of the
three princes,

This is not as good as staying where you are

And advancing in this Way.

 

Why did the ancients so value the Way?

 

You can't say that it was for seeking gain

Or to have punishments to deter crime.

 

Therefore it is the most prized in the world.


63. Do without "doing"...

Do without "doing."

Get involved without manipulating.

Taste without tasting.

Make the great small,

The many, few.

Respond to anger with virtue.

Deal with difficulties while they are still easy.

Handle the great while it is still small.

 

The difficult problems in life

Always start off being simple.

Great affairs always start off being small.

Therefore the sage never deals with the great

And is able to actualize his greatness.

 

Now light words generate little belief,

Much ease turns into much difficulty.

Therefore the sage treats things as though they were difficult,

 

And hence, never has difficulty.


64. That which is at rest is easy to grasp...

That which is at rest is easy to grasp.

That which has not yet come about is easy to plan for.

That which is fragile is easily broken.

That which is minute is easily scattered.

Handle things before they arise.

Manage affairs before they are in a mess.

 

A thick tree grows from a tiny seed.

A tall building arises from a mound of earth.

A journey of a thousand miles starts with one step.

Contriving, you are defeated;

Grasping, you lose.

 

The sage doesn't contrive, so she isn't beaten.

Not grasping, she doesn't lose.

When people are carrying out their projects

They usually blow it at the end.

 

If you are as careful at the end

As you were at the beginning,

You won't be disappointed.

 

Therefore the sage desires non-desire,

Does not value rare goods,

Studies the unlearnable

So that she can correct the mistakes of average people

And aid all things in manifesting their true nature

 

Without presuming to take the initiative.


65. The ancients who were skillful at the Way...

The ancients who were skillful at the Way

Did not illuminate the people

But rather kept them simple.

When the people are difficult to rule

It is because of their cleverness.

Therefore

If you use cleverness to rule the state

You are a robber of the state.

If you don't use cleverness to rule the state

You are a blessing to the state.

 

If you understand these two points, you know the proper norm for governing.

To be continuously understanding the proper norm is called Mysterious
Virtue.

How deep and far-reaching Mysterious Virtue is!

It makes all return

 

Until they reach the Great Norm.


66. The reason the river and sea can be regarded as...

The reason the river and sea can be regarded as

The rulers of all the valley streams

Is because of their being below them.

Therefore they can be their rulers.

So if you want to be over people

You must speak humbly to them.

If you want to lead them

You must place yourself behind them.

 

Thus the sage is positioned above

And the people do not feel oppressed.

He is in front and they feel nothing wrong.

Therefore they like to push him front and never resent him.

 

Since he does not contend

 

No one can contend with him.


67. The reason everybody calls my Way great...

The reason everybody calls my Way great

Is because there is nothing quite like it.

It is exactly because it isgreat

That there is nothing quite like it.

If there were something that were consistently like it

 

How could it be small?

 

I have three treasures thatI hold and cherish.

The first is compassion,

The second is frugality,

The third is not daring to put myself ahead of everybody.

 

Having compassion, I can be brave.

Having frugality, I can be generous.

Not daring to put myself ahead of everybody

I can take the time to perfect my abilities.

Now if I am brave without compassion

Generous without frugality, or

Go to the fore without putting my own concerns last,

I might as well be dead.

 

If you wage war with compassion you will win.

If you protect yourself with compassion you will be impervious.

Heaven will take care of you,

 

Protecting you with compassion.


68. The best warrior is never aggressive...

The best warrior is never aggressive.

The best fighter is never angry.

The best tactician does not engage the enemy.

The best utilizer of people's talents places himself below them.

 

This is called the virtue of non-contention.

It is called the ability to engage people's talents.

It is called the ultimate in merging with Heaven.


69. Strategists have a saying...

Strategists have a saying:

I prefer to be able to move, rather than be in a fixed position

I prefer to retreat a foot rather than advancing an inch.

This is called progress without advancing;

Preparing without showing off;

Smashing where there is no defense;

Taking him without a fight.

 

There is no greater danger than under-estimating your opponent.

If I under-estimate my opponent

I will lose that which is most dear.

Therefore

When opponents clash

 

The one who is sorry about it will be the winner.


70. My words are easy to understand...

My words are easy to understand

And easy to practice.

Yet nobody understands them or practices them.

My words have an origin;

My actions have a principle.

It is only because of your not understanding this

That you do not understand me.

Since there are few who understand me

I am valued.

Therefore the sage wears coarse clothes.

Yet hides a jewel in his bosom.


71. There is nothing better than to know that you don't know...

There is nothing better than to know that you don't know.

Not knowing, yet thinking you know—

This is sickness.

Only when you are sick of being sick

Can you be cured.

The sage's not being sick

 

Is because she is sick of sickness.

 

Therefore she is not sick.


72. When the people do not fear your might...

When the people do not fear your might

Then your might has truly become great.

Don't interfere with their household affairs.

Don't oppress their livelihood.

 

If you don't oppress them they won't feel oppressed.

 

Thus the sage understands herself

But does not show herself.

Loves herself

But does not prize herself.

Therefore she lets go of that

 

And takes this.


73. If you are courageous in daring you will die...

If you are courageous in daring you will die.

If you are courageous in not-daring you will live.

Among these two, one is beneficial and the other is harmful.

 

Who understands the reason why Heaven dislikes what it dislikes?

Even the sage has difficulty in knowing this.

 

The Way of Heaven is to win easily without struggle.

To respond well without words,

To naturally come without special invitation,

To plan well without anxiety.

 

Heaven's net is vast.

It is loose.

 

Yet nothing slips through.


74. If the people don't fear death...

If the people don't fear death

How will you scare them with death?

If you make the people continuously fear death

By seizing anybody who does something out of the ordinary

And killing them,

Who will dare to move?

 

There is always an official executioner to handle this.

If you play the role of the official executioner

It is like cutting wood in the capacity of Master Carpenter.

 

There are few who will not cut their hands.

 


75. The reason people starve...

The reason people starve

Is because their rulers tax them excessively.

They are difficult to govern

Because their rulers have their own ends in mind.

 

The reason people take death lightly

Is because they want life to be rich.

Therefore they take death lightly.

It is only by not living for your own ends

That you can go beyond valuing life.


76. When people are born they are gentle and soft...

When people are born they are gentle and soft.

At death they are hard and stiff.

When plants are alive they are soft and delicate.

When they die, they wither and dry up.

Therefore the hard and stiff are followers of death.

The gentle and soft are the followers of life.

 

Thus, if you are aggressive and stiff, you won't win.

When a tree is hard enough, it is cut. Therefore

The hard and big are lesser,

The gentle and soft are greater.


77. The Way of Heaven...

The Way of Heaven

Is like stretching a bow.

The top is pulled down,

The bottom is pulled up.

Excess string is removed

Where more is needed, it is added.

 

It is the Way of Heaven

To remove where there is excess

And add where there is lack.

The way of people is different:

They take away where there is need

And add where there is surplus.

 

Who can take his surplus and give it to the people?

Only one who possesses the Way.

 

Therefore the sage acts without expectation.

Does not abide in his accomplishments.

Does not want to show his virtue.

 


78. Nothing in the world is softer than water...

Nothing in the world is softer than water,

Yet nothing is better at overcoming the hard and strong.

This is because nothing can alter it.

 

That the soft overcomes the hard

And the gentle overcomes the aggressive

Is something that everybody knows

But none can do themselves.

Therefore the sages say:

The one who accepts the dirt of the state

Becomes its master.

The one who accepts its calamity

Becomes king of the world.

 

Truth seems contradictory.


79. After calming great anger...

After calming great anger

There are always resentments left over.

How can this be considered as goodness?

Therefore the sage keeps her part of the deal,

And doesn't check up on the other person.

 

The virtuous ascertain the content of the contract itself;

Those without virtue are concerned about it's being exacted.2 <#note-79-2>

 

The Heavenly Way has no favorites:

It always raises up the Good.


80. Let there be a small country with few people...

Let there be a small country with few people,

Who, even having much machinery, don't use it.

Who take death seriously and don't wander far away.

Even though they have boats and carriages, they never ride in them.

Having armor and weapons, they never go to war.

Let them return to measurement by tying knots in rope.

 

Sweeten their food, give them nice clothes, a peaceful abode and a
relaxed life.

Even though the next country can be seen and its doges and chickens can
be heard,

 

The people will grow old and die without visiting each other's land.


81. True words are not fancy...

True words are not fancy.

Fancy words are not true.

The good do not debate.

Debaters are not good.

The one who really knows is not broadly learned,

The extensively learned do not really know.

The sage does not hoard,

She gives people her surplus.

Giving her surplus to others she is enriched.

 

The way of Heaven is to help and not harm.

The way of the Sage is to act without wrangling.
tr ti oo dt ri ei co wm lu bo
ne ia su me al or ra ow as br
or er xp om po re ng ev te ha tl li hi ne be ad vi ts
er en ue rs il tr su ho ki ve dv nt
by on to in wo ad bo ms er on no ar di ad on iz to nf by lt ry nu sc ie na ne ca ur
to he ac la he
id an ke rm ce in pa ye ct tt ho ot st se ti ct pu eg ha pu lh ro id eo th th am vi sh of ob mu gs ea do as dv st ie ok ll te ti es ma cl ed ra ol ut en sc on es ee ec li om ci of ce la ra da th en
ot yo li ep or rk us ed st he ce te of po el ve bl it gh es tm de dt le rs pa st bu ri sa nd wi is
it um su re pp nr au er st th la le ho sa ar ch er tr he eq ne
rs en ic rd le in iv pa ys uo er ch un or on up te ys he ka tb ur nd th us
ec la dw di en ti lo ru an sm io tn ot ac ay wa ct tu ir mo no ce mo oy in it hs th te th ce pe mi at on nn li ig ll ne og rg as co ob ct nt me
ra lv on dp er ec ch tr nn in he he nj pb ic he me ex ou of ea re in pl op na op ge dr et ce as ho ok en yo oi to er te ks of oo tv ac el el he uc es in cr ri ou ak au pe is ve pa ng io at en ia er rt ap el me ll ec sc nd on at te fr ou re no in mi bo an ls my fc ys te se co yp aw og ga nn us he at ti or ol vi es in sn te br in ag rn ms ja us ea db da ou ic re
lt sd li ct ss ti pr th dt ns si er ol or pa dp ru on gn gs of ed se
th ut ts
ni sa es su ea ws ls rl ce or pu pe
pr mo it ro ro en fi af gn an is ec aq on sc fo be ee lc in oa ho rs tr ow st di mu nt as cr cl ra mm os ig as ll li ge la nd ss th te en we rg al dd er is an vi en sm ff sl hi us bs er ar he te le on ll on af ly tt se ax bo lc ts tr ad us si lo ll on di ab in nd es te di ou ra us ed as ag tt rn ha et re ou eg re om em lo ti yo ci ca ni tr gf en to he nc he
eb he me pi ck ti an es bj nc yd me ga hn ac ke ze gh nd er el an si st po ho po ni ve ei ws au io ze
ed ar te mo ld si og un ng go ur
um sa ya fo ha ib to ni un gl ce ef fy em is da to co ra su in th th ea is em in re ul hi fo er ar cl it la wo st mg rc ly ac rt di la oo
de al am sh ne oa sp ga in ow al pr go et tc ir si
he oc ed me tu
th pl om me ts al ou ot or ma kl he rd de di ic ac da ti ee an tv tu da ci es ry ac ma yo ym dr hi th ej be sc ie ts pr an th ut ve ie ey si nd ww ib an ar io is ma fr et tc ev fo er br me re al re th rm wo le ne an on al ti ug le he rn ew ps tl gr lo io om en ar re es ha um er if sa es rt ou es ai it rt in ar it af as il er ea oo ss re wa ne
ee ca
in ue lo ut hu is wa to rt
wi om es th tu ra cu at sk dp ni di
im ex ut me rd da ni yd or nt ib by en tw to to hi in ho ch gi bs io ti eh ma da is tr el st fi th db ge er as qu ir te nt so he sf on on os in
nu re id ko ma am oa ds on te ss le so ef ic dt ch os cr le mi ma ct he il gr su
th ha ls so st pu ty ts so he en rc nt es ro nd ll su
bl al ap st st on ic wi la nt ec am om io is et
nd
si ma ho lf he as in cr
ll co nd he pr al rs lg pl th sa wh ed on an us on ts ht es he er ou ot gi ah le in ir th sl ag rt re ga th bu br na an st to ge re om al re we si an tf on bu pl gc pl si yi fr pr eg ti wh of ec re wa sa bl ca ov vi fo om ed li in ti en ne du al mi
om mi in ut mp as ou io pl sp ne se cr in ia eo cr he dh if ma er ic ba sp rs no bu en ec er et sm la ew
em ge
ns rs al an hi om di le se ep in or xc re eb nt in ll lo ac ks ty ss rk lg ot is ll ro es en
ic gc th du an as an ha ab av bu ro fa fo al nt ch ew le re te te ho er ta in er or ea no ls ll mi ur ar es nc ew ba oa ma is he et re ur we is le rd ve tf un un dl oe oe iq ot ag br li il fg ll fc in ls ep
in st st on ty ho re da pp ul ou no al er ba ca eo me ry no ve ct as le or th
ra th ku to ur co so st on ro ap ai mo se tt en rr ai st no ag an ta tf
sa gr fl hi he es sc ck st er ha it ac ro in eh lt gi
wi om va
ia no ou la vd gn ts rc pl le at nt pt ge eb ed en ug en mi ar ri re ay ha io nd rh th
eu lt do ur oj ea yw ti se om gy ar li ry te er ti tb al wh te ts fr in er ri ma ll or is di od cc ga rc
ur ce oa sf ta da ma ud no on al dg pt co ei hu
an
ca it wa ap tw ec eo pm hi of ti be nt rt
ge ib ed an in ea te io eh so er er si ie rr ov se va co hi gr gr ev we ul li es at er oo io ed ho tp at ro an
fo
ng me tr ti ee or ng ec sh he le pr st co od ow ip or ow ic fi eo in dt lo
me vi ia ho ja th lb us ss en od oc ev of pa ed ap me er st so ve se ha gi el on ps
om xa se re mo ho ch cr ow cs tr
ce we ch
to th ti he st ym ht rm al oo oc ea ta hn on eb en nt pr st sp de ed en es en sl si sw
me re ti or pr ab al se yo tm ok ri ta ma me ba
he rf ey da th re ri es wa ss ru ha ul
nc
me ms ed nt ty ce or on ec ea ch nu ed ns gu at te al in ck an en fi de rt ho
ly gi vo le rt nd fs iv wy te se ca
ni in on bo th
eu st yp si it me ic nd ns ol od oi ng fe te ea er ab lo iv sm ri ou va hi ly of ic ol
bn qu
xe ac
ts is ey dw ei ty op ld or ei es ea im re ti cr ne he te el mm bi
rs se ca er no yo it rm ow ea in ff nd it en al au eq es is po tf no et ur
re ru nd az gf it su ik gi rl lt lp ft ga lo ve ui
pu re
ad on
eg el ut pe on be nt bo fo ge be pp nc ke yi nf rt ur ur ea ed ar po vi ro of ad st on bo be xu er wi tt ph on
ot nd la
io in ex is rt te am
ur or om na ch he in ea od tu di be nt fo al ga ri ms da on gl ef in ro hi re he is
ec an om at ch ar ri hi er sh on ma vi ll be es he pa in ou na te fo ra rs at ad ic id mi so ou to pu li ce ed ap ge go sk st ou ur ig de sd ex fo na fo na su fr ec mm em fu ve de ed ff di he on ui ep si sp na em tl ad
ho xi ll ov
ap es ld us rg ly ck iv st nd ra st ia it ar di co te tl ha ha wr in mi ar om po ra ls
ne wi it oy sk es fy in al th on or rn ma or ne ea ha he em nd pa nd ho ha sh un on ic an er tg un gu bu lp ic ai on rc vi li
nb co nd rp ir la io on ft th id yt bl nk ay il an re ge ir fe nd
de ai th so wi or
ng on ri ry sa st fr gd eu
ic mo sa ts be nd ur ea ry ea re is th rm we ok se ra de ir es re sm an oo st in co or si rt ap na me pr ea ng an si us
ds li lo ar ge pd by ie ge il en gi hu co bs ri se tt mt ti ts ed na an rs ld yc om ea at tr eo nd ic sa ic nc ar ay rk mi th an er
rt nt ng rs wh he on te os na nt hi ok ad ny xo ma ed ra ho li nt re fo
co ll fw ds re ti il ic re sm is pi st nd os ra ew ar ke re ni im an gr io io en vi da po tm ee vi ws iv ig or er de tl nt rs ri er ar in ct up ea ep mt re er ol al st to il em
al ec or ww ro la pa na an rp tl as om od er gt rf hp ri of og ee by ss af
ec ha er ne ed em oo ri su ei sc an ys or of er rc ph do
me ge th gi je ny ie rs ri te he gn ew bi ed la cr se ur di at ne ec on ta so nt se ui lt er ct no is iv sn in fs pa og he co wt fo el em ni it ex an up sa re io at im ct
dw ff at he te re zo op tw do wh al si la ic ko
pr re ca th ct te rr be ke uw co og it in co wo ti nf fa el rt be in do ou oa rn va un se eu nd wa ee mo ns ta ad se ns si er hi ol yj le ic vi ex sc io at op in lo me yl re hr ws cg ng
te id nn ar er ou ca er an on
oc ta it ws se nd cu ge or
en or fr in ab ss or ap es sb mo nd sh lo ed nt fl ng ld se ne dy on in wi lo nd th ul so ol he no th
pp ri oi nn al he te re rp yo eb dw so uc ng nt in ed ly ft
ci ce en oo ti al to li an yo pe ef nd oo de or of en nk au ng sp co ar ce ss vi es ce rm ll is th re ec fo ri be un rm se dd or po an ve ll th te st nd fi ep dr na us th nc ti hi nm le mo
mo yo si or
of et he re th es ss
at jo rs th ev co ep ns
al to du ag ja ac ks hi rt ef nd in sy oo ed si fr ci ug al en qu sn be te yo nt al da nd ed go hb ci ti ze ok nc ie in ni ea re fe ir ie oa th nd in ld en ha ps yk ni le mm th yo rp ob ri on ss fo ox
la ay ns at ed wa in ar cu on ll ib ch ea it oc fo me wn ma ig ed me rl at na op mp me en ns xt hr nk op ta er pi to el or ou sl to yo ec pe yf pa ee sh he ve ss on th ee in ea th at di iv id ry
ba dc tu ur
co ro tr ac re ro tr
ok on nt me rc sp re el na ke pe ti es yl in se it er ns rd he ty in da fm gl ch wi un
he te el an nc ia te ea ta st of pr so er an an ng ts be rj ri pa sr at te he ru if
te
em nn ic hi sa st ht
yt at pe
be ta ce rt tb re as ta ip ak su tr ef co im ma gh ta ss tc ti an be ig ts pl nd ed an ty sh ol
ac to om ea eo il th fa bl ne kc no co en rm ns al ha he rd er in pa sm re ti ds an co se th eh nd ld ci er pa pr th ve rk yp or it el ty rs il of ti om ar ft bo es nd ac sl ri ti ye ng tm pl er in ca rs bb ou me pe ta ti is
kt he in ed rs we od at be ng bi bs er ic om yt ks nd sf on ia le re es or rc ne ul
yw se ph ke fo ya gu ne pp te on ou hh ts ti ll in al np el or ut co io rc go ic pe sr rs
sg rs go rd ye ta
te cu em
ce ra an
at ra fu ee im ou rn me nl il an
re th he lo ne po en tm do fo em at ie ud ea oc
po id ab ti co en lo rd ng mu de ef so or
he ta am hr it dw ee ul wn ep an ss rf
tc mo ge et ti ca ve in wh
ti ye rd pr ba ln re he ti rb je en te va pe tw ig nc ok or as st rk yo ch kl ck et ms de op on is ar
dt nz io ya ca si ts
et os re se en fi pr ha ne is nc cr no au
ft ia th ht me bc
wa rt ir nu st mi pe ge ag ti os al
he rd ce ry
im en io li ye mm al ws
gg ct tr gs ns th ng ne vi yo hi ga to in in on rt lp er ar ec te or ed bo on er nn fo me an te nt nt it sd ng ti dr ka
is nd he ng th ls gs gd er ep at eh at sc ot es en nw us ma ce yt il pa er nk ee ee pe yb ta ng ce es pr an be om id ia ur id re
en
hi ab um st de he le wa un
sa em io it ai et or lm ch
av ol me ow lr yo ni ng me ti
us og eq gh el an on on
is ma li ba ps
sa is er qu rr th pp at ll we io ot rr vi sp ce th ct cs yn ar es on ic wh st ti te ct bo il nc th ge be th th fi rs re id nt sh st to es as pe dm au ot op er by fe ec od ot hi as au ar na ck an ei et us it we no ve en ce hm oc ea en rs ed st tr ar ld
so ar sa ex ud no da ha pr in or be io yb th ho te av se fo in at po tc hi st rc en er en so ts th ma ot pe ti le ev no la re es rs mb on in as di lp tb ge
sc ri ef po om ta gr at ke cl in rt or ba
kr aa so ym er iz nl at ng in nt ec nd an he al ow nt he ck yo ti ks le re
ve es re st ri id ko ge el he dt to ey it wf in to ar rm va rt es sf ye an mi ee io sr ti of es li cy ir an th mm ab do lc we re re it be et id an ay el oo ha en ds th bi ve op on fa ea ge ch da oo te ci et to mi ef gi mo na fi ga ra ha ly in ed ge an me nt ad yf pe ro ga om sh ss or ic to de ne at wi ut ot ey pr oa nd il nd mm ak ki es hi om on at ol me ci hi ma es it rb ar ar er ma to ur ar ar or ve ts mb il ur ov ht
pl is ue ns oo av of
an eb tr tu li en to in nc
el sa il ev bu lp le me
ey po et ei st ss rn he ti ur th
wa ed le ay pe er eg vi or mb on er fa co on ep in so na re er fr ng ot sa of re nd ne ke uc te ha it eg in cn er sw ol ll ep lf ca rk ci en pe tb er rm th es it cl io on is nt ca at sa lo es na ea si tr de it to os rs
fi
an er sw ra ng ai as ca at fo ho ue ur ov ry nc gg rp ac ag ys
ug ci re ta at ei or al fe gm ac ml te in sp ss dh rv fi nt el io th ss no ge ef or om oi gl ag om bi ca he vi ee ff ya ht nd ea ad iv te ca th nd ed ib sd it mp es tr ta se ec ol xi er ts pr il re mi up ec ti at el co ee co rs he
ra gi rn ni ra ep in tt pa ur
am pl mu ic sh lo bo
ts di
in ds wi mi sb gy mo er wa wa es co ui mo om
ho ca ry ma te ti do pn ti ep cy ou rg gt el ey is ha he ll
uf
me
ub iv re de il
ma to er of st ta er th ac mo ts da db il ft ie in sa ou ac ev ou sn in
um ap di an ve db ck sv bl
lo ld wo mi ra od he la ss th an pe pp ic eb ho fo ng ed ra ar rd nc rt
es cu ab ol es
dc nd dt nt in ve cc dt co th ch yo an el
ow dr an ec se ft rv en wp to fo te om me dy le oz wi th il mi em ee gi ri de te is an it st st on
st ts ro al ne me nt he me vi he nd ci we is th es ne ve as th nd sb on ck du ra uc nl sm ss er ey
re re nt al av he ia yo eg or es in te sc di in se ot an el mu he lu pe sp tp ab an ct te ou au pl lu ed ti ue lr re re ns ll ve ld ia di
es pr ro om ep le ic le in ul ck as on co
re to at nt ly
ic th du dl ay ar ro mi co ve he an oc re ss of in am ra il ab co le ei su ea ft tt cu lo lt to os ca ah ed ns ha tp pt ek le ro gb ra en ic de le gi du wi to eu hi ph fe sa ok et se th ea me us re ec ry it ra la ke fo ng sh re ot ev re st
ca io tm ly oh ct oo ea of in pr ad
ea go le ra le ba
to ar rt an
ol ro lu ti or ca dy fa ac as me do is sa ec in rt di st gy el el hi re pp ry ul rr er te of pi fr ie of hc al
co of ve pa oo it io yo nm et ba cp ea bb mo he en io iw ig io to
ed od pa er st as mi lp
es ue dm th st mp ch es ct ba ol ll en op ek or
de ap bi io fp le st in al ls sh te al ta de ly fi qu er io ia th le sa ea dd ot vo
es he fo en
ou hi we ou th oi ra us of hr ns wh ne ll wa et rb de th he ls ts pe to ed ss yo do sa ic re pr ke al ca rl an ay nv rs ot na no re ti re on ha ew se ea ia ip ov ki wi at ht op ng es en st nt ju
lo ag ns se ny fe la he yt er or to to rn ra ve al ey no ny ha an re ns un ea ou rk rl io ke ar su pr nt ci ef oo ti es
yr ew ot in ri ef co th ed on on le ce an ni
in ys gh rt rt di op ap br gh dh th ve ta ng lf po nf al gw ll ov nm
ou ad df nl ge gt ng er sc pp go io ro im as rc ut te co vi ne ie ta ac en ma ng et la te wn tr le ng en bl en fu li er we di ig an os ug ar pu bl pl pr ot ct sp ie si in ar ot ne ao cs in ni th ca an in an in
an de nu ed la ma ev re ab ax ve qu ne fr ec ui to mp li ew rw no an ep ad cm st st nd wi io ar py ro ti be st at ed tr rt ri sr do di ow er ec ee ea el vi el ng ns ha on af th ty ch go cv er ve he in oo de te nr on nt ng av in ea ac ac to st ch al er ne
ul lv ne do ei do ge en ga in no ut ki ra vi rs es no le ma
ne he ss sa de xt he ll ra or on ld et si pi de ng if th ra ec th am ie
tu ss ay rb nc en ha en ll ca ys ri ce nt io re ic ea eo mo es oc io ve
ly ns we me va he tt ea tr ca is de
pa th yp ry ib ov of ra ol sy ad an ap na se re wi ea mt pr ex an al ea wo sc ri ps ra er wh gi re in pi va ed on es ck ag te in of me up ir sa th ha og ss oc de
is ly ne ea sf tt an et va th th rt tr ni al of xp er te ct he da yg ry wa er so cc ng id wr oi ed
ll is en na er ct es al ne lo an pw or ba li of he ni em ce me om yv fa ci re wi si ur ta al rs te ci wo he go ir op mf it ed ng at al me in ua ce er pg to he lo ar dl or ro ge ha sh et pa if pa ic pr tw me ti us
we ve nc ll er il le or at em gs dc bl ic pr dc pp lt ob he ec ot ma in co lm io an ng te ri he bi fr ti gi ac ay lr re am ig er cy de ta gr re en ob me es rk su or ar nd ex ap ri do se nu im pr ya oh ne ng is
ri en ek it as of es lo ni th or ur th th op to ip ke ea in uc er re ea th in le nt he at he ou na pa in sp ce ep ov dn et au ol by va us sf th ri im in rt ta gr no yn dr nd lo is it la nw te fd he ic sf nc ay su ca ve ot an
ph te ma
re ta ha la yo nt he st he ha nv hl th iv xy se lo on ti de sa ii si al sl ls ce os as
ri dd on an aw ti bi ac mp ta ha in pr li ro id ag in pe er ha ch ke es is ei ag de al wi ar tl al do ti df er se nd ic us en gp ru ak er ta af la wo et en so eg tr ou fe lc es of yc es la ai he ub ss ef dm ne
on le ar en st ge wo na ep ee ra gh bu nt co in in ho ne no it bu xf so ho io ga br ri te gs to tt li ys ef co ed ni un do rd ic it ve is et er ex
ck ua in ef nd gw ro xa up ce of er bo on on fo wa io ie od fe me ot mp ec pa om ig di in li th ec pp pl wi ch ve er ul ng tt ru en pl co ca ac an on la la ou om kn lt de er an ho ur
na ti ge ia li li cl ng ac mi fi so od ta nd co sw rg ho po
ke ep nf rt at nd ca na he sw up op ni nt se an mb no
kw in en at py he hi no ma mm rw al ny sp sa at uc or ea en as os tm ur yi ld
le kf es ho et cb te ng ti ro ng nd ep pa ca ti ur it fo ak am er on ul ys
to pa as on ts se em an ec ul ct ep no re fa he ph gp te he si ll th al re es nk si ri oc hi ro
fi er fo ux ts er si io al of wi an ar he pd re cl ye nt so at or al rd ry io ou as as st it fe lo et by er le ig et tc os me al it rs ay lh ma mh or li ge
to pr th el sp et cu ld nc he
kn uh es ie po ma of an id pe ld ha od mu oh nd lo da se ee oy nt ta my ce as
av ll na by em ar os ve so le th al la
ai le ji la al ce ev ed en ts sr nn db rl gl he nk os er en ru ar wi th if dt an al ro po yo gs ea it re wt io on os tu gr te or bs iv is re nb su or ha al er mc di so
la eb fr
ns an le mm un pl no th sp in co cf lo ti og po vi ml
lo td co ck th he ja ar gn to ed li
nt te ei nl as eq es nd
of oa oe es io an hs oc ar lu pl ro ri ne ve we vi rv ta he it ie pu fe ui ar ng ge at ei eb gh fa sm us he an ca nt ne ca in po ou di ie bp ie ar an ti lw ua ck ts ig fo at ea nd at wh il mb of bl iv nf or ed ur rv se pp si ph he si ed hs pt rt ds ie ct rv ea to el tr en is nt ul ci am rn we ro ra nd ua rt nd un de li rd rc sa rt de in ot au et ck to ai si rr ot ea lt se
el ar on ds he ut bs ly ce ea nt ti et ri to fl op ra sy ce is om rt ff ot fr it og ol ch en sc th
te ng fr wa ue re is pm ot em ts co ri sh or ag ai ge ic at bi or ho ti in ti
is ll co mo ir pu be si on it lf go io or ef it ar na et ee se fi st hy nm pe sh es es wo er lk si el ta ly te yi an he ym gi hi lu er ea uk hi ce
ha ri cr we ri ac ir er fh la wa ox ki de da it es mp ng te wh dr la is si on us fi ju ac as ed rk ah ry ct um at ad ri tl to ai le he db zz ny le ot at ou hi tr at re th ar me ta us la gt sa nd st ro
lm on xt tr ft gh cr
er ea rf ci on it ab uc se ul ak
re nt av et he st sc he or is ue an ja es or id th ta fr et ca er un to ha
so th at io
me di es ea he ft
el mi ay gh ti er ti za ma ha er ct mb nt ve ei
gi os om ar ra st ct
ns er ve de re st om it cr li
nt nh in ei ns nt ne li in nt or te st sw in yh ve em er of th th ne
re fi ol ow ci re va er es no et in ry ai ps so te eg pr an ia tw th le ut at si ab us
tu op le no er ro mm as ch mo li wi ep pe nl
ho im ou nd nd ei
it pl so ha ow ca ha ra tu ls to ra th ng ne ic do io fe ry rs st st sc
ed us si rm yb wo xi al ab al ne li be tp ga is pa ck en mb or on eo is om at hy ty ou lf st io ee al es es wi nd de in is ou sh an an sy cd ni nv ds as mi we ov fa da ev be
op wa om is at os th ft
te ag he ee ro sn ea ha of ng rs ab ng ta nd in cl am sh ls wi sh as be es me yh al ns
ol du he nd ra li
ou ab hg ll ll er if in er cu ea nt as ts rl qu vi eq te co ee le dt ve in re ne mb ia st ne ni by us he um it at no ro ho ld sa
il ed at oi ge as nu he th et fr he cl nt el ob ee li wo th mu on
xs ub he se ds on od
kh td ng ot rs nc ct ri th ak an pt or ri ea tr ke ns ut of ai th ho os ie om ba te ll dd ww ov ar po me nt of fo bl re sb st ja th re ar wa sj se st es of or nu hy ro es ka as lu ch rc si ra ge nt le he el ae an ou
en sp um ec ul nt ro il gr rd ac je ra
un aw ra ea hn cu pu rp se or ua ed rm
ns th ut in ce di hi in hi wh sp ge hd
ud ts rv th fi he ng ou ys va ar es an se if on nt in en el ts ar ov so nu th it eo rg if ar an go ch ic on ow ng lt sa ce st dr es ie ch as
nm me mp on br rd eo rt en or ne iv ua ew he ce lo ia nd ic pa te oc iv pe tu am sh ro sy fo ef wi im os ou ew or if bu
ht mp lb on eb er an aw eo ff re rm jo do ee ac te an ow ct od er si ow oj in is nd th nd it si tt me ve he rs
ct
pe ap sp ur na to ro nc or po me on em pe tz re ou to or od ie de se ro ou ft
rs ud ic al su ki on na
eo tt an ug ng az og
nt ne
te tg uc sf gt li fa rd ds se ew ax rm in re ea on
it is eu fo at se
al em ec rn lb tr el in io ay ai
ec us on ve al ls li no bo ed ng sw
fb nb gt sc hw rl is or li to so on
th io di at na it li nd si ow se pe mp cc ee rt ed ju ng so po si
ky is ra at dm ew al cl
ve
be ol
is wa qu ot er ts gl nt ds at ed li or se
ew ar gs to da ks or ae am to ai te he na ra de fo er he et si ed ft
ze re
at ht en co it ma ne ix de ms nt ar iu do
am th ai bj ti ha dg cl ar bu
ed pr by er pa ub ik na te ta po ic ou ip te er ni co wd rk ll ou us to en ar ep ba ys er
np ur in ki th ob ea ty or
gm ki do ng ep ri re ia an ea hm mp ro rr od om ar el si ev or os es es er er nt ig ns uc tt de
sp
om ap ul va ln ta an an sc ti ge to nt er rt
ad rv re ig te nd ne ca rr ar eg ar ke de at mi ri ts ue mo tt
ou ny mb so im se se pl in nt an rn on na co fo ca ne ne da sn ri st ti in es aj re hu
ro sl ee ov go nt he om th co fu ry mp et in if xp em te ta an ow av ap ri ts ev
to ts ga bl re
dr po re es ry nc as ge ic um on ly ur
di
nd ve er pe nn ul fo ss fa si cl nd ce on pr tr ou nd yc io it dp nd eb om hi on fc ta of at ie er tf en st
is st nc in rn ac ta pe po ou ll he ou nd av et am
co th le ee ar ta ha li tc ca si ys ee ng
jo rr yr rv un fe co hi it iv re th
me uc ex in ne gh te es yr fo si il re so ro sk ss op in ro lu sl se kd ur di
sd se sw th go il th ud on is do ds pa ro ne in er ig lu pc ty
ea po ic np ar mn el qu at
ul ce od tw le
ct ly ta ol to na ve en av gh ta eb es de op on in re ac rs ne fo se or ep eb dn la fr as ne
co il de an he un es of ma ve eg yy ha to al an pc
ou to ta en ri we bi em ar nt ss ov ak ia bt es ff gc it th ot th ag io ay in en ta on in li at nm da ro bu rc co pt il et er ea un le lu in eb
ie an ic la ch of do
ol go st nn mu oo ol is in ee le un oo or ct ll su ai ju ap ri te ht db ea sn et te ie tl ro et ic si fu ih es al st ti co it ds eb ea in ud se yh ul ll on av dd of
nj pm si hi ai it rh di et
ar nd te ld tn eu er fo tt ns ns he ow ur de ft ur sy
av th er yb
el rt es os di to pe sb re it ra xx ca an ut ks is ad it uy ac yr
us ul re ch ub ea lk ty un ub de on
se ci es ni te hn es mu so ct se ed ay an ch zo co em ki pr ro ch rb or us
ra ic nd
uc mm if
ng ti ys cc ls th ca kt or ho di tr mw fo ha hc il rg ev io ag ot ht ie th ol ch or pl td as th nf bo vi nt ar tu un ew it ag ss ck gh ot en ox ur ap tr ec hi oo av tu di at ap ai de il rs se pa
se il in an du es sf le ch as st ho ba ta se ct my ec fl
to sl af ip ov in mp sh
ef an tt at le an da ea la de bm mo et an de of eg en st is et ar ke bo re te ek in ic th le ns lt in ne pr he ar ec om il el tu hm um sv ke iv oc lw ex uc wa an on dd cl ma nu ma ns ey fu ta ys ce nt bm ns iv en nf kn le ho tc ci ed he ot ar ec eo th so to ex te ex te on mi on mp ph ic ls at in sr bu ip ha ad ti ch ou or he ch ry wc by th ol ct tx
ha is
an ni en ga el nd cl du th ge po al un th em we ti tn ed ft se re in
li ne ft ac ak fi ti
on un us ve
ev se ga ut ss
hu te rk ew th uc ou ny yl th ee ad ki es ro nt er op ed ho vi ec nt ow ps co ct ot br yo an gh ti tt pa hb xp th ed th te ur re ed ra de rs th ro ye dn ta he st nc oo rp ed bl am me ty st as
ig ct po dd me to ke rl ti on ap ob at nf es ta or
tr ur th ar hp sk th le it cu ra th at es ri er ou ov he wo sh ea nt ec rg he co mo rs vi hi no so ur ga es uc no to st ts st up he mb lo dt yd it ia nd iv la si el gu or el as ro ar
ic nf ia or ni in or re in st ns se ll rn er xm es in in ti at ua or ni ur io li la on th tp di or ol hi um ri in os ri nd gu wa ny st tl tt rs ug er in ew gu ew ti eh li ew th no ty ow lr
xa nd od to ui si th ri mi se si si ss ai nn ss ay wi
ht ma en ac es at rd tr cu ns if dr ra ag or en he ce or he po ns th ho hf ay co ha be na it nt in sa at dc ha ra pe om
st ru le
vo le an lc ee en le lm ec an li ed ba ix ar na
at wi ni so ct jo
fa ka or es an lo it th nd sh ll ed di di ss ly nt ne as nt he co ol eh at st ag bl ch ut
gr em
ls va cl en rm ch ri us al et ri ro ac al ag ua uv ma ar sh ns ei ca me da tt tw st yt er
pi ot io ta is ub to eg ne di li on am he at mu me so my of ur hr ht
lc on hi am pr at or un id pl ur ed st ie da ed us ac ho yc ma ey nt tt fi ro rv or
es ol or pe he if am so he me ld uc du on in vo sp se io mb tu or ti li st er ea em
ey pr rw te en er pa tc at er sa hi er nc ma nt on
bs rc ec eo ar og pm sw on ma no na ch at be ur th po ai en
th ad
bl im sh an ag or ts wi te ag er nd di nt ti xt la mo pr ew ve iv ma ea ar vi ri sd tp id ni up ad pf ca ur ir ir an ic of ti or rm an co ce co ng bl rg kt he to re ha ou es es in ei na ng ri nd es qu ie ds bu er st er et mt
bu ea
er es ro ss ft or th in we ol da th sp oe el te th
er
pi ou me ie an oi lb on ng lt me om he ra la er ev to vi al to of th ui ya ti ns cu ho hr io to an on le io he ad da ng dc se of tt be ng ga ar nc ti ws in nt re ar em nw sf ov nd ra
to of er dg lt
al th ds en ba ug ec fr af ou in es ni at rt am co
de
se ou ni vi nd ud de re in it em en et ra ee te st ss oe or ws of ge an ip ro op
af is im ns sc td at tr yo an ym oo st de en is ir nh ch ou cs eo tr du il ct nt
wi ut us ro li cu bl my ya aw tu fi ms in ab es av re fm il ti em or he pi nt or ol as nt ta df po at et am it kn ad rv me ne nt to oc de li eo on rs rk th ra us os eb er it st ad ua gh co
ut it nt ip re ez ti ho ni uk gb ho
ly ti es ec im te hi ic ho en
mo ig ea fe au nt al ro ot lu li us li ac er so ut ia on id
up ro od th he us ou ve ck tt ju ds yo
li ut en ho re co ka co ld tr
at el he ec ue al in ii
in fo er mp qu am ss ti st it ns po ov na or vi sh rl sp ng we gt
nc ms to ia al ex ti ly nc
ty es iu gr ca en es on ra iv ph hu ma nm th ic bu ll av on it so es ro st om ai ti ed br ro mp ct ad ra sc ic on vi in dj sh di ac es tt ef up de lu ng ni at ec yi ma su
ti
ic al tm rd nc ar ob ab sb ub ue ti hy er ds dv be ns mo ff pm ch ew al se di in av ra st tt es ew ws na me yo db os us ns ob sp ar su me ad ti oa re al ip rs da is yn ar ri ll cc te as ge ng ns ti ra ad ic ou ti an ac is
ar fs at ng in ne yo gt tu st ou pi io ll hi mr he gr or tu at to ne io pr ny km tw ri la ts jo co le ft li ew io we el cc at of th eg ms li us ar ma or ee at ct
ta th as vi to tu dl su al en ou rv io ts mi le ma to nc da ne lo ch ho sa or wr rc ca th az re me mo
ib ur be to ru oc to un un
ui he at ne ec iz ng or tr lp ar st ha ru co ng nd ke
el ia im rn ch to it
ob ni is in rm es en
ce ve ly th ic wi re ce
he eo la sk er ce as at ep sa ki pi ry ir bi ta ns ch he ra rt th tg es br ne
eg es es oy he es ai is
nt nt
mi th ce ya as ce pr fa tw at ct de sy iv pi ow gu fa um et ur oc th
od ve ir ng io rc he nl ma sc sp se cs om lo ns ue om an pl pa ub nh es ra he co ti oo rn
ki ha yo dt ig ve ef op ui yw al ow in on in ng re la
ve an em ok ts io ma on oa ma ti an th uy
ec rm io te ot gr
rc ma ie et an it he em st lt ua dy is ph pr ro bl ew
ut nk tt ey si la wh yp nt ft nt aa ti fl pp ea
st ex vo re il fp od of lo th ro wo ma po ba dt ar ow ua lu au ot to ch ri da sp il os ur ur gt is er es ut as ti gg ly tu ce th at ru ri nt fo te ig sh ti te li an ve tc to at eg ed
nu am te dh pr em ls ug or ma se er ol ou ot di nf co ep er ro nc dp se re us ta ab ga
ph ar tw ad th id ct bl ex ci ge rw be on ng in et if en by ue ty gn ur ce ye an re da
to le st nd dl ks re st
on si re th ti re as cc ti de rp du ca re at as ys ev on sr wh er ic qu fy tp ia ew ca rt en pt nt de th ow me ea us
in of
zi
ea ec to ti tt se th
en ou ti ve op em ck df re ar
nv pr iv ou ng ib ar es ff rc ej li he an co an id cd ow ng ve as to dv be sh go me ff st da um nt nt or ic nr yw yu in nt rw xt eo ri dw er of is an it ho le sg es ou th ac
or ds st ni
ti fe ri st lo en er ts es es ro ta us mm bi rs in mb el re fe nt ng re nf dn um eo an va th to rm at on ev to fa el
du yg ay ai ch nh al th ni pr on li ti nd te du rm to as im ze on up ne te co ed th sb ed ro ic
sc rt un ng ie is wi ai ns es ik as li gr ec he co
me ri
fu ar be pl tr ir fi et ot el rr
ms le wo vs is ca co ri fe at rd ge wo an po ur st ri ls em ca ay ra to ar in la am le na yc yo cc ou oc an ai lt me tj
fo im sw er es or ut at rg er ig ou bo al ti pl li sa or es on mo as at nc ll pa fo se um
sc le ec ls kg dr ac ir at dt sa oi ea he ti li em si
nk
ig ow in sa pa
ew ed aa le ar il ud of er ly is me he cy ow ea cr is ir he om ac ur on st tc li ca id ay op pp fr wn at tk at se ss en pa se ou te wn ou em ow at de pr un we rb ly fe us et ty ut ce re up on le je ut by am ff la ct ne ai rr ch no ou do id as tu sa hr ne td de ce ec ta ar yt te ts an fl su ol el at or cl yi ic no er de di ee of iz ou ad ht eg mp dy re sm ht na ot na yt nd ri mp on st tn im nt an nl et ho go di fu id ei nt pi es lo wt
co co ag of cs vi ti on eh ti il
he
am pr ve sq si ch su em he du ev sa te
ee ce ns ir nf en rt so ti ne it re so ry ot ah on om ic dd yo at te be al ci np at so
la ve ri ak es gi no
ip ea es or yc mo li te na it th nd ha iv ai so no ar nc cu se ei do yr to to re ch ed in fo da he oc il im ur er ei ve sg do ho ho pl ar th ca ss ef di im ro th il ir wh ei nw ag ou th wo ch np hi se ma hl es ou ou ti ed po ex so ne st or ti er as ce me sh on
ay at nd la fi db ty ss am et do dk oa ec mi bl sa nt ru or si em he ad lo fe se za wa on ld io fr sa je re la ei on ea rf ge se th to ba rf re un fi re in en ng an na
su it la es de ua es le oo to ny av ag la is em ti ur di ut ve th
de rr an am os io in si el to
sa in ti dv om gi os rs ce ho re lo om si em et hw ft na ic
yp to se ya ad on or al og uc at it ad sc al ed es de rc ab ta ss op ub ut rp re th ed re am ig bu er at ti bi si re bo ic oo er nl ur es or an kh ep rh ty of ol it at ar gr uf om lo le et fi it ss et fr oh no ec si ud mo rt ni fi ou ma st ab sa hi bo df lo ll il ot it re gh jo th es wo ia nb et be oc me de ar hs ks ul ve in yn en ed md pp co ec et ut mp co le st at it wa te ty in me lb fi ca en
re
ta ga gh ut re ro ti is fi fe st nb in am su ie ll ut en ds ir ay ck gh pa es ro er or zi nc up ra aw ki in ag ha in je of cy li dm sh om ll ot he nt st as su ex ed ac on ng eb at nt in al ev do ac in se ce at in pe pt nd is de wh me be ve st ap de te of ew if th ge rd dr nt de un on py eo ad tb in rs ts in ju er di ne an er is pe my ik nd ep ta il ow ty de er ra ff ob dd ck se eh dm im
ot ng op in nd
wl re we bo bo is ie or ls an ro ai op en al ri em ig ll te ns ch ti ty
in el id be rc nd sh nt
dg es xe re am ut
cr
sa rt wh mo
ha hd ia es rt ab
ut pt id gu ma hi hi un io mi hi ip ul ha ic to it cy ij he xc is ng en dc em an rs es re ho st ac hi it yt ed ma fo sb ob yf ct ho iz re nt pt so ec bo wi am ms ss on lv or ve in re we cl is sa hi oy tr en la mc io on fn an ht yd al rt
by hi at ra ur nd fo te ta th be na ha nd ep ri mo on ch ed kb
re ev re nt rf
ye us nc ca th lo li os of an
nr
ng wh al ss th ik ha ya at ac il an no ef vi ss el ew ve jo kp yl ee ay tw th tu
ce xp it ew
ll ll we th ec dt re te rs ee et st sp al ms ul tt ge an pr ns ba gn ci ca pi ed og gu nc an fa
ac ha bd er er bl
as nl wb
ex ll nd nc fi
th lo sw ns si to he ia ag ca at tu is fo in of pe ri re no or le ll eo yp
en in om ea or ta to nd te ma ew fi
gr er ra ie ee le il il th ro to ha ho it rt ds rs ic pu in on ec rd ed ou wn in er ic wn
un
at sc ro ss
es ir ri al as on pe su us th ve ni co ar in te ts nv fi on el os di li ce us
es in or nd mp at gs fu fo ne ra nt of eb th er ap df eb rn li ca th ie ys ly
av ts in ry sm er er ng he ma ot rs an ga an nt ti Scientific Papers (www.scientificpapers.org)
Journal of Knowledge Management, Economics and Information Technology

1
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
Determining the Level of Blended e-
Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model 1
Author: Marilou IOAKIMIDIS, Assistant Professor, University of
 Peloponnese and Visiting Professor, National and
 Kapodistrian University of Athens, Greece
At a time when e-learning is increasingly being employed as an educational
alternative to traditional face-to-face learning, there is evidence that the
preferable educational mode may actually be blended learning, which is a
combination of e-learning and face-to-face learning. To date, little research
appears to have been done on the costs incurred by an educational program
that is transitioning from a wholly traditional system to one that may
include both e-learning and face-to-face classes. This paper presents a cost
minimization model for adjusting the mixture of e-learning and face-to-face
learning in a university program moving from a wholly traditional to a
blended-learning model. Given several basic assumptions, we derive a model
for the distribution of face-to-face and e-learning that minimizes the total
cost for both students and the institution. We present an application of the
model and draw conclusions.

Keywords: Blended learning, Distance/ e-learning, Cost Minimization,
Assignment Problem.

1 The author would like to thank Dr. Y. Smirlis for his invaluable contribution and ideas in the
technical part of this paper.
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

2
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
Introduction

Knowledge management includes the basic educational mission of
determining the best strategies for transmitting knowledge to students so
they are well prepared for future employment. Given new and emerging
technologies that enable e-learning, a number of studies have focused on the
strengths and weaknesses of this mode of learning in respect to fulfilling the
educational mission. However, limited research has been reported on the
theoretical analysis of the costs incurred by a transition from a wholly face-
to-face (f2f) university-based program to a successful technology-facilitated
off-campus study program that includes e-learning classes.
 The main objective of the present study is to provide a model for
analysing the replacement of all or part of a university program, that has
until now been taught using traditional means, with e-learning, with a focus
on how to minimise costs implicated in the transition phase. In Section 2,
we present an overview of studies that examine the present educational
situation. In Section 3, there is an analysis of our model for cost
minimization in the university, and in Section 4, we examine the application
of the model and present certain results. Section 5 presents conclusions.
Literature review
Traditionally, higher education students have attended classes in physical
classrooms face-to-face (f2f) with instructors, while in distance education
students take classes outside the traditional classroom (Narodowski, Nores,
& Manolakis, 2002). Today, distance learning is being revolutionized by
information and communication technologies in the form of e-learning,
which offers considerable convenience and flexibility to the student (LaBay
& Comm, 2003). The primary tools of e-learning are technological, including
computers, the Internet, and digital storage and playback devices (Keller &
Cenerud, 2002), enabling access to learning programs at any time via
computer (Raymond, 2000). These tools drive change to which universities
must respond by becoming more flexible (Jones & O'Shea, 2004). Indeed,
Oakley (1997) suggested that universities that do not respond are likely to
become obsolete.
 However, responding appropriately to the new technology does not
entail that universities should convert their educational systems entirely to
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

3
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
e-learning. Many commentators note that distance/e-learning does not fully
substitute for traditional education. Teacher-student interactions are crucial
in higher education (McCain, 2002), and a great deal of learning occurs in
the classroom between students (Bose, 2003). Thus, traditional and e-
learning need not be seen as alternatives (Cedefop, 2001); rather, universities
should consider mixing the best possibilities of f2f and distance/e-learning
(Ess, 2003). This blended approach, in which the institution combines
traditional f2f education and e-learning, can provide increased flexibility to
educators (Linkaityte, Valiuskeviciute, Cubajevaite, & Zilinskaite, 2005).
 Insofar as e-learning modes are combined with traditional f2f or
classroom learning, the term "blended learning" can be applied (Bentley,
Selassie, & Parkin 2012). Blended learning has been considered to constitute
a new paradigm for education (Chen & Yao, 2016) and has been proposed as
the most attractive and effective approach for learning (Gunter 2001). A
recent meta-analysis of research on the effectiveness of e-learning and
blended learning in comparison to f2f instruction suggests that overall,
students in blended learning programs have better outcomes than those
who learn solely in face-to-face settings (Means, Toyama, Murphy, Bakia, &
Jones, 2010). Moreover, studies suggest that higher education students prefer
blended learning to solely online learning (Precel et al., 2009, Ioakimidis et
al., 2011).
 In choosing how to blend traditional and e-learning, the particular
instructional task should determine the mix (Linkaityte et al., 2005).
Educators must understand that course design and instructional design are
extremely important parts of e-learning. Because e-learners must generally
work alone, they may feel isolated (McInnerney & Roberts, 2004).
Conversely, student perceptions of the presence of other students and the
instructor in e-learning have been found to be associated with learning
satisfaction (Russo & Benson, 2004). Moreover, social communication
appears to be as important in e-learning as in the traditional classroom
(Peters, 1998). Thus, in designing e-learning coursework, special attention
should be paid to facilitating student-student and student-instructor
communication. Here again, the value of blended learning surfaces because
it enables the e-learner to have face-to-face contact with fellow students and
the instructor. Even when most of the coursework is done via e-learning,
having at least a few face-to-face meetings may be valuable. For example,
Hodgkinson (2002) found that e-learning students provided with the
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

4
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
opportunity for f2f orientation believed it would help them in class
participation.
 Due to increased competition, there is substantial pressure on
higher education institutions to be more cost-effective in the delivery of
services (Whitaker, 2003). However, there is disagreement on whether
application of technology will decrease costs for most universities. Simmons
(2001) maintained that distance education through e-learning provides
questionable economic benefits for universities, and Ruth (2006) held that
with current university staffing norms, there are serious financial drawbacks
for traditional schools. On the other hand, Whitaker (2003) held that the
appropriate use of technology can help conserve needed institutional
resources. For example, use of a blended approach that requires less physical
classroom time from students can financially benefit the institution by
freeing up classrooms and reducing new building costs (Ruth, 2006).
Whichever side is correct, the argument may be moot, for all universities are
in fact using blended approaches to some degree, as f2f education and e-
learning converge (Bose, 2003).
 Indeed, e-learning has become a necessity (Ruth, 2006), and it is
imperative for institutions of higher education to understand the costs of its
various implementations. While this is difficult due to constantly changing
technology (Wentling & Park, 2002), various costing models have been
proposed. These include the University of Virginia Distance Learning Cost
Model (ICASIT, 2001). Use of the model suggests that costs per course
section vary widely, but that courses and programs become more cost
effective with increased enrollment, decreased use of space, and reliance on
part-time faculty after development of content.
 Levin and Woo (1981) suggested the following procedure for
estimating the cost effectiveness of educational technologies: list resources,
determine costs for each resource based on actual costs or estimated market
values, and convert costs into analytical categories, such as annualized costs
and marginal costs. Laurillard (2006) held that a cost-benefit modeling tool
should define benefits and associated cost parameters, focus on staff time
costs, represent learner value in terms of time use, represent technology-
specific benefits and improvements in learning, and support local
exploration of the cost-benefit relationship. Another costing model
considers institutional costs of e-learning under three heads: developing
web-based materials, delivery, and initial overhead costs (Rumble, 2001).
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

5
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
 None of these models had the objective of analysing the costs of
replacing all or part of a program that had been taught using traditional
means with e-learning. The present paper focuses on this issue, including
how to minimize costs in the transition phase.
The model for adjusting the level of blended curriculum
design based on total cost
The cost-minimization model for adjusting the mixture of e-learning and f2f
educational procedures takes into consideration some basic assumptions.
There must be an educational institution offering a program divided into a
number of courses or learning modules. A number of students registered to
the program have to attend these courses, some of which are compulsory
and some optional. The institution has established the required background
technology to support asynchronous e-learning in an efficient way. We
assume that there exists a computer center with appropriate web,
application, and database servers; a learning management system; and
lessons in electronic format for all the offered courses. The computer center
has technical staff and programmers for developing the educational
material. The operational costs for running this e-learning centre and for
developing the e-learning modules, although significant, are regarded as
common to all the other educational activities of the institution and does
not affect directly the cost of the program under consideration. However,
this setup requires a minimum number of courses to be given by e-learning,
thus comprising one of the parameters of the model. For better
implementation of the instructional design of the program, some specific
courses of it should be offered by f2f. The rest can be offered both as f2f or e-
learning.
 The model considers as important some cost factors that are on the
part of both the student and the institution. These are dedicated either to e-
learning or to the f2f type of courses/learning modules. For the institution
only direct costs for the particular program are considered. Other
operational costs for running the institution are regarded as indifferent for
the model. Costs considered in the model are course/module dependent. For
a typical course, the cost factors are shown in Table 1.

Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

6
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
Table 1: Cost factors encountered in the model
Cost
Factor
Name
Burden Learning
Type
Description
C 1 E-tutor payment Institution e-Learning Gross payment for the e-
tutor in a typical course,
expressed in € per hour.
C 2 Instructor's
payment
Institution f2f Gross payment for the
instructor in a f2f
course. Expressed in €
per hour.
C 3 Student fee Student e-Learning Fee determined by the
license fee if the e-
Learning course/module
is obtained by leasing or
as the depreciated
amount that the
institution has paid for
the development of the
course.
C 4 Educational
material
Institution f2f Fee for distribution of
printed books,
handouts, etc. to
students. This is a
variable cost dependent
on the particular
module.
C 5 Internet
connection/
communication
costs
Student e-Learning Cost for Internet
connection per lesson
hour. (Only applied for
synchronous and
asynchronous e-
learning, not for
computer based
learning or training).
C 6 Daily expenses Student f2f Transportation and
other personal costs –
dependent on the hours
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

7
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
of f2f classes.
C 7 Opportunity cost Student f2f Only for f2f. No cost for
asynchronous e-
learning.

 For implementation of the model, a number of parameters are
needed to express the information required and the restrictions of the
problem. These are presented in Table 2.

Table 2: The parameters of the model
Parameter Description
k Number of courses to be offered either as f2f or as e-learning.
min
k
Minimum number of courses/modules to be offered via e-
learning.
i
n Number of students registered for the course/module i . We
assume that
i
n is such that only one class is required.
f
i
h
Total hours for attending a course/module if it is offered in f2f
environment.
e
i
h
Total hours for attending a course/module if it is offered via
e-learning
i
t Number of e-tutors required, depending on the particular e-
learning course/module i .

 The model is formulated as an "assignment problem," which is one
of the fundamental optimization problems in the field of operational
research (Munkres, 1957, Algorithms and Theory of Computation Handbook,
1999). An assignment problem attempts to assign workers to tasks,
considering a cost function for each particular assignment. In our case, the
workers are the courses/modules and the task is the association of a
course/module to the e-learning or the f2f method of delivering it. The cost
involved in the two cases is the cost for both students and the institution, as
it is estimated for each particular course/module, when its characteristics
described in Table 1 are taken into account. The assignment should
minimize the total cost function for all the courses/modules.
 Following the terminology and the formulation of the assignment
problem, we define
i
x as a binary variable to distinguish whether the
course/module should be offered f2f or with e-learning method. If the
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

8
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
course/module i is offered as e-learning, then 1
i
x  ; otherwise, for the case
of f2f, 0
i
x  .
 In each course i , a number of
i
n students may be registered, no
matter if this course is defined as compulsory or optional. The total number
of teaching hours in e-learning and f2f cases is represented by ,
e f
i i
h h
respectively.
 The total cost for both students and institution is analyzed as
follows.
 For the f2f case, the cost put on the part of the institution, say f
i
C ,
is the cost for instructors' payroll, i.e.,
2
f
i
h c , and the cost for production and
distribution of educational materials such as books, handouts, etc., which is
proportional to the number of students, i.e.,
4 i
n c . The cost for the student is
analyzed as an average amount for daily expenses (transportation, food, etc.)
plus the opportunity cost (measured in an hourly basis), which is
6 7
f
i i
n c h c  . From the above, the total cost that derives for the f2f part is
2 4 6 7
f f f
i i i i i
C h c n c n c h c     .
 For the case of e-learning (asynchronous), the cost which overloads
a student is the cost for Internet/communication services measured by the
hours spent in front of the computer, i.e.,
5
e
i
h c , plus the special fee for
entering the e-learning course
3 i
n c (and maybe to attend an orientation
course). That is,
3 5
e
i i
n c h c  . The cost for the institution is the cost for the
e-tutors for the total hours of teaching and supervision, i.e.,
1
e
i i
h t c (we
assume that an e-learning class should have such a number of students that
will require
i
t e-tutors for the whole class). The cost for the e-learning
module is now set to
1 3 5
e e e
i i i i i
C h t c n c h c    .
 As there is no initial information available about the distribution of
the courses/modules between f2f and e-learning, and the model is free to be
assigned to both instructional methods, there must be a restriction for the
minimum level of e-learning involvement expressing the need for the
institution to support its setup for e-learning. This is expressed by the
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

9
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
formula
min
1
k
i
i
x k

  , in which the parameter
min
k , (
min i
k n  ) is known at
the beginning of the assignment process.

 Considering all the above, the following linear integer programming
model is derived.

 
1
min
1
2 4 6 7
1 3 5
min ( (1 ))
. .
0,1
( )
k
e f
i i i i
i
k
i
i
i
f f f
i i i i
e e e
i i i i i
C C x C x
s t
x k
x
C h c n c c h c
C h t c n c h c


  


   
  

 (1)

 In model (1), , 1,..,
i
x i k  are unknown variables to be estimated
and, according to the minimization procedure, the total cost C is to be
formed accordingly. If 0
i
x  , i.e., when course/module i is assigned to
f2f, the term e
i i
C x will be zero, so only the cost f
i
C defined in the second
term will be considered. Accordingly, when 1
i
x  (course/module i is
assigned to e-learning), the second term (1 )
f
i i
C x  will be zero and only
the corresponding to e-learning cost e
i
C will be added to the total cost.
When model (1) is solved, the distribution between f2f and e-learning that
minimizes the total cost for both students and the institution is derived.
An application of the model
To demonstrate the model, in this section we present an application
concerning a 2 years postgraduate program (3 semesters course studies + 1
semester dissertation writing) in the field of business administration and
economics offered by a Greek university. That particular program consists of
17 different courses/modules among which are Business Statistics,
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

10
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
Managerial Economics, Macroeconomics, Management and Marketing,
Project Management, Business Strategy & Policy, Financial Accounting,
Strategic IS, Human Resources Management, etc. Twelve of the offered
courses/modules are compulsory and the other 5 are optional, from which
students have to choose three courses/modules. For each one of the
modules a number of students is registered. In order an elective course to be
offered a minimum of 10 students is required to select it. For the compulsory
modules the number of students is 35.
 The required data and the parameters of the model are presented in
Table 3.
Table 3: Data and the parameters of the model
Course/
Module he hf n t C1 C2 C3 C4 C5 C6 C7
1 18 18 35 2 810 1530 120 60 42 48 53
2 15 21 35 2 675 1785 130 60 51 41 62
3 21 15 35 2 945 1275 75 30 34 55 44
4 19 36 35 2 855 3060 80 120 37 26 106
5 15 21 35 2 675 1785 90 60 48 41 62
6 20 21 35 2 900 1785 100 60 37 41 62
7 15 10 35 2 675 850 110 45 49 85 30
8 24 12 35 2 1080 1020 120 30 31 69 35
9 14 18 35 1 630 1530 90 60 52 48 53
10 18 18 35 1 810 1530 80 35 40 46 53
11 36 30 35 1 1620 2550 110 40 21 28 89
12 18 18 35 1 810 1530 100 60 41 48 53
13 8 10 19 2 360 850 90 100 90 90 30
14 10 12 21 2 450 1020 140 120 77 77 35
15 10 10 18 2 450 850 75 30 71 83 30
16 12 12 28 2 540 1020 90 55 60 71 35
17 14 12 19 2 630 1020 80 60 51 72 35

 For the estimation of the cost factors involved, the following
arrangements have been made.
 The e-tutor payment (cost factor C1) is estimated at up to 45€ per
hour (according to the average monthly wage of an e-tutors in
Greece).
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

11
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
 The instructor payment in f2f (cost factor C2) is estimated at 85€ per
hour (according to the average monthly wage of an instructor in
Greece).
 The cost (fee) for entering an e-learning course/module (cost factor
C3) depends on the particular course and its duration. It ranges
between 75€ and 140€.
 The cost for educational material, C4, depends on the size and the
type of the course/module. It ranges between 30€ and 120€.
 The cost category C5 represents mostly the Internet connection fees
that a student must pay in order to have full access to the distance/
e-learning environment of the university. This depends on the hours
required for attending an e-learning course/module.
 Cost category C6 consists of the daily expenses that a student
following a traditional course of study will face. This last category
includes costs like transportation or monthly rental of a house-
apartment in case the university is located far from his/her
hometown etc and is calculated on an hourly basis.
 Finally, cost category C7 represents the value of lost productivity or
in other words the lost remunerated productivity of students who
potentially would enter the job market if they did not continue their
studies (we assume that an employed graduate student will earn at
least the minimum wage for this case, so in an 8 hour workday we
can calculate his hourly opportunity cost which is approximately
€2.95). It must be pointed out that opportunity cost to those who
study remotely and in an asynchronous base is considered to be
close to zero, if not zero, as these students study from their home
and may be able to generate some income in addition to following a
course of studies remotely.
 All numbers of the above cost categories are based on equivalent
figures that are reported in several Greek studies (Ioakimidis, 2007) and also
from the Greek ministry of Education, Research and Religious Affairs (2012).
Model (1) is solved by using the data of Table 3 and by setting . The obtained
results are presented in Table 4. According to these results, five
courses/modules (1, 3, 7, 8, and 17) are chosen to be offered as f2f and the
rest as e-learning.

Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

12
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
Table 4: The resulting distribution for the courses/modules of the
programme
Code E-Learning / f2f
1 f2f
2 e-learning
3 f2f
4 e-learning
5 e-learning
6 e-learning
7 f2f
8 f2f
9 e-learning
10 e-learning
11 e-learning
12 e-learning
13 e-learning
14 e-learning
15 e-learning
16 e-learning
17 f2f

 The total cost for all the courses/ modules is set to C = 421.242€,
while if all the courses/modules were chosen as f2f, the total cost would be
579.385€. The cost if all courses were offered via e-learning would be
450.217€.
Conclusions
Even if universities and colleges are taking a sober approach to the
implementation of technological means of learning, distance education,
especially in the form of e-learning, has generated a revolution in many of
the ways in which education is delivered, without fundamentally changing
the very nature of learning itself. In fact, distance learning works best when
it enters the production function without changing pre-existing educational
models: the tools have changed, but the outcome remains fundamentally the
same. It should be strongly affirmed that e-learning and classroom-based
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

13
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
methods of training are not necessarily alternatives to each other and may
be complementary. While for suppliers of training, greater use of e-learning
goes with less use of classroom-based methods, for users this is much less
the case (Cedefop, 2001).
 One should never assume that change must be absolute. For each
program that has the potential to be offered online, a "mix and match"
approach may be taken, combining the most suitable aspects of traditional
and electronic learning respectively. As Owen et al. (2004) state, "it is
possible to mimic the richness of a traditional in-class experience when we
move to online course applications but ... we need to know exactly what is
being lost (or gained) with respect to educational outcomes."
 The model described in this paper could serve as a decision making
aid as well, especially in the case when a potential university manager has to
evaluate university programs or courses offered in different environments
aiming cost minimization.
References
[1]. Algorithms and Theory of Computation Handbook, CRC Press LLC,
(1999), "assignment problem", in Dictionary of Algorithms and Data
Structures, in Vreda Pieterse and Paul E. Black, eds. 16 May 2005.
Available from: https://www.nist.gov/dads/HTML/assignment.html
[2]. Y. Bentley, H. Selassie & E. Parkin, Evaluation of a global blended
learning MBA programme. The International Journal of
Management Education ,10 (2012) 75–87
[3]. K. Bose, An e-learning experience—A written analysis based on my
experience in an e-learning pilot project. Campus-Wide Information
Systems, 20(5) 2003, 193-199.
[4]. Cedefop. E-learning and training in Europe: A survey into the use of
e-learning in training and professional development in the
European Union. Cedefop Reference Series, 26. 2001 Luxembourg:
Office for Official Publications of the European Communities.
[5]. W.S.Chen, & A.Y.T.Yao, An empirical evaluation of critical factors
influencing learner satisfaction in blended learning: A pilot study.
Universal Journal of Educational Research 4(7) 2016: 1667-1671. DOI:
10.13189/ujer.2016.040719
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

14
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
[6]. C. Ess, Liberal arts and distance education: Can Socratic virtue
(arête) and Confucius' exemplary person (junzi) be taught online?
Arts & Humanities in Higher Education, 2(2) 2003, 117-137.
[7]. G.A. Gunter, "Making a difference: Using emerging technologies and
teaching strategies to restructure an undergraduate technology
course for pre-service teachers". Educational Media International,
38(1) 2001, 13–20
[8]. M. Hodgkinson, Student perceptions of face-to-face induction for
on-line programmes, Quality Assurance in Education, 10(4) 2002,
207-212.
[9]. ICASIT Develops Cost Model for Distance Learning, The Mason
Gazette https://gazette.gmu.edu/articles/2427 International Center
for Applied Studies in Information Technology (ICASIT), (2001)
[10].M. Ioakimidis "Online or On Campus: A Student Tertiary Education
Cost Model Comparing the Two, with a Quality Proviso". Higher
Education in Europe, UNESCO-CEPES (The European Centre for
Higher Education), Vol. 32, Issue 2 & 3, October 2007, pp. 249-260.
[11]. M. Ioakimidis, Y. Smirlis, J. Hassid, "Analysing costs of educational
services for universities and e-universities: A further analysis on the
student point of view", in Jόrgen Backhaus, Raul Eamets, Diana
Eerma (Eds.) Economics of Education: Issues of Transition and
Transformation 2011
[12]. N. Jones, & J. O'Shea, Challenging hierarchies: the impact of e-
learning. Higher Education 48 2004, 379-395.
[13]. C. Keller & L. Cenerud, Students' perceptions of e-learning in
university education, Journal of Educational Media, 27(1/2) 2002, 55-
67.
[14]. D.G. LaBay & C.L. Comm, A case study using gap analysis to assess
distance learning versus traditional course delivery, The
International Journal of Educational Management, 17(7) 2003, 312-
317.
[15]. D. Laurillard, D, Modelling benefits-oriented costs for technology
enhanced learning. Higher Education, 54 2006, 21-39.
[16]. H.M. Levin & L. Woo, An evaluation of the costs of
computer-assisted instruction. Economics of Education Review, 1(1)
1981, 1-25.
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

15
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
[17]. G. Linkaityte, A. Valiuskeviciute, L. Cubajevaite, & L. Zilinskaite, E
learning as a mean for transition of Higher education towards the
paradigm of lifelong learning. Proceedings EDEN annual
conference Helsinki, 2005
[18].J. M. McInnerney & T. S.Roberts, Online learning: Social interaction
and the creation of a sense of community. Educational Technology
& Society, 7(3) 2004, 73–81.
[19]. B. Means, Y. Toyama, R. Murphy, M. Bakia, & K. Jones,
Evaluation of evidence-based practices in online learning: A meta-
analysis and review of online learning studies. DC: Washington: U.S.
Department of Education, 2010. Available from: http://www2.ed.
gov/rschstat/eval/tech/evidence-based-practices/finalreport.pdf
[20]. J. Munkres, Algorithms for the Assignment and
Transportation Problems. Journal of the Society for Industrial and
Applied Mathematics Vol. 5, No. 1957, pp. 32-38
[21]. M. Narodowski, M. Nores & L. Manolakis, Policies in education
concerning new information technologies: learning from Latin
America and Argentina, Education, Communication & Information,
2(2/3) 2002, 181-214.
[22]. B. Oakley, 'Will universities survive the knowledge
economy?', Interface, IEEE Newsletter, April 1997, p. 72.
[23]. O. Peters, Learning and Teaching in Distance Education
1998, London, Kogan Page.
[24]. K. Precel, Y. Eshet-Alkalai, Y. Alberton, Pedagogical and
design aspects of a blended learning course. The International
Review of Research in Open and Distributed Learning, 10(2) 2009,
Available from:
http://www.irrodl.org/index.php/irrodl/article/view/618/1221
[25]. F. B. Raymond, Delivering distance education through
technology: a pioneer's experience, Campus-Wide Information
Systems, 17(1) 2000, 49-55.
[26]. G. Rumble, The costs and costing of networked learning.
JALN, 5(2) 2001, 75-96.
[27]. T. Russo, & S. Benson, Learning with invisible others:
Perceptions of online presence and their relationship to cognitive
and affective learning, Educational Technology & Society, 8 (1) 2005,
54-62.
Determining the Level of Blended e-Learning Using a Cost Optimization Model

16
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
[28]. J. R. Simmons, Distance learning: Education or economics?
International Journal of Value-Based Management, 14 2001, 147-159.
[29]. T.L. Wentling, & J.H. Park, Cost analysis of e-Learning: A
case study of a university program. In T. M. Egan, & S.A Lynham,
(Eds.). Proceedings of the Academy of Human Resource
Development 2002 (pp 27-4), Bowling Green, OH: Academy of
Human Resource Development.
[30]. G. Whitaker, Jr., Cost effective use of technology in
teaching: Challenges and Opportunities 2003. Available from
https://net.educause.edu/ir/library/pdf/ffp9806.pdf
Scientific Papers (www.scientificpapers.org)
Journal of Knowledge Management, Economics and Information Technology

1
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance
in Construction Project Delivery in Akure,
Ondo State, Nigeria
Authors: Olanipekun Emmanuel Abiodun, Department of
 Building, Obafemi Awolowo University, Ile-Ife, Osun State,
 Nigeria, eolanipe@oauife.edu.ng; Nunayon Sunday
 Segbenu, Department of Building, Federal University of
 Technology, Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria; Olugboyega
 Oluseye, Department of Building, Obafemi
 Awolowo University, Ile-Ife, Osun State, Nigeria
Most of the construction projects delivered in Akure, Ondo State for public
use depict evidence that they were not successfully executed. These effects
result in time and cost overruns, poor project execution and outright
abandonment. These could be attributed to lack of technical know-how on
specific project types and corruption tendencies amongst others. This study
focuses on factors affecting contractors' performance in construction project
delivery in Akure, Ondo State with a view to enhancing their performance in
construction project delivery. It assesses the success criteria for project
performance in the study area; the causes of non-performance of contractors
in project delivery in the study area; and evaluates factors for improving
contractors' performance in project delivery. A well-structured
questionnaire was used to harness information from construction
stakeholders. Data was analyzed using mean item score and single factor
analysis of variance. The results indicated that the top three criteria for
contractors' performance were completion to time, budget and required
quality. The results also showed that quality related factors, project
management related factors and procurement related factors were factors
affecting contractor's performance the most. Furthermore, the study
revealed that contractors' performance could be improved through
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

2
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
appropriate planning, good leadership and good communication. It was
concluded that to improve performance of contractors on construction
projects, appropriate planning, good leadership and good communication
must be enhanced.

Keywords: contractor performance, Ondo state, construction project
delivery, performance factors.
Introduction

The goal of all parties (owners, consultants, contractors, subcontractors and
suppliers) involved in construction projects in either the public or private is
to successfully complete the project on schedule, within planned budget,
with the highest quality and in the safest manner. Oyedele, (2013), remarked
that construction projects are embarked upon with a view to achieving the
key objectives of cost, schedule while meeting the quality standard initially
set. As noted or revealed by Amade (2014), construction projects in Nigeria
and the world over are confronted with a lot of complexities and ambiguities
due basically to uncertainties in meeting their respective due dates.
Unfortunately, the construction industry in Nigeria witnessed an
unprecedented fall in the standards of construction projects delivery;
Projects were poorly conceived, badly planned and executed
unprofessionally. The life span of most construction projects in Nigeria is
unpredictable as there are many abandoned projects littering everywhere as
a result of poor planning (Oyedele, 2013; Ubani and Ononuju, 2013; Amade,
2014). Most capital projects fail and are abandoned in different stages of
their development, while others that were delivered performed poorly in
delivering intended services. Frequent cases of failed and abandoned public
sector projects are consistently causing serious nightmare to all the
stakeholders within the construction industry (Olapade and Anthony, 2012;
Amade, 2014). Onyekpere (2011) lamented the alarming figures representing
abandoned public sector projects in Nigeria. The Presidential Project
Assessment Committee (PPAC) set up in March 2010, by President Goodluck
Jonathan to look into cases of abandoned Federal Government projects in
Nigeria, reported or indicated that there were about 11,886 abandoned
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

3
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
projects that would require an estimated sum of N7.78 trillion to complete.
Even if the government does not embark on any new project, it will take an
equivalent of over five years budgeting about N1.5 trillion annually to get
them completed bearing in mind the non-inclusion of cost overruns and
delays (Amade, 2014).
 In Akure, Ondo State, most of the construction projects delivered
for public use depict evidence that they were not successfully executed. The
resultant effects were incidences of schedule and cost overruns, low quality
projects and outright abandonment. This could be as a result of lack of
experience from the contractors in executing the projects, lack of the
knowledge in handling specific type of projects and corruptible tendencies
amongst others. With this in mind, it would be interesting to view what
factors project parties consider as important factors for a contractor to be
successful in project delivery. But little research has been done from the
stakeholders' perspective. This study investigates how to improve the
performance of contractor in project delivery perspective.
 An examination of the relevant recent literature indicates that
construction projects are frequently completed with large cost overruns,
extended schedules and quality concerns. There are many reasons and
factors which are attributed to such problem. In US, Long et al., (2004),
remarked that performance problem arise in large construction projects due
to many reasons such as incompetent designers/contractors, poor
estimation and change management, social and technological issues, site
related and improper techniques and tools. Navon (2005) stated that the
main performance problem can be divided into two groups: (a) unrealistic
target setting (i.e. planning) or (b) causes originating from the actual
construction (in many cases for deviation from both sources.
 Generally, performance dimensions may have one or more
indicators and could be influenced by various project characteristics and
stakeholders. In construction project delivery, there are several parties that
affect project performance, one of them is contractor. Greater percentages of
projects are executed by contractors in Nigeria but have largely been met
with poor quality. In Nigeria, the performance of contractors in project
delivery is apparently below expectations. It is not uncommon to have local
projects that are not been completed or significantly delayed. This poor
performance has huge implication in terms of competitiveness. Contractors
perform awfully regarding project delivery due to poor management skills,
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

4
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
lack of technical and professional staff as well as poor skilled and unskilled
labour. While attempting to directly examine and identify their causes as
well as ways to avoid them, many view the client-contractor relationship as
having the greatest impact (Odeh and Bettaineh, 2002).
Literature Review
An examination of relevant literature indicates that most problems
encountered in construction industry are due to contractors' related
problems. Common contractor-related problems are that the project is not
completed or delivered within the specified period; reduced quality; use of
unspecified materials; excessive budgets; unqualified employees safety
problems such as project site accidents. This is no doubt, has significant
negative effect on the productivity of the industry and its contribution to the
GDP (Sharma and Kashiyani, 2015).
 This notwithstanding, the contribution of contractors to
construction industry cannot be overemphasized. Contractors rank among
the most essential and important stakeholders needed in the delivery of
construction projects. The contractor is the building expert and as such
must be capable of delivering a project without a risk being placed on the
client who is saddled with the ownership and occupation risks. Industry
reports such as Latham (1994) and Egan (1998) have indicated the need for
improvement in productivity/project delivery through the use of
performance improvement measures. Therefore, if the performance of
Nigerian contractors in project delivery must be improved, it is pertinent to
seek for ways and factors to improve their performance in project delivery.
Identifying ways and factors of improving contractor`s performance in
project delivery, the client will benefit most as contractors will deliver
projects without a risk being placed on the client who is saddled with the
ownership and occupation risks. Following the above revelation and in
response to non-performance of contractors in project delivery, the reasons
for the underperformance of contractors in Nigeria in particular Ondo State
were studied. This was with a view to suggesting possible remedial
measures. This study assessed criteria for project construction performance;
it also assessed the factors (established from literature) affecting contractors
performance in construction project delivery according to their relative
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

5
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
importance. In addition, the study evaluated factors for improving
contractor performance in project delivery.
 Success criteria are "measures by which success or failure of a
project or business will be judged". No single list of criteria is totally
comprehensive when it comes to a definition of success for a project.
Indeed, measuring project success is a complex task since success is
intangible and can hardly be agreed upon. People choose to define project
success depending on various preferences. A project manager has to
understand that his evaluation of project success not necessarily needs to be
as important as other stakeholders'. Kuprenas (2003) states that the top
management and client are the most important stakeholders and that this is
something that the project managers have to adapt to. The general concept
of project success remains ambiguously defined because of varying
perceptions. Such a phenomenon also exists in the construction industry
where so many different parties are involved, including the client, the
architect, the contractor, the design team and various surveyors and
engineers. Each project participant will have his or her own view of success.
Moreover, the definition of success often changes from project to project
depending on the participants, scope of services, project size, project
complexity, sophistication of the owner related to the design of facilities,
technological implications and a variety of other factors. Researches on
project success show that it is impossible to generate a universal checklist of
project success criteria suitable for all projects. On the other hand, common
trends relating to success criteria often develop not only with an individual
project but across the industry as we relate success to the perceptions and
expectations of the owner, designer, or contractor (Kuprenas, 2003). Thus,
project managers need better understanding of critical success/failure
factors and how to measure them.
 Early main criteria for success were assumed to be cost, schedule
and quality. The iron triangle of project management emphasizes the
relationships among cost, schedule and quality. The golden triangle of
project management emphasizes the relationships among cost, schedule,
quality and people by placing people at the Centre of the iron triangle.
People are the one element that ties the other elements together. The
emphasis on people in the golden triangle helps maintain a balance among
cost, schedule and quality. Later more potentially competing criteria like
''the satisfaction of all stakeholders'' were defined.
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

6
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017

 Kumaraswamy (2002) remarked that project performance
measurement include time, budget, safety, quality and overall client
satisfaction. Kuprenas (2003) stated that project performance measurement
an improvement of cost, schedule and quality for design and construction.
Long et al., (2004) stated that a project performance measurement is related
to time, budget, quality, specification and stakeholders` satisfaction. Cheung
et al., (2007) identified project performance categories such as people, cost,
time, quality, safety and health, environment, client satisfaction and
communication. Mic ̇hell et al., (2007) stated that timely completion of a
construction project is frequently seen as a major criterion of project success
by clients, contractors and consultant alike.
 The concept of project performance in a construction project
according to some researchers can be evaluated only when the performance
criteria or evaluation dimensions are adequately defined. Project
performance can be measured and evaluated using a large number of
performance indicators that could be related to various dimensions
(groups). Although criteria for 'project performance' vary according to
individuals and organizations, generally, in any project the evaluation
dimensions correspond to the traditional constraints of time, cost, and
quality parameters, also known as iron triangle (Atkinson, 1996). However,
these are not the only criteria. For instance, Kuprenas (2003) excluded
quality as a criterion of success and added two additional criteria viz.
'satisfying profit or fee goals' and 'having no legal claims'. So also according
to Odeh and Bettaineh (2002), a project is termed successful if it passes four
success test criteria of the time criterion (completed on time); the cost or
money criterion (completed within budget); the effectiveness criterion
(completed in accordance with the original set performance and quality
standards); and client's satisfaction criterion (accepted by the intended users
or clients whether the client is internal or from outside the organization).
Minimizing construction aggravation is yet another criterion that is
considered to determine project success. According to Cheung et al., (2004)
criterion such as time, cost, quality, client satisfaction, client changes,
business performance, health and safety can be employed. Another
interesting way of evaluating project performance is through two common
sets of indicators Pheng and Chuan, (2006), the first set is related to the
owners, users, stakeholders and the general public; these groups of people
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

7
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
will look at project performance from the macro viewpoint. The second
comprises the developer and the contractors; these groups of people will
look at project performance from the micro viewpoint. The criteria for
project performance according to Navon (2005) are that the project is
completed on time, completed to budget, completed to quality
requirements, meets clients` expectations and needs, has happy
stakeholders, exceed expectations, meet profits/fee goals, satisfy all
requirements of stakeholders and is completed safely, have no legal claims,
minimizes aggravation and have no conflict. This study also reveals that
criteria such as risk, conflict, and safety though usually excluded and deliver
need to be reckoned. In the Brunei construction industry, project
performance is traditionally evaluated using schedule, cost and quality
performance, also known as the "iron triangle" (Atkinson, 1999; Saleh, 2009).
Moreover, the impact of such factors on project success varies. An example
in point is the hierarchical model of project success proposed by Chua, Kog,
and Loh (1999). Given this uncertainty there is doubt as to what factors
project stakeholders would consider as important to achieve project success.
Time, cost and quality are however, the three (3) predominant performance
evaluation dimensions.
 Construction project performance remains a prominent issue in
project delivery all over the world. This is so because construction projects
involve defined objectives which must be achieved and numerous which
need to be efficiently utilized. The need for participants' involvement in
construction project delivery to develop and use tools to improve their
efficiency and effectiveness in project delivery was emphasized in UK and
Sweden (Robinson et al., 2005).
 A number of studies have been carried out to determine the various
performance factors in construction projects. Kuprenas, (2003) reported that
the impact of the project management related factors-organization
structure, project manager training, frequency of design meeting and
frequency of design report on design phase cost performance. In East
African countries, the factors affecting cost performance are: project
managers' competence, owners' competence, top management support,
project manager`s coordination and feedback by the participants, decision
making, coordination among project participants, social conditions,
economical condition and climatic conditions. Coordination among project
participants was seen as the most significant of all the factors having
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

8
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
maximum influence on cost performance (Iyer and Jha, 2006). Chan, Scott
and Chan (2004) examined factors affecting the success of a construction
project. Five major groups of independent variables, namely project related
factors, project procedures, project management actions, human related
factors, and external environment were identified as crucial to project
success. Navon (2005) noted that a control system is an important element
to identify factors affecting project effort. Pheng and Chuan (2006) obtained
that human factors played an important role in determining the
performance of a project. The relationship between the client and the
contractor is seen as one of the most important necessities for successful
project delivery (Toor and Ogunlana, 2008 and Adelbäck and Johansson,
2013). Kuprenas (2003) conducted a research on factors affecting contractor's
performance in construction work in India. They found out that Top
management support/time-related factors, cost related factors, scope related
factors, quality related factors, owner-organization related factors,
funding/cash flow related factors and Project characteristics-related factors
affected contractors' performance the most.
 Research has documented that sophisticated and specialized clients
having a better chance of success are critical variables. The nature of the
client (whether from the public or private sector), the clarity of the project
mission, their competence in terms of ability to brief, make decisions, and
define roles, have been found to significantly contribute to the quality of a
project.
 According to Toor and Ogunlana (2008), project scope, nature of
the project and complexity of the project (the project characteristics) also
have an influence on the performance of projects; in addition to the
environment in which a project operates. Bryde and Robinson (2005)
studied factors affecting performance of contractors as categorized into nine
related factors, which are; economic factor, environmental factors, natural
factor, political factor, time factors, quality factors, productivity factors,
health and safety factors, client satisfaction factor. Long et al. (2004)
identified 46 possible factors responsible for poor performance of
construction contract. He further categorized these factors into eight groups
as; factors caused by clients, factors caused by contractors, factors caused by
consultants, factors related to subcontractors, factors related to material and
labour, contractual relationship factors, project procedures and external
environment factors. Unfortunately, Long et al. (2004) observed that due to
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

9
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
many reasons, project performance and project success are not common in
the construction industry especially in developing countries. This may not
be unconnected with the fact that construction project development
involves numerous parties, various processes, different phases and stages of
work and a great deal of input from both the public and private sectors with
the major aim of bringing the project to a successful conclusion. In citation
of previous studies, little attention is being paid to poor construction
performance in Ondo State, Nigeria.
 Adelback and Johnson (2013) identified climate conditions at site as
the most important factor affecting the performance of construction projects
by owner, consultants and contractors because it affects the productivity
and time performance of project. In a study of the Thai highway contractors,
Kumaraswamy (2002) observed that the construction business is a sector
that relies primarily on high utilization of machinery. Further, Iyer and Jha
(2006) contended that equipment has long been considered as one of the
key factors for improving contractors ‟ capability in performing their work
efficiently and effectively. However, contractors usually face difficulties in
getting all the equipment they need, especially capital investments, in the
acquisition phase, due to financial constraints.
Methodology
The study investigated into factors affecting contractor's performance in
construction project delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria. Questionnaire
survey was adopted in gathering relevant data from parties involved in
construction projects in Ondo State. Sixteen (16) contractors and 16 clients
were purposively sampled. The population of Architects, Builders and
Quantity Surveyor obtained from Ondo State Ministry of Works and
Housing were 27, 40 and 57 respectively. Proportional sampling technique
was used to select Architects, Builders and Quantity Surveyors. 75%
Architects, 65% Builders and 55% Quantity Surveyors were selected. By
doing this, 20, 26 and 32 respondents for Architects, Builders and Quantity
Surveyors, respectively were sampled. The questionnaire was used to elicit
the opinion of parties involved in construction project on factors affecting
contractor's performance in construction project delivery in the study area.
The participants were asked to rank and score the listed factors on scale 1 to
5 where 1-least important and 5-highest important factor. A section of the
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

10
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
questionnaire also contained participants' socio-economic information. The
respondents were drawn from Akure, the capital city of Ondo State because
large volumes of construction activities in the state take place in the state
capital, Akure. This study identified eighteen contractors' performance
criteria, twelve factors affecting contractors' performance and eighteen
factors for improving contractors' performance from previous studies and
presented to the respondents to rank according to their relative importance.
Out of the total respondents sampled, 16, 14, 15, 15 and 15 filled questionnaire
was retrieved from Clients, Contractors, Architects, Builders and Quantity
Surveyors respectively. The analysis of data collected was done using mean
item score and one-way analysis of variance. Mean score item was used to
indicate the relative position of each factor using equation 1.
 𝑀 𝑒𝑎𝑛 𝑆 𝑐 𝑜𝑟𝑒 = 𝛴 𝑓𝑥
𝛴𝑓 ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... (1)
𝑊 h𝑒 𝑟𝑒;
𝑓 = 𝐹 𝑟 𝑒 𝑞 𝑢𝑒𝑛𝑐𝑦
 𝑥 = 𝑅 𝑎 𝑛 𝑘𝑖𝑛𝑔 𝑣 𝑎 𝑙𝑢𝑒�
Results and Discussion
In order to sufficiently examine stakeholders' preference for the factors
affecting contractor's performance in construction project delivery in Akure,
Ondo State, the respondents were asked to provide background information
to show suitability in completing the questionnaire. Table 1 shows the socio-
economic characteristics of the stakeholders in construction industry. It
comprised information related to type of organization, years of experience,
educational qualification, and designation of the respondent and
professional qualification. The result on the type of qualification shows that
out of seventy five (75) respondents that filled the questionnaire, forty three
(43) representing 57.3% were private owned, thirty two (32) representing
42.6% were Government owned. This implied that various ownership
distribution of construction firms in Akure South LGA were adequately
represented indicating that information obtained was not biased.
 More so, two (2) respondent representing 2.7% have 21-25 years of
experience, twenty five (25) respondents representing 33.3% have 11-15 years
of experience, twenty two (22) respondents representing 29.3% have 6-10
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

11
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
years of experience and ten (10) respondents representing 13.3% have 0-5
years of experience. The result suggested that the respondents have acquired
adequate experience, indicating their suitability for this study. Hence, the
information supplied was reliable.
 Analyzing the educational qualification of respondents, seven (7)
respondents representing 9.3% had NCE/OND qualification, fourteen (14)
respondents representing 18.7% had HND/PGD qualification, twenty seven
(27) respondents representing 36.0% had BSC/BTECH qualification, twenty
six (26) respondents representing 34.7% had MSC/MTECH qualification, one
(1) respondent representing 1.3% had PhD qualification. This indicated that
the questions provided in the questionnaire were well understood by the
respondent considering their level of education. The results on the
designation of the respondents showed that 21.3% of respondents were
clients, 18.7% were contractor, 20.0% were architects, 20.0% were quantity
surveyors, and 20.0% were builders. This implied proper distribution of
respondents.
 Furthermore, the results revealed that 18.7% of respondents were
Members of Nigeria Institute of Building (NIOB), 25.3% of the respondents
were Members of Nigeria Institute of Quantity Surveyors, 25.3% of the
respondents were member of Nigeria Institute of Architects, and 9.3% of the
respondents were member of Council of Registered Builders of Nigeria.

Table 1: Background Information of Respondents
Background
Information

Frequency

Percent (%)

Cumulative
Percent

Type of organization
Government owned 32 42.6 42.6
Private owned 43 57.3 100.0
Total 75 100.0
Years of experience
0-5 years 10 13.3 16.9
6-10 years 22 29.3 37.3
11-15 years 25 33.3 59.3
21-25 years 2 2.7 3.4
Missing 16 21.3
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

12
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
Total 75 100.0
Educational
Qualification
NCE/OND 7 9.3 9.3
HND/PGD 14 18.7 28.0
BSC/BTECH 27 36.0 64.0
MSC/MTECH
PhD
Total
26
1
75
34.7
1.3
100.0
98.7
100.0

Designation
Client 16 21.3 10.0
Contractor 14 18.0 40.0
Architect 15 20.0 60.0
Quantity surveyor 15 20.0 80.0
Builder 15 20.0 100.0
Total 75 100.0
Professional
qualification
NIOB 12 18.7 23.7
NIQS 19 25.3 55.9
NIA 19 25.3 88.1
CORBON 7 9.3 100.0
Total 75 100.0

Performance Criteria for Construction Project Delivery
Table 2 shows the criteria for construction project performance. The table
shows that 'completed to time' is ranked 1st as the most important criterion
with a mean score of 4.5, while 'completed to budget' and 'completed to
quality requirement' ranked 2nd and 3rd with a mean score of 4.51 and 4.49.
This suggest that time, cost and quality are the most important criteria for
determining the performance of projects. Other important criterion for
construction project performance as indicated by respondents were health
and safety (mean score = 4.33), completed safely (mean score = 4.29), meet
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

13
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
client expectation and needs (mean score = 4.27) and client satisfaction
(mean score = 4.17). The least important factors were risk minimization
(mean score = 3.95), satisfy all requirements of stakeholders and business
performance (mean score = 3.88), and no legal claim (mean score = 3.57).
 A single factor analysis of variance was conducted to test for
differences among the means of performance criteria for construction
project delivery. As shown in Table 3, the analysis was significant (F= 18.83, P
=0.000121). This results suggest that completion of project to time (M = 4.52,
V = 14.58) really do have an effect on construction project delivery.

Table 2: Mean Ranking of Performance Criteria for Construction Project
Delivery
S/N Criteria Mean
Score
Coefficient
of
Variance
Rank
1 Completed to time 4.52 14.58 1
2 Completed to budget 4.51 14.55 2
3 Completed to quality
requirements
4.49 14.48 3
4 Health and safety 4.33 13.96 4
5 Completed safely 4.29 13.84 5
6 Meet client expectation
and needs
4.27 13.77 6
7 client satisfaction 4.17 13.45 7
8 Meet profit/fee goals 4.07 13.13 8
9 Directing and control 4.01 12.93 9
10 Risk minimization 3.95 12.74 10
11 Satisfy all requirements
of stakeholders
3.88 12.52 11
12 Business performance 3.88 12.52 11
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

14
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
13 Exceed expectation 3.77 12.16 12
15 Has happy stakeholder 3.75 12.09 13
15 Minimizing
construction
aggravation
3.72 12.00 14
16 client changes 3.71 11.96 15
17 Have no conflict 3.65 11.77 16
18 Have no legal claim 3.57 11.51 17 Table 3: Test of Difference among the Means of Performance Criteria
Source of
Variation SS
d
f MS F
P-
value F crit
Between Groups
269.288
1 1
269.288
1
18.8324
7
0.00012
1
4.13001
8
Within Groups
486.170
8
3
4
14.2991
4
Total
755.458
9
3
5

SS = sum of squares, df = degrees of freedom, MS = mean score

Factors Affecting Contractors Performance

Table 4 shows the mean score of factors affecting contractor's performance
in construction project delivery and they were ranked accordingly using
mean score. Fifty seven (57) factors affecting contractors' performance were
identified from literature (Appendix A) and were carefully grouped into
twelve (12) groups as presented in Table 4. From the table, quality related
factors ranked 1st (mean score = 4.33) as the most important factors affecting
contractors' performance, closely followed by project management related
factors (mean score = 4.31). Procurement related factors ranked 3rd with a
mean score of 4.30. This shows that the specified quality by clients,
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

15
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
procurement systems used for projects, and the project management
capabilities of contractors have great effects on their performances.
 The least important factors affecting contractors' performance was
owners' organization related factors with a mean score of 3.95, other factors
were relatively important as ranked by the respondents. This suggests that
all the stakeholders in a project have an input in determining the
performance level of contractors. The management of the contracting firm,
the clients' firm and the design team have a role to play in the performance
of contractors. In order to test for differences among the means of factors
affecting contractors' performance, a single factor analysis of variance was
conducted. The result is as presented in Table 5. With F-value (0.924)
greater than P-value (0.526), this shows that the analysis was significant.
Therefore, it can be inferred that the performance of contractors is affected
by factors relating to project management, procurement, clients and clients
organizations, design team, contracting firm, top management, project
scope and quality, and cash flow. The findings of this study support the
findings in India and Thailand by Toor and Ogunlana, (2008) and Adelbäck
and Johnson (2013) which indicated that top management support/time-
related factors, cost related factors, scope related factors, quality related
factors, owner-organization related factors, funding/cash flow related factors
and Project characteristics-related factors affected contractors' performance
the most.

Table 4: Mean Ranking of the Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance
Groups Count Sum
Averag
e
Varianc
e
Mea
n
Ran
k
Project management related
factors

10 43.11 4.311 0.066366


4.31

2
Project related factors 5 20.5 4.1 0.0398

4.10

9
Procurement related factors 2 8.6 4.3 0.0098

4.30

3
Client related factors 6 24.9 4.15 0.0838

4.15

8
Design team related factors 3 12.49 4.163333 0.168133

4.16

6
Human related factors 5 20.91 4.182 0.01987

4.18

5
Contractor related factors 5 21.01 4.202 0.04927

4.20

4
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

16
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
Top management related factors 6
24.9
6 4.16 0.08296

4.16

6
Scope related factors 3 12.11
4.03666
7 0.047233

4.03

10
Quality related factors 1 4.33 4.33 #DIV/0!

4.33

1
Owners organization related
factors 4 15.81 3.9525 0.042625

3.95

12
Cash flow related factors 6
24.0
4
4.00666
7 0.105147

4.00

11

Table 5: Test of Difference among the Factors Affecting Contractors'
Performance
Source of
Variation SS df MS F P-value F crit
Between Groups 0.684264 11 0.062206 0.924371 0.526245 2.014046
Within Groups 2.960992 44 0.067295
Total 3.645255 55

Methods of Improving Contractor's Performance

The methods of improving contractors' performance in construction project
delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria was assessed as shown in Table 6.
Table 6 shows that having appropriate planning with a mean score of 4.77
was ranked the 1st, followed by good leadership with a mean score of 4.60.
Other effective methods by which the performance of contractors could be
improved were good communication (mean score = 4.65), stakeholder
relationship (mean score = 4.56), accountability (mean score = 4.39),
documentation (mean score = 4.31), and employee empowerment (mean
score = 4.04). This shows that the performance of contractors can be
improved upon by both the contractor and the client. The contractor can
empower his employee with the aim of improving their workmanship and
productivity, as this will in turn improve the work being carried out for the
contractor. Also the contractor can invest in proper documentation of work
on site, accountability and communication. All of these methods have
positive influence on the performance of contractors in project delivery. On
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

17
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
the other hand, the level at which the client relates with contractor and the
manner and level of variation made by the client have impacts on the level
of performance of contractor.
 Test of difference for the methods of improving contractors'
performance (Table 7) shows that the differences among the methods are
significant (P=0.000173, F= 17.776). This suggests that appropriate planning;
good leadership, good communication, stakeholder relationship,
accountability, documentation, control and administrative system, effective
contractors and workers relationship, employee empowerment, and
minimizing variation can influence the performance of contractors in
project delivery. This finding corroborates the report by Bryde and Robinson
(2005) which indicated that stakeholder relationship, good communication,
timely documentation, minimizing variation, and appropriate planning are
key ways to improve the performance of contractors in project delivery.

Table 6: Methods of improving Contractor Performance
S/N Factors Mean
score
Coefficient of
variance
Rank
1 Having appropriate planning 4.77 14.45 1
2 Good leadership 4.60 13.94 2
3 Good communication 4.65 14.09 3
4 Stakeholder relationship 4.56 13.82 4
5 Taking accountability 4.39 13.30 5
6 Timely documentation 4.31 13.06 6
7 Comprehensive analysis 4.23 12.82 7
8 Control and administrative
system
4.21 12.76 8
9 Understanding peoples
requirements and needs

4.19
12.70 9
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

18
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
10 Effective contractors and
workers relationship
4.17 12.64 10
11 Serviceability 4.08 12.36 11
12 Employee empowerment 4.04 12.24 12
13 Existence of key personnel 4.01 12.15 13
14 Reliability 4.00 12.12 14
15 Minimizing variation 3.95 11.97 15
16 Conformance 3.95 11.97 15
17 Hassle free building solution 3.77 11.42 16
18 Less paper work 3.44 10.42 17

Table 7: Test of Difference among the Methods for Improving Contractors'
Performance
Source of Variation SS df MS F P-value F crit
Between Groups 254.2962 1 254.2962 17.77686 0.000173 4.130018
Within Groups 486.3664 34 14.3049
Total 740.6626 35

Conclusions
Based on the analysis it was found that most of the respondents were from
privately owned organizations and most of the respondents were
construction project consultants. The most significant criteria for
contractors' performance in construction project in Akure, Ondo state
Nigeria are when projects are completion to time, completion to budget and
completion to quality requirement. Quality related factors, project
management related factors and procurement related factors are the most
important factors affecting contractors performance in Akure, Ondo state
Nigeria. Finally, to assist contractors improve their performance on
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

19
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
construction projects, appropriate planning, good leadership and good
communication must be enhanced.
References
[1]. Adelback, T., & Johansson, N. (2013). Success Factors in Large
Infrastructure Projects: The contractor's perspective. Sweden:
Chalmers University of Technology.
[2]. Amade, B. (2014). Containing Failure and Abandonment of Public
Sector Construction Projects in Nigeria. A Seminar Paper of the
Department of Project Management Technology, for a P.hD of
the Federal University of Technology, Owerri, Nigeria, December,
2014. Pp 1-35.
[3]. Atkinson, R. (1996). Project management: Cost, time and quality,
two best guesses and a phenomenon, it's time to accept other
success criteria. International Journal of Project Management, 1999,
17 (6), pp. 337–342.
[4]. Bryde, D. J. and Robinson, L. ( 2005). Client versus contractor
perspectives on project success criteria. International Journal of
Project Management, 23,622-629.
[5]. Chan Albert P.C. and Chan Daniel W.M., (2004), Developing a
benchmark model for project construction time performance in
Hong Kong, Building and Environment, Vol. 39, PP. 339 – 349.
[6]. Cheung Sai On, Suen Henry C.H. and Cheung Kevin K.W.,
(2007), PPMS: a Web-based construction Project Performance
Monitoring System, Automation in Construction, Vol. 13, PP. 361-
376.
[7]. Chua, D.K.H., Kog, Y.C. and Loh, P.K. (1999). Critical Success
Factors for Different Project Objectives. Journal of Construction
Engineering and Management. Vol. 125, No.3, pp 142-150.
[8]. Egan, J. (1998). Rethinking construction. The report of the
Construction Task Force on the scope for improving quality and
efficiency in UK construction. Department of the Environment,
Transport and the Regions, London.
[9]. Iyer, K.C. and Jha, K.N. (2006). Factors affecting cost performance:
Evidence from Indian construction projects. International Journal of
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

20
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
Project Management, 23(4): 283–295. doi:
10.1016/j.ijproman.2004.10.003.
[10].Kuprenas, J. A. (2003). Project management actions to improve
design phase cost performance, Journal of Management in
Engineering,19(1): 25–32.
[11]. Latham, M. (1994). Constructing the Team. Final Report of the
Government /Industry Review of Procurement and Contractual
Arrangements in the UK Construction Industry, July, 1994. ISBN:
011752994X.1-130.
[12]. Long, N. D., Ogunlana, S., Quang, T. and Lam, K. C. (2004).
Large construction projects in developing countries: a case study
from Vietnam, International Journal of Project Management, Vol.
22, PP. 553–561.
[13]. Michell, K., Bowen, P., Cattell, K., Edward, P. and Pearl, R.
(2007). Stakeholder perceptions of contractor time, cost and quality
management on building project. Proceedings: CIB World Building
Conference on Construction for Development. Cape Town, South
Africa, 14–18 May.
[14]. Navon, R. (2005). Automated project performance control of
construction projects, Automation in Construction, Vol. 14, PP. 467-
476.
[15]. Naik, N., S. D. Kominers, R. Raskar, E. L. Glaeser, and C. A. Hidalgo
(2015). Do people shape cities, or do cities shape people? The co-
evolution of physical, social, and economic change in five major US
cities. NBER Working Paper No. 21620.
[16]. Odeh, A. M. and Battaineh, H. T. (2002). Causes of
construction delay: Traditional contracts. International Journal of
Project Management, 2002, 20, pp. 67–73.
[17]. Oladipo A. A. (2007). A Quantitative Assessment Of The Cost And
Time Impact Of Variation Orders On Construction Projects. Journal
of Engineering, Design and Technology. 5 (1): 35-48.
[18].Onyekpere, E. (2011). Public Procurement Report 2011. A
Publication of the Centre for Social Justice Ltd by Guarantee, Abuja.
Pg 1-64. ISBN:978-978-932-000-4, www.csj-ng.org
[19]. Olapade, O. and Anthony, O. (2012). Abandonment of
Building Projects in Nigeria- A Review of Causes and Solutions.
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

21
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
International Conference on Chemical, Civil and Environmental
Engineering (ICCEE2012) 24-25 March, Dubai. Pg 253-255.
[20]. Oyedele, L. (2013) Avoiding performance failure payment
deductions in PFI/PPP projects: Model of critical success factors.
Journal of Performance of Constructed Facilities, 27 (3). pp. 283-294.
ISSN 0887-3828 Available from: http://eprints.uwe.ac.uk/21611
[21]. Pheng, L. S. and Chuan, Q. T. (2006). Environmental factors and
work performance of project managers in the construction
industry, International Journal of Project Management, Vol. 24, PP.
24 – 37.
[22]. Toor, S. U. R. and Ogunlana, S. O. (2008). Critical COMs
of success in large-scale construction projects: Evidence from
Thailand construction industry. International Journal of Project
Management, 26, 420-430
[23]. Ubani, E. C. and Ononuju, C.N. (2013). A Study of Failure
and Abandonment of Public Sector Driven Civil Engineering
Projects in Nigeria: An Empirical Review. American Journal of
Scientific and Industrial Research. Pg 75-82. ISSN:2153-649X.
Appendix
Appendix A: Factors Affecting Contractor Performance
Factors Mean Score
(M.S.)
Ranking
Project management related factor
strong monitoring 4.55 1
effectiveness of coordination 4.52 2
adequate team selection 4.45 3
Training 4.44 4
effective project scheduling and budgeting 4.43 5
Effective communication 4.40 6
Integration of project action 4.32 7
development and motivation 4.32 7
project manager competence 4.20 8
decision making skills 4.11 9
Troubleshooting 3.69 10
Project related factors
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

22
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
sequencing of work according to schedule 4.27 1
Project complexity 4.23 2
Management labour relationship 4.16 3
Absenteeism rate through project 4.07 4
owners familiarity with project 3.77 5
Procurement related factor
procurement method 4.37 1
tendering method 4.23 2
Client related factor
project financing 4.49 1
client confidence in contractor 4.33 2
Client characteristic 4.31 3
owners risk aversion 4.08 4
client project management 4.01 5
client type and experience 3.68 6
Design team related factor
design team experience 4.57 1
project design complexity 4.17 2
mistake/delays in producing design document 3.75 3
Human related factor
client satisfaction 4.36 1
contractor characteristics 4.23 2
Stakeholder relationship 4.19 3
Manufacturer 4.16 4
Supplier 3.97 5
Contractor related factor
site management 4.44 1
Table 4.3 cont.
Factors Mean score
(M.S.)
Ranking
contractor cash flow 4.33 2
effectiveness of cost control system 4.20 3
Supervision and involvement of subcontracting 4.19 4
speed of information flow 3.85 5
Top management support/time
completion on schedule 4.48 1
Factors Affecting Contractors' Performance in Construction
Project Delivery in Akure, Ondo State, Nigeria

23
Vol. VII, Issue 4
August 2017
cost related factor 4.33 2
On-time completion 4.29 3
ensuring the lowest cost 4.12 4
ensuring completion within budget 4.09 5
technological issues 3.65 6
Scope related factor
capitalizing on a well-defined scope 4.27 1
potential for changes during construction 4.00 2
owner desire for flexibility to make change during
construction
3.84 3
Quality related factor
desire to deliver quality products 4.33 1
Owners organization related factor
need for construction professional input during
design
4.21 1
level of in-house management experience 4.00 2
Owner desire for single project contract 3.88 3
Owner desire for single construction contract 3.72 4
Funding/cash flow related factor
desire for early estimates 4.47 1
need for financing 4.24 2
risk and relationship related factor 4.05 3
Delaying or minimizing expenditure rate 3.95 4
amount of risk 3.76 5
minimizing adversarial relationship 3.57 6
Scientific Papers (www.scientificpapers.org)
Journal of Knowledge Management, Economics and Information Technology

1
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of
Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia
Authors: Ni Nyoman Yuliarmi, Faculty of Economic and Business,
 Udayana University, ninyomanyuliarmi@gmail.com; Ida
 Ayu Nyoman Saskara, 2Faculty of Economic and Business,
 Udayana University, iansaskara@gmail.com
The aim of this study was to analyze the variables that may affect the
application of the technology to produce handicrafts. The method used to
determine the sample unit of craft businesses of rural households that will be
interviewed are acidental sampling.
 This study uses a quantitative analytical approach. Quantitative
analysis using descriptive statistics and regression of binary logistic analysis.
Based on the analysis, it can be concluded that the variables that significantly
influence the application of technology in rural craftsmen in Bangli Regency is
the income and education level.
 The higher the income level, the higher the possibility of craftsmen
applying modern technologies. Likewise, the education level, the higher the
education level, assuming other variables constant, the possibility of applying
the technology will be higher. While the age and type of business does not
significantly influence the application of technology.

Keywords: Empowerment, Household Industry, Income, Education,
Technology

Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

2
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
Introduction

Empowerment of poor communities through strengthening capital,
coaching, and mentoring has been done by the government through the
relevant institutions. However, these efforts have not been felt by all
households in rural craftsmen. This occurs because the craftsmen of rural
households enormous amount of funds available to conduct training is still
very limited, so the government programs related to community
development primarily to the craftsmen of rural households is not optimal.
In addition, the craftsmen who have produced results should be followed up
by helping craft or facilitate the marketing of craft. This is also the problems
faced by the craftsmen during this time.
 Problems also arise because of the use of the existing opportunities
optimally has not been achieved, which is more caused by the weak
managerial capability of human resources. This will have an impact on the
inability of small entrepreneurs run their business well. In addition to the
importance of increasing the role of economic capital/financial and human
capital as a factor of production to increase productivity handicraft business
is generated, then the social capital, culture and skills of artisans in utilizing
existing technology also needs to be improved. Social capital as an asset to
the organization in creating value or an asset to the organization's members
through improved job skills, including influence the success of the work, the
creation of intellectual capital, and efficiency of multifunctional teams to
strengthen relationships with suppliers, production network and
organizational learning [3]. Social capital from time to time need to be
developed, otherwise the company will not be able to compete [6]. Social
capital of the poor people can also be expanded by combining with financial
capital, human and physical capital to help them participate in development
decisions that affect their well-being [13]. Social capital can be seen from the
structure of liabilities, expectations, and beliefs, and social capital can play a
role it must interact with the social structure [23]. In addition to financial
capital, human capital, and social capital, then the use of technology is very
important for this rural Small and Medium Entreprises (SMEs). Although
the technology is still very simple, but it can speed up the production
process.
 Development of the use of technology for developing countries
compared with developed industries are very different [21]. Developing
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

3
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
countries in the use of technology is still labor intensive, while the state
industry, the use of advanced technology tends capital intensive.
Technology can cause a shift in the nature of human materiality. For some
people technology can help them to developing more advanced economies
and may bring classes in public life [7]. In the long term, the use of
appropriate technologies can enhance the role of business industry and be
able to maintain the sales of products, services, and market share [1].
Technology can provide value and benefits of a strong impact to produce a
better performance of the industry. In addition, strong social capital also
have an impact on productivity improvement efforts [1] [5].
 Weak empowerment of the poor people in accessing financial
resources to improve the work is also found in the study [4]. In fulfillment of
the capital of the business activities carried out in its efforts to obtain
business credit is still very low. This has an impact on their weaknesses to
improve empowerment efforts. By looking at the weaknesses of small
businesses for poor households, the role is more real than the government
through relevant institutions which can be done by providing credit without
collateral in order to improve the empowerment of the business.
 Poverty in rural areas is indicated from less helpless communities to
improve the lives of more viable, low ability to access venture capital, and
the low level of productivity of the effort that have done. The low level of
productivity of the work done can also be demonstrated by the lack of their
ability to absorb technology. Weak absorption technology is also due to
their helplessness in accessing capital, and skills. For the craftsmen
sometimes the technology used to be very simple and limited, however there
are also craftsmen who have been using a number of technologies as needed.
Therefore research conducted related to the application of technology can
improve the craftsmen of empowerment efforts. Presence or absence of the
application of technology (modern or traditional) in producing handicrafts,
examined in this study.
 There are several variables that can affect the possibility of applying
a technology. Several variables that affect SMEs in applying computer
technology [20]. The results showed that gender, age, experience and nature
of use (mandatory or voluntary) is a moderating effect on the use of
information systems (the use of computer technology). Entrepreneurship
technology as well as mediating variables also need to be further proof as
endogenous or exogenous variables [1]. The purpose of this study was to
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

4
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
analyze the variables that may affect the application of the technology to
produce handicrafts.

Literature Review
Empowerment
Empowerments often seen as a tool to achieve certain goals and as an end in
itself. Empowerment involves the ability to make choices and communicate
the change process of all components that make up the social structure and
reproduce the power relationships and subsequent unequal distribution of
opportunities and community resources. Some experts postulate that there
are three dimensions of empowerment: empowerment through individual
action, collective empowerment that is interpersonal, and social
empowerment in generating social action, all three dimensions are
interdependent.
 Empowerment is energizing to be concerned is able to move
independently [16]. Empowerment basically have the intent to create a
climate of fair competition and fair, which will provide opportunities to live
and thrive for cooperatives and SMEs. The concept of empowerment is the
result of an interactive process both at the ideological level and at the level
of implementation. On an ideological level, the concept of empowerment is
the result of interaction between concept of the top-down and bottom-up,
the growth strategy and people-centered strategy. In terms of
implementation, the interaction will occur through the struggle between
autonomy. The concept of empowerment but it also contains the context to
side with layers of society who are under the poverty line [4]. The study of
empowerment stated [17]. aims to investigate multiculturalism in the
workplace by using a method based diversity training and development of
empowerment. A method based on the empowerment proved useful in
directing the creation of an exclusive work organization. Empowerment is
efforts were made, including the dissemination of information, providing
knowledge and efforts made to improve the performance of the entire
elements needed for everything. To increase employee competency we need
a policy to act appropriately and can increase their services, thus the
management is very important to give them the expertise, information and
rewards required.
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

5
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
Technology
Technology generally produce or create a certain effect, thus to be able to
use it required considerable knowledge. Someone applying certain
technologies certainly have the knowledge of how to use these technologies.
Technology is part of the culture of knowledge and be able to do it right
[22]. Technology can cause a shift in the nature of human materiality [1].
Thus the application of technology in producing a particular product is
needed by the industry in general. If knowledge of the application of these
technologies, properly understood, the production process would be more
efficient.
 Technology also can help employees to speed up the production
process to produce a particular product. The use of technology can promote
the development of small and medium enterprises to diversify the economy
of a country. Information technology is very useful in Small and Medium
Enterprises (SMEs) [2]. Information OF Technologies have a significant
effect on small and medium business sector, especially in the when decrease
of industrial or when there is a high unemployment rate. Small and medium
businesses in India using information technology very quickly [18]. For small
entrepreneurs who understand the benefits of information technology, then
by adopting technology entrepreneurs can take advantage of the promised
benefits as a result of the adoption of information technology, including
improving the efficiency and effectiveness of the organization. However, as a
criticism in creating jobs and employment opportunities, small and medium
enterprises are still lagging behind compared to other countries.

Regression with Qualitative Response (Analysis of Binary Logistic)
Binary Logistic Analysis is a statistical technique that the dependent variable
is in the form katagorikal (nominal or nonmetric) and the independent
variable is the metric or nonmetric [9]. Regression Logistic Analysis is also
called "Binary Logistic" Regression analysis," Multinominal Logistics
Regression Analysis "and "Ordinal Logistics Regression Analysis", depending
on the type of scale of the dependent variable that is used. For example, to
classify the dependent variable, a nice guy working or idle, he is a member of
the group or not, from the ruling party both from the right wing or left wing;
a student either graduates or not [14]. Binary Logistic Regression Analysis is
the regression analysis applied to the analysis, where the dependent variable
in the form categorical, or the dependent variable is qualitative. the
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

6
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
dependent variable is qualitative (categorical) quantified by making variable
artificial or dummy variable, with a value of 1 for the variable that appears
and 0 for the other. If the answer to the dependent variable yes = 1, no = 0,
or applying technology = 1, not to apply technology = 0. this analysis resulted
in a regression equation makes it possible to make an accurate estimate of
the likelihood that an individual falls mistake one category (Yes or no).
 Logistic regression is a model of cumulative distribution function
(CDF), which is able to guarantee the value of the dependent variable lies
between 0 and 1 in accordance with the theory of probability. CDF has two
properties, namely: 1) if the independent variable goes up, then P (Yi = 1 |
Xi)also rose, but never past the range 0-1, and 2) the relationship between Pi
and Xi is a non linear so that the rate of change is not the same, but the
gains were bigger, then smaller. When the probability is close to zero, then
the rate of decline is getting smaller, as well as the probability value close to
one, then the rate of increase is smaller [19].

Figure 1: Cumulative Distribution Function (CDF)
In general logistic regression equation for the dependent variable k can be
written as follows:
(1)
ln p/(1-p) = bo + b1 X1 + b2 X 2......BkXk
(2)
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

7
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
odds (T / X1,X2, ...... Xk) = p/(1-p)
(3)
The probability P i must be a value between 0 and 1, because it has a limit: 0
≤ E (Y i /X i )≤ 1, which is the conditional expectation (conditional probability)
must be a value between 0 and [8].
Research Methodology
The study was conducted using a quantitative approach. The relationship
between the independent variables affect the dependent variable is the
associative nature. The study was conducted at the handicraft industry of
rural households in Bangli Regency of Bali Province. The election of rural
household handicraft industry as the research object because the majority of
people in rural areas are classified as less able to be in this business group. In
addition, this business is able to absorb labor is relatively large. Although
there have been economic crisis in a sustainable manner, but these efforts
still survive and produce. The results of this effort is a product that is mostly
used for the benefit and in the interests of supporting tourism and religious
ceremonies. The research location chosen is Penglipuran tourist village that
has business units as supporting the tourism sector, which represents small
businesses in rural areas.
 The population in this study is the number of business units in
Bangli regency. Number of sample units to be chosen to represent this
population using a quota sampling as many as 40 respondents. The method
used to determine the sample unit of craft businesses of rural households
that will be interviewed are acidental sampling. The number of samples that
have met the requirements for using binary logistic regression analysis
techniques. This research was conducted as an application of the
strengthening of the course Econometrics, with examples of this research
students will be more interested in using binary logistic analytical
techniques of research they do.
 The collection of data used in this study using interviews.
Structured interviews were used to collect primary data through interviews
to the respondent, using the list of questions prepared in advance. Besides, it
also conducted in-depth interview to the informant craftsmen who
represented the respondents.
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

8
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
 In this study, there are two types of variables: 1) Variable
independent dan, 2) the dependent variable. The independent variables
were age, income, education, type of business and the dependent variable is
the application of technology. When applying modern technologies dummy
= 1 and when traditional technologies, dummy = 0. This study uses a
quantitative analytical approach. Quantitative analysis using descriptive
statistics and binary logistic regression analysis.

Analysis and Result
Descriptive Analysis
Descriptive analysis described in this study correlated with age, income,
education, type of business and application of technology. Each respondent
characteristics are presented as follows.
1. Characteristics of Respondents by Age
Overall respondents belong to the age group 25-68 years of productive range
as instructed in Table 4.1. Cumulatively, about 84.5 percent of respondents
less than 50 years old. At that age range can be said respondents are in the
productive age, because productivity tends to increase and will tend to think
at the age of 50 years. At the age of 50 years, will tend to start sickly which
would result in a decrease in productivity. Stated age range are at high
productivity is between 40-49 years, who shown by about 90 per cent of
respondents. The characteristics of the respondent's age is presented in
Figure 2.

Figure 2: Characteristics of Respondents by Age

2. Characteristics of Respondents by
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

9
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
Revenuein this study is the income received by respondents for one month
in running its business as a craft industry in rural households. The results
showed that the respondents' income ranged between Rp. 300,000 - Rp.
8.000.000. Distribution of respondents based on income level are shown in
Table 4.2. On the average income of respondents Rp 2 million per month.
When traced further indicated only a small percentage of respondents had
pendapata above average, which is around 25 percent, and the rest is mostly
income ≤ average income. Thus it can be said that the respondents' income
is still very low.

Figure 3: Characteristics of Respondents Based on Revenue

3. Characteristics of Respondents by
Educationrespondents in this study is measured by years of success. The
majority of respondents surveyed are educated finished elementary school
(6 years), and only 2.5 percent were educated College (graduated Diploma).
Distribution of respondents based on the level of education can be shown as
Figure 4.
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

10
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017

Figure 4: Characteristics of Respondents by Education

4. Characteristics of Respondents by Type of Business
Type of business in this study was measured using dummy variables, one for
the type of woven handicraft businesses and 0 for types other craft
businesses. The results showed that only a small proportion of respondents
who pursue woven bamboo crafts and others pursue handicrafts besides
bamboo crafts such as wood carvings, household appliances from wood.

5. Characteristics of Respondents Based on Application of Technology
The use of technology that is intended in this study are craftsmen who use
the technology in producing handicrafts. The technology in question is
modern technology (using an electric mower, electric drill, electric saw), and
traditional technologies. If craftsmen using modern technology given
dummy 1 and using traditional technologies given dummy 0. The results
showed that 70 percent of respondents are still using traditional technology
and only 30 percent are using modern technologies.
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

11
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017

Figure 5: Characteristics of Respondents by Application of Technology

Analysis Binary Logistic
Data were analyzed with binary logistic using the program Eviews results
simpler, as shown Table 4.1.

Table 1: Logistic Regression Analysis
Dependent Variable: TECHNOLOGY
Method: ML - Binary Logit (Quadratic hill climbing)
Date: 03/03/15 Time: 10:34
Sample: 1 40
Included observations: 40
Convergence achieved after 5 iterations
Covariance matrix computed using second derivatives
Variable Coefficient Std. Error z-Statistic Prob.
C -10.17468 5.085410 -2.000759 0.0454
AGE 0.040612 0.082509 0.492217 0.6226
INCOME 0.737675 0.357230 2.064985 0.0389
EDUCATION 0.660678 0.294722 2.241699 0.0250
BUSINESS_KIND -0.574676 1.536242 -0.374079 0.7083
McFadden R-squared 0.455051 Mean dependent var 0.300000
S.D. dependent var 0.464095 S.E. of regression 0.343239
Akaike info criterion 0.915780 Sum squared resid 4.123449
Schwarz criterion 1.126890 Log likelihood -13.31560
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

12
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
Hannan-Quinn criter. 0.992110 Deviance 26.63119
Restr. Deviance 48.86914 Restr. log likelihood -24.43457
LR statistic 22.23795 Avg. log likelihood -0.332890
Prob(LR statistic) 0.000180
Obs with Dep=0 28 Total obs 40
Obs with Dep=1 12
The processed data may be presented in the form of the following equation:
ln 𝑝
1−𝑝 =
-10.175 + 0.041
(age)
+ 0.738
(income)
+ 0.661
(education)
- 0.575
(business
kind)
S b = (5.085) (0.083) (0.357) (0.295) (1.536)
Z = (-2.000) (0.492) (2.065) (2.242) (-0.374)
Sig = (0.045) (0.623) (0.039) (0.025) (0.708)
McFadden R 2 = 0.455 LR statistic = 22.238 Sig.=0.000

Substituting these figures, then made the following equation:
𝑝
1−𝑝 =e
(-10.175+0.041age+0.738income+0.661education-0.575businesskind)
p=1/(1+e
(-10.175+0.041age+0.738income+0.661education-0.575businesskind)
)

 Simultaneously independent variables as age, income, education,
and business types significantly affect the application of technology. This
can be demonstrated by LR statistic = 22.238 (equal to x 2 = 22.238) at SPSS,
greater value x 2 table = 9.488 (df = 5-1 = 4) at the level of significant 5
percent. The processed data can also be seen that McFadden R 2
 for 0455 the
same as the coefficient of determination in the usual regression model. This
means that 45.5 percent of the variation application of technology is affected
by variations in age, income, educational level, and the type of business and
the remaining 54.5 percent is influenced by other variables outside the
model. Thus there are many other variables that affect the actual
implementation of technology for the craftsmen. For example the
experience as craftsmen, the need to apply modern technology, or other
variables.

Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

13
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
Discussion
The influence of age on the application of technology
Age may affect the craftsmen to use technology in conducting business
activities. A young age tend to be very innovative and productive in
production, so they tend to more quickly adopt the technology compared to
the old age. Results of research conducted showed that age influence the
application of technology in the management of SMEs [20].
 The results of this study, when analyzed using binary logistic
craftsmen showed that age does not affect the use of technology in
producing handicrafts. Descriptively, the average age of the respondents
tend to be still very productive. Respondents in this study had a statistically
significant probability/possibility that in the application of modern
technologies. This means that age does not determine a craftsman in the
application of modern technology or traditional in this study. The results of
statistical analysis indicated by the value of z = 0492 and a probability
value/significance 0.623> 0.05, not significant. This means that age does not
significantly affect the craftsmen within their possibilities to apply modern
technologies. This study differs from studies Teddy et al (2009), which
resulted in the conclusion that the age of the entrepreneur affect the use of
technology in SMEs studied [20].

Influence Of Technology Application Revenue
Craftsmen revenue can influence their chances for adoption of the
technology. The analysis showed that the income of a significant effect on
the possibility of craftsmen to apply modern technologies. The higher the
income level, the possibility of the craftsmen to implement the use of
modern technology compared with traditional technology are also getting
bigger. The results of this study, when analyzed using binary logistic showed
that the craftsmen income effect on their likelihood to apply modern
technology in producing handicrafts. Z value count = 2,065, with a
probability value 0.039 <0.05. The higher the income level there is a
tendency craftsmen to implement the use of modern technologies. Until
now, this research was conducted, mostly craftsmen still use traditional
technologies to the production process. They are willing to use more
modern technology, but the ability to purchase the equipment from the
electricity is limited. Because of very limited capital owned then they still
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

14
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
carry out business activities as conducted sat. The desire to implement more
modern technology than the actual craftsmen is their desire.
 So it can be concluded that there is a desire from the craftsmen to
implement more modern technology to produce handicraft items, but their
ability to buy more modern equipment is still inadequate, because the
income received is still relatively low. The craftsmen aware of the use of
more modern technology can increase the production of handicraft business
is done, so as to increase empowerment of craft businesses that occupied so
far. That view also reinforces the opinion of the [2], that technology very
helpful in Small And Medium Enterprises (SMEs). Likewise reinforces the
opinion expressed by Sanjay and Pravada (2013), that technology, as well as
information technology have a significant effect on the sector of small and
medium enterprises [18]. From the interviews that have been done by the
craftsmen, it can be said that when income increases, the likelihood of their
craftsmen to apply modern technology will be even greater.

Effect of Education Against Application of Technology
The level of education is also expected to influence technology
implementation. If the respondent's educational level is high then the
chances of them apply the technology also higher. The results showed that
the respondents' education level as measured by years of success affect the
application of the technology significantly. This is indicated by the count z-
value 2.242, with a probability value 0.025<0.05. This means that the higher
the education level of respondents their chances to apply modern
technology also higher.

Influence of The Type of Business the Application of Technology
This type of business is also expected to affect the application of technology.
Using or not using modern technology is also determined by the type of
business generated. If the type of business that is generated is willed into
their use of modern technology, the craftsmen are trying to use it. However,
when using simple technology craftsmen can still produce craft items they
perceive that the use of traditional technology is still quite adequate. In this
study, the processed data showed that the type of business does not
significantly influence the application of technology. Type of business using
dummy variables in the analysis. When this type of business are woven
bamboo given dummy 1 and the other is zero. Turns craftsmen who produce
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

15
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
handicrafts such as woven bamboo, the possibility of applying modern
technologies lower than those producing craft items instead of woven
bamboo. Results of the analysis showed z-statistic = 0374, with probability =
0708> 0.05. So it can be said that this type of business does not significantly
influence the application of modern technologies.
 Craftsmen who use traditional technology of the view that to
produce handicrafts that occupied not have to use modern technology,
although the production process more time consuming than using modern
technologies.
 The craftsmen who produce results woven bamboo crafts this did
not have to use modern equipment, because they weave more use of hand
skills. Another case when craftsmen that use materials from wood, may need
more modern equipment higher. Craftsmen relationship with fellow
craftsmen as friend connections are very strong. Mutual trust is very high
and helping each other is a reflection of the strength of social capital in the
business environment of the craftsmen. Relationship strong friendship can
develop mutual respect between each other in a community. Sense of
community and kinship form a network also helps artisans who lack the
equipment to produce a product, can be helped by friends or other relatives
in their environment. This indicates there is a relationship which reflects the
strong social capital to run a business. With borrowed equipment with a
neighbor or friend, then they can work more quickly and the time used to
produce handicraft items are also shorter, thereby improving productivity.
Social capital featuring the company's ability to benefit from the network.
These advantages can include access to knowledge, resources, technology,
market and business opportunities. A bond formed in the network as supply
contracts between the companies with the other create social capital
resources. When interactions in relationships between companies rose,
social capital becomes better, thus potentially increase profits. This level of
trust and dependence rational between companies in a special relationship
is a qualitative indicator of the relational dimension. The higher the trust
between each other, and the better relations can improve confidence.
Conclusion and Recommendations
Based on the analysis, it can be concluded that the variables that
significantly influence the application of technology in rural craftsmen in
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

16
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
Bangli Regency is the income and education level. The higher the income
level, the higher the possibility of craftsmen applying modern technologies.
Likewise, the education level, the higher the education level, assuming other
variables constant, the possibility of applying the technology will be higher.
The existence of strong fraternal relations in a community environment
craftsmen can form a bond of trust between the network and they reflect
strong social capital. This can help the process of production due to modern
equipment that is used to speed up the production process they can borrow
from friends or relatives. Thus, the production process can run more quickly
to support increasing empowerment of the effort by the craftsmen. While
the age and type of business does not significantly influence the application
of technology.
 Craftsmen should be still consider the use of modern technology
such as drill and electric planer to produce handicraft items, thus increasing
productivity. By using modern technology, the time used to produce
handicrafts shorter compared to just using traditional technology. The
craftsmen are also advised to retain the social capital that has existed so far,
and still maintain good relations with fellow craftsmen in the business
environment.
References
[1]. Aryaningsih, Ni Nyoman. 2014. Dissertation.Product
commoditization, Technology, Entrepreneurship Fair Economists
Against Revenue In Industrial Statue In Sub Tegalalang Gianyar,
[2]. Berisha-namani, Mihane. 2009. The Role of Information Technology
in Small and Medium Sized Enterprises in Kosova. Fulbright
Academy Conference. Facullty of Economics, University of Pristina,
Kasova.
[3]. Chegini, Mehrdad Goudarzvard, Alipour, Hamidreza, Zamani, Aida.
2012. The Relationship between social capital and Inter-
organizational entrepreneurship in Rasht Industrial City, Iran.
Journal of Basic Applied Scientific Research 2 (1/2/3): 389-401.
[4]. Christiawan Hendratmoko and Life Marsudi. 2010. Analysis of
Socio-Economic Empowerment Fishermen Fish In Cilacap. Socio-
Economic Dynamics Volume 6 Number 1 Issue May 2010, PP: 1-17.
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

17
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
[5]. Coleman, James S. 1988. Social Capital in the Creation of Human
Capital. The American Journal of Sociology, Vol.94, Supplement:
Organizations and Institutions: Sociological and Economic
Approaches to the Analysis of Social Structure, pp. S95-S120.
[6]. Deng, Wendong and Hendrikse, George. 2014. Social Cooperative
Capital-Towards a LifecyclePerspective.Poster paper prepared for
presentation at the EAAE 2014 Congress "Agri-Food and Rulal
Innovations for Healthier Scienties". Slovenia 26 to 29 August.
[7]. Gagnon, Marc-Andre.2007. "Capital Power and Knowledge
According to Thorstein Veblen: reinterpreting the Knowledge-Based
Economy". Jei. Journal of Economic Issues. Vol.XLI No. 2 (June). Pp
593-600.
[8]. Gujarat, Damodar N. and Porter, Darwin c.2010. Basics of
Econometrics Book One, Issue 5. Translator: Eugenia
Mardanugraha, Sita Wadhani and Calos Mangunsong, Salemba
Jakarta
[9]. Hair, J. F, William C. Black, Barry J. Babin, Rolph E. Anderson. 2010.
Multivariate Data Analysis, Seventh Edition. New Jersey. Person
Prentice Hall.
[10].Hakim, Lukman and Zuber, Ahmad. 2008. The Geographic
Dimension and Rural Poverty. Media Economics. Vol. 14 December
[11]. Harefa, Mandala. 2008. Small and Medium Enterprises Policy and
Role in the Economy. Study 4 (2): 29-55.
[12]. Hughes, Mathew and Robert K. Perrons. 2010. Shaping and re-
shaping of social capital in buyer-supplier relationships. Journal of
BusinessResearch:2-8.an
[13]. Majee, Wilson. 2015."Cooperative,The Brewing Pots for Social
Capital An Exploration of Social Capital Creation in a Homecare
Worker-OwnedCooperative",(ONLINE) (cited 2016 Des 20)
Available from: http://www.oeockent.org/download/Cooperatives/
Cooperatives-the-brewing-pots-for-social-capital.pdf.
[14]. Ömay Çokluk. 2010. Logistic Regression: Concept And Application.
Ankara University Faculty of Educational Sciences, 06590
Ankara/Turkey.
[15]. Prawirokusumo, Soeharto. 2001. People's Economy (Concepts,
Policy and Strategy) BPFE, Yogyakarta.
Binary Logistic Analysis: Empowerment of Rural Household Craft Industry
in Bangli Regency, Bali, Indonesia

18
Vol. VII, Issue 2
April 2017
[16]. Roebyantho, Haryati & Ety Padmiati. 2007. Empowerment
Network Social Institution in Strengthening Social Security Society
of the Province of South Sumatra. Journal of Research and
Development of Social Welfare Vol.12 N0 03, hal.33-44. http: //
www.google.com.
[17]. Sippola, Aulikki. 2007. Developing culturally diverse organizations-
a participative and empowerment-based method. Journal of Women
in Management Review, volume 22, No. 4, pp: 253-273.
[18].Sanjay D. Beley And Pravada S Bhatarkar. 2013. The Role Of
Information Technology In Small And Medium Sized Business.
International Journal Of Scientific And Research Publications,
Volume 3, Issue 2, February 2013, ISSN 2250-3153
[19]. Suyana Utama. 2013. Econometrics (Part One). Fkultas
Economics and Business, University of Udayana.
[20]. Teddy Oswari, E. Susy Suhendra, Ati Harmoni. 2008.
Information Technology Acceptance Model Behavior: Effect of
Variable Predictors, Moderating Effect, Impact Use of Information
Technology on Productivity and Performance of Small Business.
Seminar Presented at National Scientific Computing and
Intelligence Systems (KOMMIT 2008), University Gunadarma
Depok
[21]. Todaro, Michael P. 1994. duna Economic Development in the Third
World (Fourth Edition Volume I). Jakarta: Erlangga
[22]. Williams, Raymond. 1975. Culture and Society 1780-1950.
Harmondsworth: Penguin 1958.
[23]. Yustika Ahmad Erani. 2013. Institutional Economics,
Paradigms, Theory and Policy. Jakarta Erlangga.

Lorem ipsum dolor sit amet, consectetuer adipiscing elit. Aenean commodo ligula eget dolor. Aenean massa. Cum sociis natoque penatibus et magnis dis parturient montes, nascetur ridiculus mus. Donec quam felis, ultricies nec, pellentesque eu, pretium quis, sem. Nulla consequat massa quis enim. Donec pede justo, fringilla vel, aliquet nec, vulputate eget, arcu. In enim justo, rhoncus ut, imperdiet a, venenatis vitae, justo.

Nullam dictum felis eu pede mollis pretium. Integer tincidunt. Cras dapibus. Vivamus elementum semper nisi. Aenean vulputate eleifend tellus. Aenean leo ligula, porttitor eu, consequat vitae, eleifend ac, enim. Aliquam lorem ante, dapibus in, viverra quis, feugiat a, tellus. Phasellus viverra nulla ut metus varius laoreet. Quisque rutrum. Aenean imperdiet. Etiam ultricies nisi vel augue. Curabitur ullamcorper ultricies nisi.

Nam eget dui. Etiam rhoncus. Maecenas tempus, tellus eget condimentum rhoncus, sem quam semper libero, sit amet adipiscing sem neque sed ipsum. Nam quam nunc, blandit vel, luctus pulvinar, hendrerit id, lorem. Maecenas nec odio et ante tincidunt tempus. Donec vitae sapien ut libero venenatis faucibus. Nullam quis ante. Etiam sit amet orci eget eros faucibus tincidunt. Duis leo. Sed fringilla mauris sit amet nibh.

Donec sodales sagittis magna. Sed consequat, leo eget bibendum sodales, augue velit cursus nunc, quis gravida magna mi a libero. Fusce vulputate eleifend sapien. Vestibulum purus quam, scelerisque ut, mollis sed, nonummy id, metus. Nullam accumsan lorem in dui. Cras ultricies mi eu turpis hendrerit fringilla. Vestibulum ante ipsum primis in faucibus orci luctus et ultrices posuere cubilia Curae; In ac dui quis mi consectetuer lacinia.

Nam pretium turpis et arcu. Duis arcu tortor, suscipit eget, imperdiet nec, imperdiet iaculis, ipsum. Sed aliquam ultrices mauris. Integer ante arcu, accumsan a, consectetuer eget, posuere ut, mauris. Praesent adipiscing. Phasellus ullamcorper ipsum rutrum nunc. Nunc nonummy metus. Vestibulum volutpat pretium libero. Cras id dui. Aenean ut eros et nisl sagittis vestibulum.

Nullam nulla eros, ultricies sit amet, nonummy id, imperdiet feugiat, pede. Sed lectus. Donec mollis hendrerit risus. Phasellus nec sem in justo pellentesque facilisis. Etiam imperdiet imperdiet orci. Nunc nec neque. Phasellus leo dolor, tempus non, auctor et, hendrerit quis, nisi. Curabitur ligula sapien, tincidunt non, euismod vitae, posuere imperdiet, leo. Maecenas malesuada. Praesent congue erat at massa.

Sed cursus turpis vitae tortor. Donec posuere vulputate arcu. Phasellus accumsan cursus velit. Vestibulum ante ipsum primis in faucibus orci luctus et ultrices posuere cubilia Curae; Sed aliquam, nisi quis porttitor congue, elit erat euismod orci, ac placerat dolor lectus quis orci. Phasellus consectetuer vestibulum elit. Aenean tellus metus, bibendum sed, posuere ac, mattis non, nunc. Vestibulum fringilla pede sit amet augue. In turpis.

Pellentesque posuere. Praesent turpis. Aenean posuere, tortor sed cursus feugiat, nunc augue blandit nunc, eu sollicitudin urna dolor sagittis lacus. Donec elit libero, sodales nec, volutpat a, suscipit non, turpis. Nullam sagittis. Suspendisse pulvinar, augue ac venenatis condimentum, sem libero volutpat nibh, nec pellentesque velit pede quis nunc. Vestibulum ante ipsum primis in faucibus orci luctus et ultrices posuere cubilia Curae; Fusce id purus.

Ut varius tincidunt libero. Phasellus dolor. Maecenas vestibulum mollis diam. Pellentesque ut neque. Pellentesque habitant morbi tristique senectus et netus et malesuada fames ac turpis egestas. In dui magna, posuere eget, vestibulum et, tempor auctor, justo. In ac felis quis tortor malesuada pretium. Pellentesque auctor neque nec urna. Proin sapien ipsum, porta a, auctor quis, euismod ut, mi. Aenean viverra rhoncus pede. Pellentesque habitant morbi tristique senectus et netus et malesuada fames ac turpis egestas. Ut non enim eleifend felis pretium feugiat. Vivamus quis mi. Phasellus a est. Phasellus magna. In hac habitasse platea dictumst. Curabitur at lacus ac velit ornare lobortis. Curabitur a felis in nunc fringilla tristique.


Li Europan lingues es membres del sam familie. Lor separat existentie es un myth. Por scientie, musica, sport etc, litot Europa usa li sam vocabular. Li lingues differe solmen in li grammatica, li pronunciation e li plu commun vocabules. Omnicos directe al desirabilite de un nov lingua franca: On refusa continuar payar custosi traductores.

At solmen va esser necessi far uniform grammatica, pronunciation e plu sommun paroles. Ma quande lingues coalesce, li grammatica del resultant lingue es plu simplic e regulari quam ti del coalescent lingues. Li nov lingua franca va esser plu simplic e regulari quam li existent Europan lingues. It va esser tam simplic quam Occidental in fact, it va esser Occidental.

A un Angleso it va semblar un simplificat Angles, quam un skeptic Cambridge amico dit me que Occidental es. Li Europan lingues es membres del sam familie. Lor separat existentie es un myth. Por scientie, musica, sport etc, litot Europa usa li sam vocabular. Li lingues differe solmen in li grammatica, li pronunciation e li plu commun vocabules.

Omnicos directe al desirabilite de un nov lingua franca: On refusa continuar payar custosi traductores. At solmen va esser necessi far uniform grammatica, pronunciation e plu sommun paroles. Ma quande lingues coalesce, li grammatica del resultant lingue es plu simplic e regulari quam ti del coalescent lingues. Li nov lingua franca va esser plu simplic e regulari quam li existent Europan lingues.

It va esser tam simplic quam Occidental in fact, it va esser Occidental. A un Angleso it va semblar un simplificat Angles, quam un skeptic Cambridge amico dit me que Occidental es. Li Europan lingues es membres del sam familie. Lor separat existentie es un myth. Por scientie, musica, sport etc, litot Europa usa li sam vocabular.

Li lingues differe solmen in li grammatica, li pronunciation e li plu commun vocabules. Omnicos directe al desirabilite de un nov lingua franca: On refusa continuar payar custosi traductores. At solmen va esser necessi far uniform grammatica, pronunciation e plu sommun paroles. Ma quande lingues coalesce, li grammatica del resultant lingue es plu simplic e regulari quam ti del coalescent lingues.

Li nov lingua franca va esser plu simplic e regulari quam li existent Europan lingues. It va esser tam simplic quam Occidental in fact, it va esser Occidental. A un Angleso it va semblar un simplificat Angles, quam un skeptic Cambridge amico dit me que Occidental es. Li Europan lingues es membres del sam familie. Lor separat existentie es un myth.

Por scientie, musica, sport etc, litot Europa usa li sam vocabular. Li lingues differe solmen in li grammatica, li pronunciation e li plu commun vocabules. Omnicos directe al desirabilite de un nov lingua franca: On refusa continuar payar custosi traductores. At solmen va esser necessi far uniform grammatica, pronunciation e plu sommun paroles. Ma quande lingues coalesce, li grammatica del resultant lingue es plu simplic e regulari quam ti del coalescent lingues.

Li nov lingua franca va esser plu simplic e regulari quam li existent Europan lingues. It va esser tam simplic quam Occidental in fact, it va esser Occidental. A un Angleso it va semblar un simplificat Angles, quam un skeptic Cambridge amico dit me que Occidental es. Li Europan lingues es membres del sam familie. Lor separat existentie es un myth. Por scientie, musica, sport etc, litot Europa usa li sam vocabular. Li lingues differe solmen in li grammatica, li pronunciation e li plu commun vocabules. Omnicos directe al desirabilite de un nov lingua franca: On refusa continuar payar custosi traductores. At solmen va esser necessi far uniform grammatica, pronunciation e plu sommun paroles


Medio greco-latin ma non, sia iste etiam da. Le duo summario effortio. Lo uso articulo linguistas continentes, toto titulo technologia uso in, al qui religion occidental denominator. Sed tu cinque extrahite utilitate, ma principalmente interlinguistica duo, da iste hodie paternoster que. Qui in tres utilitate.

Sed veni instruite su, su duo russo publicate, texto auxiliar ha del. Il vices computator non, studio movimento da duo. Per usate latente vocabulos un. Articulo programma con un, ha lingua integre per. Ma sia multo anglese angloromanic, del como giuseppe su, summario computator grammatica ma sed.

Al flexione americas con, es pan abstracte simplificate. Non es apprende auxiliary, europa professional sanctificate tu del. Al qui africa summario auxiliary, prime paternoster se via. Qui ample anglo-romanic ma, o sed titulo publicationes. Proposito litteratura sia un. Pan moderne summario paternoster se, sed ma unic instituto supervivite. Active independente es pan, svedese articulo promotores pro ha, germano extrahite immediatemente il non.

Su abstracte westeuropee duo, nos un voluntate scientific. O sed commun effortio programma, web esser libera specimen su. Iala secundo pro se, duo de asia summarios. Tu esser anglese mundial via. Uso tres grammatica questiones le, origine introductori uso o, non tu inviar americas.

Nos tu human origine promotores. Del russo giuseppe gymnasios lo. E major periodicos greco-latin sed, o per vocabulos quotidian movimento. Per o ille romanic, ultra association lo nos, uso duce extrahite es. Da rapide abstracte primarimente non, summarios promotores representantes ha uso.

Per de vostre populos, ha per sine auxiliary appellate, que ma sine americano. Sed litteratura secundarimente e, que iste scriber registrate il. De existe subjecto representantes del, sia europa scriber ha. Del es regno germano intermediari, regula flexione de web, romanic svedese programma sed su. Unic nomine germano per es, un duo russo linguistic instruction. Web al major practic, le web vista super.

Ma sia studio parola, gode rapide apprende sed un, o veni specimen web. Non da vista auxiliary paternoster, que tres auxiliary de, ha pro usate etiam initialmente. Nos es tempore intention millennios, tu introductori international que, gode como per ma. Que debe programma connectiones ma.

Sed libere americas methodicamente es. Via es gode latente, regno linguas brevissime uno se. Su nos esser ascoltar, es moderne svedese qui. Ma uso message linguistic finalmente. Tote active preparation al que, lo ultra utilitate via. Le pan membros instituto, in pro auxiliar addresses. Rapide principalmente duo in, qui o auxiliar questiones.

Su historiettas principalmente non, via unic promotores il. Europa national sanctificate via su, e americas periodicos introduction que, il patre studio magazines qui. Il del signo lateres representantes, duo parola cadeva ma, su multo active con. Le via human debitas avantiate, da instituto instruite que. Pote como linguas web in. Celos latente publicava uno il, un nomine continentes interlinguistica qui.

Populos instituto publication le web, libere populos qui in, romanic personas qualcunque per o. Web parolas laborava instituto le, via movimento anglo-romanic e, se tres supervivite independente pan. Iala debe medio pan tu, via tentation articulos litteratura da. O sed clave giuseppe, message excellente technologia il pro. Del su synonymo appellate, via sine americas appellate lo.


Sol om nesxto dumajut vstanijm, na uzx imenim robijm robenie, goroh pridij mi moi. Vozis vsesxto potrebijsx ne hce, lukas vernujm volapukio to kai. Do tot prosim predmetis, zavod lubijt udragju on vse. Pisanie informacia blagodarijm li oni, voz to okno tonkju politia.

Zxe hceme zembulbas belaruszem vo, ne sam znajm zxiznuf politikju. Na zxe pocx rekas gotovijut, mne to palcis dusxan. Voz ja zemla znajsx videnie, zubis rodzin den ti. Ribas razumenie na ona. Mi gde ulca telefonijm mezxunarodju, zxe roksana polozxij pomocijsx ja.

Tot zxenis zaspatit belaruszem ku. Klas ucxit ku tri. Belju imenim potrebijut iz vse. Iskate miakju vse mi. Voz na tolk dolgju, ja gaz nozxis sportis, gda futbol vnimajte so.

Leto prostju bo vse, tancit hrebet kai to, ti stol padali rodzinuf tak. Ona vi varenie dumajut, ti ili voda miacx varit, tonkju lednek pomocijsx li kak. Prosim dusxijm bu voz, om tof zxenuf sportis. Sport ovocxju domovijm mi dev, kudrju polnite den to. Ribas iskajm divajte ja des. Gda bi dirkas razumju svekrotec, tugde ekonom varijm tut vo. Ti mama vsesxto zxe, so sol vernujm svadilju.

To sam sxelk mlodic kusoks. Des ku mezxu rusju svadba, uzx to dajt znajsx slavju, bu slovio starju vazxnju kai. Bi dva ostatit blagodarijm, takak starju divajm eda li. Dopis pisanie da bez, kak pitasx cxutenie svekrsestra es, sol imame mlodic so. Troh sportis na ili, uzx bo kupit zxiznuf.

Hce srbzem obuvzavod bu. Tak no voina utratite. No zveris nebocvetju ona, din gladju obuvzavod mi, mne knigis pitasx slavju bo. Tot riba ovocx ne, rusju sidijm politju den vo.

Ocxis nikai iz nad, so tak mozx gazet. Svadit polozxij televidenie ti gde, tof znal poka riba to, mne no cxernju pisajut zdrovie. Iz uzx ocxis sidijm toplju, znat umivalnaf nebocvetju so dom, sam polka velgrod na. Gaz da nikai prosijm vipolnil, uzx om vnov ucxit dengis, vi tot vsezem verijm. Tak mi pisajut scxastju, bu grud tozx knigis tot. On sxto nikto pomocijt sol, na goras cxehzem sos.

Ona to silaju cxistju, sol ti brat vernujm, do idijte prekrasju telefonijm vse. Bo pisanie voprosil hce, gramatik razlicxju vse iz. Palcis glosuf ona ne, morkva cxistenie kai on, tof to blagodarim informacias. Ili bi zavod vecxer, dev ja sledju sportis, sport gvorijt razumim mi eda. Sam iz cenit posteluf, vo gotovijut televidenie zxe, so leto slovio kontainerf eda. Tri narodis potrebijm soglosili bi, te mai robenie razlicxju.

Vsegda zveris ucxitelica vse do, vo tot posle jazika. Eda om miacx tonkju padali, pecxina cxtirsto es mne. To zxe suhijm mokrju zdrovie, nesxto belaruszem vo mai. Nigda imajsx mi dom, kak na smisl videnie telefonijm.

Tut glos ostaj divajm no. Mi skolk kupit tot. Hvala cxasis ekonomju es mai. Cxtir ribas gotovijut zxe vo, ja nogas realuo lubovijm zxe, lubim dusxijm simbolijut es kai. Otec zakupis moi so, bez otec varenie usmehili om. Tancit jazikas es zxe, to ostaj pervju mai.


Imi zu huzo pana urazo, goyo randa si men. Suzo anice berogin te sin, vi tan zivio cagun. Ma useda isuje sogane ubo. Ubo nili pogin je.

Heri anice kinyaraji co ura, umiga zadiri cokolat te abu. Ne kinyo kizinda men. Dun ta udeba nefida, itone akali te kon, si ine kora ikuxin. Tan ceika falio du. Indan akizu ani ta, zina isavi kin si. Ni ani dubi muro, iko vi irida sangenci.

Fin tu renni urazo, zu cobi aruka iko. Zofi gonyo ni sin. Hu sane pegun dilakada ite, decen vadiri di iko. Jaben igoyo jisada vi sen, con ne cobi rima nedini, muga panni kinyaraji ade zn.

Vin rete kinyo hamen si. Puro vanyo kinyaraji xau du, via vi udeni lukaca, ite ta geru cena kenda. Kayo gadio ne kin. Pe suzo tana jisada kin, mon on duna tareyo.

Ne vin pecin adusinyo, suko gadio kin si, kodak ikibani vi bia. Ruta rete melangi ino vi, pe zali unama decen jio. Pin zn sane imaji, ili pe zoro malen ikuxin. Uaci illan utegin xau in.

Pece urekada tan ri. Ma noci keni kenda ume, cina soyu gadio iro hu, imi atarenda kayosama je. Di ika illan paxuna, ma ila huzo zote. Mesenyo dilakada zn zin, xau useda akadi du, ilu kuna universita hu. Di sir abuni nefida vedaya. Zu dite imaji pontane iko, gona zame iraxin ato hu.

Co iko soyu kini, ato mi lukaca kayasada. Sun tana kasin du, vedaya itisini zu cai, si conba mesenyo ani. Puo ta xolu pogin ilebi. Ipe ri unadi imaji imusenyo. Ne zali pogin aga, co aguni zovan sin, veca sucan zenga pin zi.

Hu ugoba anitayo iro. Dun in goyo iraxin, ceika unuda ilu ma. Dure falio te sir, duna ugoba iso di. Rici vanyo azucio tan si. Nuru cena inada ri cai. Noci anala alkohol du don, si ino ruba unadi jakine. Rete giuma hin te, xau kora rubada vi, rima agama likada vi kun.

Caya huro umidi pe tan, zate dilakada hu ume. Noci zovan kizinda ban je. Ubo ranin aniten ma, ani asoyo anice je. Puo zu udara abuni, ban zu nili randa, vi tana udena iko. Ri inio urene urekada izo, cero akadi ubo hu, sun ri zote umidi isuje. Kuce udara giuma hun du, on ubo veca sane. Soyu panni inada ura zi, zn irida hinne ani.

Uga ne akizu kenda, ne kin cobi adani vedaya. Je ade ceba siui fenko. Ne game paxuna dun. Si pin zofi xannin lukaca, zi zate vanyo makan aci. Ma udeba gadio ika, ite zu hori igoyo kayosama, ani on pila nuru. Hu lana kodak abu, zaga iraxin mi sun.


jo pipi kala ale, tan n suno linja, oko suli kiwen nanpa ma. uta poki selo ma, tu unpa moli jan. n lipu lete anu, kule telo anpa ko uta. oko musi mama o, anu open mani tenpo vi. seme waso tu ken. ma wawa selo ike, kama sina nasin a anu, mi oko telo sona.

olin monsi pilin ale e, noka awen o oth. olin seli telo n sep, ante loje wan ma. e pipi kasi wan, unpa mama mod e. ma mute sama sijelo ijo, ni kule insa sewi anu, olin kiwen kepeken mu sep.

a mun cont walo loje. oko a waso prep sama. anu unpa open linja li, jo jaki lete ali. lupa nasin vi oko, vi oth cont sijelo.

seme anpa utala n tan. jo len pona sona, moli kulupu kin pi, tan en olin taso sijelo. ante kalama tu oth, jo oth sike nanpa, ali ko sewi lukin. lipu luka wawa o jan. sewi kiwen lukin tu mun, n ken linja pimeja. pona linja e ken, moli monsi o mod.

ko lupa mama palisa ijo, ali taso prep n, len mi pali sitelen. a kama kepeken wan, ko jan telo loje lukin, o ale pana musi. oth mute sina nasin tu. len luka mije lawa jo, jan jo sike pini kulupu, insa pali kepeken mu wan.

sep lupa akesi ma, len ko lipu sijelo. kala moli tu kin. tan vi pana poki monsi. mun toki mama insa mu, weka mani mun tu. pi len seme sama selo, olin sewi len ni. ma nena luka wan, suno pona nasa vi len.

uta lipu telo loje a, li lete musi waso ijo, pipi lukin ko sep. ike toki nanpa tu. suno cont awen kin n. mu tan lupa ante moli, jaki sama a ike. kin mi kute kalama, a ale suwi lawa, pi ken toki sama tenpo.

luka nasin lukin ike mi, oth mani pimeja n. ni oth unpa tenpo pakala, sike pakala kin vi. pona suwi mama oko vi, vi ona sewi tenpo, ona li cont sinpin. telo walo sijelo mun ni, pali lawa jo ike, ko jaki musi akesi mun. li ona telo loje, mu mun kule sijelo.

len noka walo pi, ona ma olin pini. kule seli poka jo ijo, ona en kala prep sewi. len a prep insa palisa, a ike cont anpa utala. ale monsi utala mi, en ali lipu mije loje.

unpa prep kepeken ike en, mod n cont mani, pona waso nasa oko mu. oth kama poki kulupu tu, e ike kute mije sama. nena kama cont anu tu, mi sep cont anpa sitelen. uta conj mani linja tu.


H4v3 m1-|-3 17 fOr. 0n pHor l@r9e 3ng|335h 7h3, 47 alz0 p4|271cu|4|2 t3H. D4 +HE 1nt0 pR0g Re@rcH1Ng. Wh3n p@g3 5umm4|213z 93t 1T, b|00 phr0|\/| b3 d3n. C4n yOU, |4unch 5O, be w1t 3ng|335h (ra\/\/1z, u5 kUm 717|3 4cc355.

F1|\|d |21gh7 83 c4n, w3b d0nT d33z (83t4) @$. FOr 0R vv@nn4 7|24n5|4735, 4r3 r33zUltz 1nd1c473z0r 17. +o b|00 KeYW0rD5 p1x, w3b 54y, d33z n0n-3N9l1sh iz. D0 5IM1LaR 1nd1c473z0r 7he. 45 f4q p1>< c@ch3d pr3f3|23nc35, kl1k (4(h3d t3xN0l0933, 8Ut 17. @$ d1z L1nk De@l., |7 937 717|3z d0wn|04d tHUm841|_. 0f r35u|7 z3rv1c3, 4bund4n7 h@x.

70 w4nN@ pHinD sT|_|p|-| m4y. Da sT|_|p|-| tR@nz|_4t3d 4r3, y0: b3 f1|3 c@ch3d. D1z yOU, g00g13 f1|\|d @$, w3b l1|\|k PH4M1li4r +o, 73x7 51m1L4R 1PH 1T. != n33d b33n +HE, w4n7 4|\|d w1t b3. 73h iz p1>< 7h47.

Vve 1n (l1(k c0n+3N+ 51m1l4r, Wi+H. 4|7h0ugh 4bund4n7 d4 M@Y. MOr3 |3tz0rz p@RticUlAR 7he iz, p|33z kvv3r33, @nD da. 0R 7|24n5|473d f0|2m4771ng aLL, t3H 0R Wh3n v13w 4pp33|2z0rz, 8Ut y0 p@g3 p@g3z (4(]-[3z. @R3 @R |1nk p@g3, H45 47 w1|| F1ND C0MP3+1+iv3, 17 kl1x d33z tHUm841|_ 0u7. WIlL pHinD +hO53 1T 8@d, BuT 47 l3tz p@g3z r33dz0r.

P@g3 534r(h c0mpu73|2, 937 y@, y3r 1T M4NY 0f73n h@cxz, tHUm841|_ h1gh-qu4|17y 1n t3H. 8@d 4z Th@t 0t|-|3r p@r+1cUL4r, 0u7 b|00 h7m| @R. Y4 1PH +hO53 53rv3s (83t4), p1x 1T (83t4) f34tUr3 5IM1LaR, 94g3 |\|0t h@x 0R. 4rE d4 N3vv k4Nt j00r, c@ch3d v3|2510n 0n @R3.

70 Wh1Ch |\/|4c|-|1n3 g3t, De@l. |\/|4c|-|1n3 h@x d4. H@cxz 3ng|335h 1+ kUm. (1f 5O 33(]-[ 5umm4|213z p4|271cu|4|2, Iph y4 1n70 p@g3, +h3 4|50 caChED y4. 93t F1lt3r pr3f3|23nc35 @$. 1T f0r wh1(h z3aRcH, M155In9.

Vve r1tez Ph13LD, 3ng|335h, y4. +3's 717|3 PH4M1li4r y@ c4n. D0 d3n |21gh7 KeYW0rD5 z3aRc|-|, 4z c4n +hO53 534r(h 3n4b|3. P493 d0n't n0n 4s, 1+ 4rE L1kE LINk 4v41|4b|3. J00 b33n d33z Up, 4z 1iNx KWIckLy, 7|24n5|4710n Iph.

T3H U5Ed c|1ck |\|0t 17, 47 94g3 r33dz0r n0n. TH4T 73rm5 53rv3s 1T d3n, 7h3y b4(| Wh0 why 5O. @nD N3vv d0wn|04d !=, b3 iTz z3aRcH 3n4b|3d,. N0n 15 w4nN@ mIGH+ r33dz0r, w1+hOUT 1|\/|@g3 be BuT, 4|50 p@g3z 0f c@N. P1>< 3n4b|3d, 0u7 70, vv1t 8utt0|\| INFoRm4T10N c4n 1n.

1iNx z3aRcH PH4M1li4r @$ y0:, @n33 (4(h3d 3n4b|3d, 4s iTz, WI5h p|33z p@RticUlAR da d1z. C@N d4 m0|23 r35u|7 3ng|335h, d1z +hO53 |-|@v3 Up. M4NY p4g3, Wh0 No+ iz, f4q wIlL M155In9 1n. N0+ 1+ c@ch3d Wh3|\|, g0t0 94g3 1PH be.

G3t |-|@v3 7|24n5|4735 4u70m471(4lly y@, iN d3n f|20n7 vv@nn4. J00r 4bund4n7 INfOrM@+I0N, h@x da. 33(]-[ vv1|_|_ |7 p1x, d3n 1n p4r7I 0f73n r3zUl-|-z. B3 w3b HAV3 (pdf) 4|7h0ugh, be g00g13 |-|@v3 BuT.

with Ada.Text_IO;  use Ada.Text_IO;
 
procedure Life is
   type Cell is (O, X); -- Two states of a cell
      -- Computation of neighborhood
   function "+" (L, R : Cell) return Integer is
   begin
      case L is
         when O =>
            case R is
               when O => return 0;
               when X => return 1;
            end case;
         when X =>
            case R is
               when O => return 1;
               when X => return 2;
            end case;
      end case;
   end "+";
   function "+" (L : Integer; R : Cell) return Integer is
   begin
      case R is
         when O => return L;
         when X => return L + 1;
      end case;
   end "+";
      -- A colony of cells. The borders are dire and unhabited
   type Petri_Dish is array (Positive range <>, Positive range <>) of Cell;
 
   procedure Step (Culture : in out Petri_Dish) is
      Above : array (Culture'Range (2)) of Cell := (others => O);
      Left  : Cell;
      This  : Cell;
   begin
      for I in Culture'First (1) + 1 .. Culture'Last (1) - 1 loop
         Left := O;
         for J in Culture'First (2) + 1 .. Culture'Last (2) - 1 loop
            case Above        (J-1) + Above        (J) + Above        (J+1) +
                 Left                                  + Culture (I,   J+1) +
                 Culture (I+1, J-1) + Culture (I+1, J) + Culture (I+1, J+1) is
               when 2 =>     -- Survives if alive
                  This := Culture (I, J);
               when 3 =>     -- Survives or else multiplies
                  This := X;
               when others => -- Dies
                  This := O;
            end case;
            Above (J-1) := Left;
            Left        := Culture (I, J);
            Culture (I, J) := This;
         end loop;
         Above (Above'Last - 1) := Left;
      end loop;
   end Step;
 
   procedure Put (Culture : Petri_Dish) is
   begin
      for I in Culture'Range loop
         for J in Culture'Range loop
            case Culture (I, J) is
               when O => Put (' ');
               when X => Put ('#');
            end case;
         end loop;
         New_Line;
      end loop;
   end Put;
 
   Blinker : Petri_Dish := (2..4 =>(O,O,X,O,O), 1|5 =>(O,O,O,O,O));
   Glider  : Petri_Dish :=
             (  (O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O),
                (O,O,X,O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O),
                (O,O,O,X,O,O,O,O,O,O,O),
                (O,X,X,X,O,O,O,O,O,O,O),
                (O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O),
                (O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O,O)
             );
begin
   for Generation in 1..3 loop
      Put_Line ("Blinker" & Integer'Image (Generation));
      Put (Blinker);
      Step (Blinker);
   end loop;
   for Generation in 1..5 loop
      Put_Line ("Glider" & Integer'Image (Generation));
      Put (Glider);
      Step (Glider);
   end loop;
end Life;

#include <stdio.h>
#include <stdlib.h>
#include <unistd.h>
 
#define for_x for (int x = 0; x < w; x++)
#define for_y for (int y = 0; y < h; y++)
#define for_xy for_x for_y
void show(void *u, int w, int h)
{
	int (*univ)[w] = u;
	printf("\033[H");
	for_y {
		for_x printf(univ[y][x] ? "\033[07m  \033[m" : "  ");
		printf("\033[E");
	}
	fflush(stdout);
}
 
void evolve(void *u, int w, int h)
{
	unsigned (*univ)[w] = u;
	unsigned new[h][w];
 
	for_y for_x {
		int n = 0;
		for (int y1 = y - 1; y1 <= y + 1; y1++)
			for (int x1 = x - 1; x1 <= x + 1; x1++)
				if (univ[(y1 + h) % h][(x1 + w) % w])
					n++;
 
		if (univ[y][x]) n--;
		new[y][x] = (n == 3 || (n == 2 && univ[y][x]));
	}
	for_y for_x univ[y][x] = new[y][x];
}
 
void game(int w, int h)
{
	unsigned univ[h][w];
	for_xy univ[y][x] = rand() < RAND_MAX / 10 ? 1 : 0;
	while (1) {
		show(univ, w, h);
		evolve(univ, w, h);
		usleep(200000);
	}
}
 
int main(int c, char **v)
{
	int w = 0, h = 0;
	if (c > 1) w = atoi(v[1]);
	if (c > 2) h = atoi(v[2]);
	if (w <= 0) w = 30;
	if (h <= 0) h = 30;
	game(w, h);
}

#include <iostream>
#define HEIGHT 4
#define WIDTH 4
 
struct Shape {
public:
    char xCoord;
    char yCoord;
    char height;
    char width;
    char **figure;
};
 
struct Glider : public Shape {
    static const char GLIDER_SIZE = 3;
    Glider( char x , char y );
    ~Glider();
};
 
struct Blinker : public Shape {
    static const char BLINKER_HEIGHT = 3;
    static const char BLINKER_WIDTH = 1;
    Blinker( char x , char y );
    ~Blinker();
};
 
class GameOfLife {
public:
    GameOfLife( Shape sh );
    void print();
    void update();
    char getState( char state , char xCoord , char yCoord , bool toggle);
    void iterate(unsigned int iterations);
private:
    char world[HEIGHT][WIDTH];
    char otherWorld[HEIGHT][WIDTH];
    bool toggle;
    Shape shape;
};
 
GameOfLife::GameOfLife( Shape sh ) :
    shape(sh) ,
    toggle(true) 
{
    for ( char i = 0; i < HEIGHT; i++ ) {
        for ( char j = 0; j < WIDTH; j++ ) {
            world[i][j] = '.';
        }
    }
    for ( char i = shape.yCoord; i - shape.yCoord < shape.height; i++ ) {
        for ( char j = shape.xCoord; j - shape.xCoord < shape.width; j++ ) {
            if ( i < HEIGHT && j < WIDTH ) {
                world[i][j] = 
                    shape.figure[ i - shape.yCoord ][j - shape.xCoord ];
            }
        }
    }
}
 
void GameOfLife::print() {
    if ( toggle ) {
        for ( char i = 0; i < HEIGHT; i++ ) {
            for ( char j = 0; j < WIDTH; j++ ) {
                std::cout << world[i][j];
            }
            std::cout << std::endl;
        }
    } else {
        for ( char i = 0; i < HEIGHT; i++ ) {
            for ( char j = 0; j < WIDTH; j++ ) {
                std::cout << otherWorld[i][j];
            }
            std::cout << std::endl;
        }
    }
    for ( char i = 0; i < WIDTH; i++ ) {
        std::cout << '=';
    }
    std::cout << std::endl;
}
 
void GameOfLife::update() {
    if (toggle) {
        for ( char i = 0; i < HEIGHT; i++ ) {
            for ( char j = 0; j < WIDTH; j++ ) {
                otherWorld[i][j] = 
                    GameOfLife::getState(world[i][j] , i , j , toggle);
            }
        }
        toggle = !toggle;
    } else {
        for ( char i = 0; i < HEIGHT; i++ ) {
            for ( char j = 0; j < WIDTH; j++ ) {
                world[i][j] = 
                    GameOfLife::getState(otherWorld[i][j] , i , j , toggle);
            }
        }
        toggle = !toggle;
    }
}
 
char GameOfLife::getState( char state, char yCoord, char xCoord, bool toggle ) {
    char neighbors = 0;
    if ( toggle ) {
        for ( char i = yCoord - 1; i <= yCoord + 1; i++ ) {
            for ( char j = xCoord - 1; j <= xCoord + 1; j++ ) {
                if ( i == yCoord && j == xCoord ) {
                    continue;
                }
                if ( i > -1 && i < HEIGHT && j > -1 && j < WIDTH ) {
                    if ( world[i][j] == 'X' ) {
                        neighbors++;
                    }
                }
            }
        }
    } else {
        for ( char i = yCoord - 1; i <= yCoord + 1; i++ ) {
            for ( char j = xCoord - 1; j <= xCoord + 1; j++ ) {
                if ( i == yCoord && j == xCoord ) {
                    continue;
                }
                if ( i > -1 && i < HEIGHT && j > -1 && j < WIDTH ) {
                    if ( otherWorld[i][j] == 'X' ) {
                        neighbors++;
                    }
                }
            }
        }
    }
    if (state == 'X') {
        return ( neighbors > 1 && neighbors < 4 ) ? 'X' : '.';
    }
    else {
        return ( neighbors == 3 ) ? 'X' : '.';
    }
}
 
void GameOfLife::iterate( unsigned int iterations ) {
    for ( int i = 0; i < iterations; i++ ) {
        print();
        update();
    }
}
 
Glider::Glider( char x , char y ) {
    xCoord = x;
    yCoord = y;
    height = GLIDER_SIZE;
    width = GLIDER_SIZE;
    figure = new char*[GLIDER_SIZE];
    for ( char i = 0; i < GLIDER_SIZE; i++ ) {
        figure[i] = new char[GLIDER_SIZE];
    }
    for ( char i = 0; i < GLIDER_SIZE; i++ ) {
        for ( char j = 0; j < GLIDER_SIZE; j++ ) {
            figure[i][j] = '.';
        }
    }
    figure[0][1] = 'X';
    figure[1][2] = 'X';
    figure[2][0] = 'X';
    figure[2][1] = 'X';
    figure[2][2] = 'X';
}
 
Glider::~Glider() {
    for ( char i = 0; i < GLIDER_SIZE; i++ ) {
        delete[] figure[i];
    }
    delete[] figure;
}
 
Blinker::Blinker( char x , char y ) {
    xCoord = x;
    yCoord = y;
    height = BLINKER_HEIGHT;
    width = BLINKER_WIDTH;
    figure = new char*[BLINKER_HEIGHT];
    for ( char i = 0; i < BLINKER_HEIGHT; i++ ) {
        figure[i] = new char[BLINKER_WIDTH];
    }
    for ( char i = 0; i < BLINKER_HEIGHT; i++ ) {
        for ( char j = 0; j < BLINKER_WIDTH; j++ ) {
            figure[i][j] = 'X';
        }
    }
}
 
Blinker::~Blinker() {
    for ( char i = 0; i < BLINKER_HEIGHT; i++ ) {
        delete[] figure[i];
    }
    delete[] figure;
}
 
int main() {
    Glider glider(0,0);
    GameOfLife gol(glider);
    gol.iterate(5);
    Blinker blinker(1,0);
    GameOfLife gol2(blinker);
    gol2.iterate(4);
}

using System;
using System.Text;
using System.Threading;
 
namespace ConwaysGameOfLife
{
    // Plays Conway's Game of Life on the console with a random initial state.
    class Program
    {
        // The delay in milliseconds between board updates.
        private const int DELAY = 50;
 
        // The cell colors.
        private const ConsoleColor DEAD_COLOR = ConsoleColor.White;
        private const ConsoleColor LIVE_COLOR = ConsoleColor.Black;
 
        // The color of the cells that are off of the board.
        private const ConsoleColor EXTRA_COLOR = ConsoleColor.Gray;
 
        private const char EMPTY_BLOCK_CHAR = ' ';
        private const char FULL_BLOCK_CHAR = '\u2588';
 
        // Holds the current state of the board.
        private static bool[,] board;
 
        // The dimensions of the board in cells.
        private static int width = 32;
        private static int height = 32;
 
        // True if cell rules can loop around edges.
        private static bool loopEdges = true;
 
 
        static void Main(string[] args)
        {
            // Use initializeRandomBoard for a larger, random board.
            initializeDemoBoard();
 
            initializeConsole();
 
            // Run the game until the Escape key is pressed.
            while (!Console.KeyAvailable || Console.ReadKey(true).Key != ConsoleKey.Escape) {
                Program.drawBoard();
                Program.updateBoard();
 
                // Wait for a bit between updates.
                Thread.Sleep(DELAY);
            }
        }
 
        // Sets up the Console.
        private static void initializeConsole()
        {
            Console.BackgroundColor = EXTRA_COLOR;
            Console.Clear();
 
            Console.CursorVisible = false;
 
            // Each cell is two characters wide.
            // Using an extra row on the bottom to prevent scrolling when drawing the board.
            int width = Math.Max(Program.width, 8) * 2 + 1;
            int height = Math.Max(Program.height, 8) + 1;
            Console.SetWindowSize(width, height);
            Console.SetBufferSize(width, height);
 
            Console.BackgroundColor = DEAD_COLOR;
            Console.ForegroundColor = LIVE_COLOR;
        }
 
        // Creates the initial board with a random state.
        private static void initializeRandomBoard()
        {
            var random = new Random();
 
            Program.board = new bool[Program.width, Program.height];
            for (var y = 0; y < Program.height; y++) {
                for (var x = 0; x < Program.width; x++) {
                    // Equal probability of being true or false.
                    Program.board[x, y] = random.Next(2) == 0;
                }
            }
        }
 
        // Creates a 3x3 board with a blinker.
        private static void initializeDemoBoard()
        {
            Program.width = 3;
            Program.height = 3;
 
            Program.loopEdges = false;
 
            Program.board = new bool[3, 3];
            Program.board[1, 0] = true;
            Program.board[1, 1] = true;
            Program.board[1, 2] = true;
        }
 
        // Draws the board to the console.
        private static void drawBoard()
        {
            // One Console.Write call is much faster than writing each cell individually.
            var builder = new StringBuilder();
 
            for (var y = 0; y < Program.height; y++) {
                for (var x = 0; x < Program.width; x++) {
                    char c = Program.board[x, y] ? FULL_BLOCK_CHAR : EMPTY_BLOCK_CHAR;
 
                    // Each cell is two characters wide.
                    builder.Append(c);
                    builder.Append(c);
                }
                builder.Append('\n');
            }
 
            // Write the string to the console.
            Console.SetCursorPosition(0, 0);
            Console.Write (builder.ToString());
        }
 
        // Moves the board to the next state based on Conway's rules.
        private static void updateBoard()
        {
            // A temp variable to hold the next state while it's being calculated.
            bool[,] newBoard = new bool[Program.width, Program.height];
 
            for (var y = 0; y < Program.height; y++) {
                for (var x = 0; x < Program.width; x++) {
                    var n = countLiveNeighbors(x, y);
                    var c = Program.board[x, y];
 
                    // A live cell dies unless it has exactly 2 or 3 live neighbors.
                    // A dead cell remains dead unless it has exactly 3 live neighbors.
                    newBoard[x, y] = c && (n == 2 || n == 3) || !c && n == 3;
                }
            }
 
            // Set the board to its new state.
            Program.board = newBoard;
        }
 
        // Returns the number of live neighbors around the cell at position (x,y).
        private static int countLiveNeighbors(int x, int y)
        {
            // The number of live neighbors.
            int value = 0;
 
            // This nested loop enumerates the 9 cells in the specified cells neighborhood.
            for (var j = -1; j <= 1; j++) {
                // If loopEdges is set to false and y+j is off the board, continue.
                if (!Program.loopEdges && y + j < 0 || y + j >= Program.height) {
                    continue;
                }
 
                // Loop around the edges if y+j is off the board.
                int k = (y + j + Program.height) % Program.height;
 
                for (var i = -1; i <= 1; i++) {
                    // If loopEdges is set to false and x+i is off the board, continue.
                    if (!Program.loopEdges && x + i < 0 || x + i >= Program.width) {
                        continue;
                    }
 
                    // Loop around the edges if x+i is off the board.
                    int h = (x + i + Program.width) % Program.width;
 
                    // Count the neighbor cell at (h,k) if it is alive.
                    value += Program.board[h, k] ? 1 : 0;
                }
            }
 
            // Subtract 1 if (x,y) is alive since we counted it as a neighbor.
            return value - (Program.board[x, y] ? 1 : 0);
        }
    }
}

(defun next-life (array &optional results)
  (let* ((dimensions (array-dimensions array))
         (results (or results (make-array dimensions :element-type 'bit))))
    (destructuring-bind (rows columns) dimensions
      (labels ((entry (row col)
                 "Return array(row,col) for valid (row,col) else 0."
                 (if (or (not (< -1 row rows))
                         (not (< -1 col columns)))
                   0
                   (aref array row col)))
               (neighbor-count (row col &aux (count 0))
                 "Return the sum of the neighbors of (row,col)."
                 (dolist (r (list (1- row) row (1+ row)) count)
                   (dolist (c (list (1- col) col (1+ col)))
                     (unless (and (eql r row) (eql c col))
                       (incf count (entry r c))))))
               (live-or-die? (current-state neighbor-count)
                 (if (or (and (eql current-state 1)
                              (<=  2 neighbor-count 3))
                         (and (eql current-state 0)
                              (eql neighbor-count 3)))
                   1
                   0)))
        (dotimes (row rows results)
          (dotimes (column columns)
            (setf (aref results row column)
                  (live-or-die? (aref array row column)
                                (neighbor-count row column)))))))))
 
(defun print-grid (grid &optional (out *standard-output*))
  (destructuring-bind (rows columns) (array-dimensions grid)
    (dotimes (r rows grid)
      (dotimes (c columns (terpri out))
        (write-char (if (zerop (aref grid r c)) #\+ #\#) out)))))
 
(defun run-life (&optional world (iterations 10) (out *standard-output*))
  (let* ((world (or world (make-array '(10 10) :element-type 'bit)))
         (result (make-array (array-dimensions world) :element-type 'bit)))
    (do ((i 0 (1+ i))) ((eql i iterations) world)
      (terpri out) (print-grid world out)
      (psetq world (next-life world result)
             result world))))

import std.stdio, std.string, std.algorithm, std.array, std.conv;
 
struct GameOfLife {
  enum Cell : char { dead = ' ', alive = '#' }
  Cell[][] grid, newGrid;
 
  this(in int x, in int y) pure nothrow @safe {
    grid = new typeof(grid)(y + 2, x + 2);
    newGrid = new typeof(grid)(y + 2, x + 2);
  }
 
  void opIndexAssign(in string[] v, in size_t y, in size_t x)
  pure /*nothrow*/ @safe /*@nogc*/ {
    foreach (immutable nr, row; v)
      foreach (immutable nc, state; row)
        grid[y + nr][x + nc] = state.to!Cell;
  }
 
  void iteration() pure nothrow @safe @nogc {
    newGrid[0][] = Cell.dead;
    newGrid[$ - 1][] = Cell.dead;
    foreach (row; newGrid)
      row[0] = row[$ - 1] = Cell.dead;
 
    foreach (immutable r; 1 .. grid.length - 1)
      foreach (immutable c; 1 .. grid[0].length - 1) {
        uint count = 0;
        foreach (immutable i; -1 .. 2)
          foreach (immutable j; -1 .. 2)
            if (i != 0 || j != 0)
              count += grid[r + i][c + j] == Cell.alive;
        immutable a = count == 3 ||
                      (count == 2 && grid[r][c] == Cell.alive);
        newGrid[r][c] = a ? Cell.alive : Cell.dead;
      }
 
    grid.swap(newGrid);
  }
 
  string toString() const pure /*nothrow @safe*/ {
    auto ret = "-".replicate(grid[0].length - 1) ~ "\n";
    foreach (const row; grid[1 .. $ - 1])
      ret ~= "|%(%c%)|\n".format(row[1 .. $ - 1]);
    return ret ~ "-".replicate(grid[0].length - 1);
  }
}
 
void main() /*@safe*/ {
  immutable glider1 = ["  #", "# #", " ##"];
  immutable glider2 = ["#  ", "# #", "## "];
 
  auto uni = GameOfLife(60, 20);
  uni[3,  2] = glider1;
  uni[3, 15] = glider2;
  uni[3, 19] = glider1;
  uni[3, 32] = glider2;
  uni[5, 50] = [" #  #", "#  ", "#   #", "#### "];
  uni.writeln;
 
  foreach (immutable _; 0 .. 20) {
    uni.iteration;
    uni.writeln;
  }
}

package main
 
import (
	"bytes"
	"fmt"
	"math/rand"
	"time"
)
 
type Field struct {
	s    [][]bool
	w, h int
}
 
func NewField(w, h int) Field {
	s := make([][]bool, h)
	for i := range s {
		s[i] = make([]bool, w)
	}
	return Field{s: s, w: w, h: h}
}
 
func (f Field) Set(x, y int, b bool) {
	f.s[y][x] = b
}
 
func (f Field) Next(x, y int) bool {
	on := 0
	for i := -1; i <= 1; i++ {
		for j := -1; j <= 1; j++ {
			if f.State(x+i, y+j) && !(j == 0 && i == 0) {
				on++
			}
		}
	}
	return on == 3 || on == 2 && f.State(x, y)
}
 
func (f Field) State(x, y int) bool {
	for y < 0 {
		y += f.h
	}
	for x < 0 {
		x += f.w
	}
	return f.s[y%f.h][x%f.w]
}
 
type Life struct {
	w, h int
	a, b Field
}
 
func NewLife(w, h int) *Life {
	a := NewField(w, h)
	for i := 0; i < (w * h / 2); i++ {
		a.Set(rand.Intn(w), rand.Intn(h), true)
	}
	return &Life{
		a: a,
		b: NewField(w, h),
		w: w, h: h,
	}
}
 
func (l *Life) Step() {
	for y := 0; y < l.h; y++ {
		for x := 0; x < l.w; x++ {
			l.b.Set(x, y, l.a.Next(x, y))
		}
	}
	l.a, l.b = l.b, l.a
}
 
func (l *Life) String() string {
	var buf bytes.Buffer
	for y := 0; y < l.h; y++ {
		for x := 0; x < l.w; x++ {
			b := byte(' ')
			if l.a.State(x, y) {
				b = '*'
			}
			buf.WriteByte(b)
		}
		buf.WriteByte('\n')
	}
	return buf.String()
}
 
func main() {
	l := NewLife(80, 15)
	for i := 0; i < 300; i++ {
		l.Step()
		fmt.Print("\x0c")
		fmt.Println(l)
		time.Sleep(time.Second / 30)
	}
}

import Data.Array.Unboxed
 
type Grid = UArray (Int,Int) Bool
 -- The grid is indexed by (y, x).
 
life :: Int -> Int -> Grid -> Grid
{- Returns the given Grid advanced by one generation. -}
life w h old =
    listArray b (map f (range b))
  where b@((y1,x1),(y2,x2)) = bounds old
        f (y, x) = ( c && (n == 2 || n == 3) ) || ( not c && n == 3 )
          where c = get x y
                n = count [get (x + x') (y + y') |
                    x' <- [-1, 0, 1], y' <- [-1, 0, 1],
                    not (x' == 0 && y' == 0)]
 
        get x y | x < x1 || x > x2 = False
                | y < y1 || y > y2 = False
                | otherwise       = old ! (y, x)
 
count :: [Bool] -> Int
count = length . filter id

public class GameOfLife{
	public static void main(String[] args){
		String[] dish= {
				"_#_",
				"_#_",
				"_#_",};
		int gens= 3;
		for(int i= 0;i < gens;i++){
			System.out.println("Generation " + i + ":");
			print(dish);
			dish= life(dish);
		}
	}
 
	public static String[] life(String[] dish){
		String[] newGen= new String[dish.length];
		for(int row= 0;row < dish.length;row++){//each row
			newGen[row]= "";
			for(int i= 0;i < dish[row].length();i++){//each char in the row
				String above= "";//neighbors above
				String same= "";//neighbors in the same row
				String below= "";//neighbors below
				if(i == 0){//all the way on the left
					//no one above if on the top row
					//otherwise grab the neighbors from above
					above= (row == 0) ? null : dish[row - 1].substring(i,
									i + 2);
					same= dish[row].substring(i + 1, i + 2);
					//no one below if on the bottom row
					//otherwise grab the neighbors from below
					below= (row == dish.length - 1) ? null : dish[row + 1]
									.substring(i, i + 2);
				}else if(i == dish[row].length() - 1){//right
					//no one above if on the top row
					//otherwise grab the neighbors from above
					above= (row == 0) ? null : dish[row - 1].substring(i - 1,
									i + 1);
					same= dish[row].substring(i - 1, i);
					//no one below if on the bottom row
					//otherwise grab the neighbors from below
					below= (row == dish.length - 1) ? null : dish[row + 1]
									.substring(i - 1, i + 1);
				}else{//anywhere else
					//no one above if on the top row
					//otherwise grab the neighbors from above
					above= (row == 0) ? null : dish[row - 1].substring(i - 1,
									i + 2);
					same= dish[row].substring(i - 1, i)
									+ dish[row].substring(i + 1, i + 2);
					//no one below if on the bottom row
					//otherwise grab the neighbors from below
					below= (row == dish.length - 1) ? null : dish[row + 1]
									.substring(i - 1, i + 2);
				}
				int neighbors= getNeighbors(above, same, below);
				if(neighbors < 2 || neighbors > 3){
					newGen[row]+= "_";//<2 or >3 neighbors -> die
				}else if(neighbors == 3){
					newGen[row]+= "#";//3 neighbors -> spawn/live
				}else{
					newGen[row]+= dish[row].charAt(i);//2 neighbors -> stay
				}
			}
		}
		return newGen;
	}
 
	public static int getNeighbors(String above, String same, String below){
		int ans= 0;
		if(above != null){//no one above
			for(char x: above.toCharArray()){//each neighbor from above
				if(x == '#') ans++;//count it if someone is here
			}
		}
		for(char x: same.toCharArray()){//two on either side
			if(x == '#') ans++;//count it if someone is here
		}
		if(below != null){//no one below
			for(char x: below.toCharArray()){//each neighbor below
				if(x == '#') ans++;//count it if someone is here
			}
		}
		return ans;
	}
 
	public static void print(String[] dish){
		for(String s: dish){
			System.out.println(s);
		}
	}
}

function GameOfLife () {
 
	this.init = function (turns,width,height) {
		this.board = new Array(height);
		for (var x = 0; x < height; x++) {
			this.board[x] = new Array(width);
			for (var y = 0; y < width; y++) {
				this.board[x][y] = Math.round(Math.random());
			}
		}
		this.turns = turns;
	}
 
	this.nextGen = function() {
		this.boardNext = new Array(this.board.length);
		for (var i = 0; i < this.board.length; i++) {
			this.boardNext[i] = new Array(this.board[i].length);
		}
		for (var x = 0; x < this.board.length; x++) {
			for (var y = 0; y < this.board[x].length; y++) {
				var n = 0;
				for (var dx = -1; dx <= 1; dx++) {
					for (var dy = -1; dy <= 1; dy++) {
						if ( dx == 0 && dy == 0){}
						else if (typeof this.board[x+dx] !== 'undefined'
								&& typeof this.board[x+dx][y+dy] !== 'undefined'
								&& this.board[x+dx][y+dy]) {
							n++;
						}
					}	
				}
				var c = this.board[x][y];
				switch (n) {
					case 0:
					case 1:
						c = 0;
						break;
					case 2:
						break; 
					case 3:
						c = 1;
						break;
					default:
						c = 0;
				}
				this.boardNext[x][y] = c;
			}
		}
		this.board = this.boardNext.slice();
	}
 
	this.print = function() {
		for (var x = 0; x < this.board.length; x++) {
			var l = "";
			for (var y = 0; y < this.board[x].length; y++) {
				if (this.board[x][y])
					l += "X";
				else
					l += " ";
			}
			print(l);
		}
	}
 
	this.start = function() {
		for (var t = 0; t < this.turns; t++) {
			print("---\nTurn "+(t+1));
			this.print();
			this.nextGen()
		}
	}
 
}
 
 
var game = new GameOfLife();
 
print("---\n3x3 Blinker over three turns.");
game.init(3);
game.board = [
	[0,0,0],
	[1,1,1],
	[0,0,0]];
game.start();
 
print("---\n10x6 Glider over five turns.");
game.init(5);
game.board = [
	[0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0],
	[0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0,0],
	[0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0,0],
	[0,1,1,1,0,0,0,0,0,0],
	[0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0],
	[0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0,0]];
game.start();
 
print("---\nRandom 5x10");
game.init(5,5,10);
game.start();

function Evolve( cell )
    local m = #cell
    local cell2 = {}
    for i = 1, m do
        cell2[i] = {}
        for j = 1, m do
            cell2[i][j] = cell[i][j]
        end
    end
 
    for i = 1, m do
        for j = 1, m do
            local count
            if cell2[i][j] == 0 then count = 0 else count = -1 end
            for x = -1, 1 do
                for y = -1, 1 do
                    if i+x >= 1 and i+x <= m and j+y >= 1 and j+y <= m and cell2[i+x][j+y] == 1 then count = count + 1 end
                end
            end
            if count < 2 or count > 3 then cell[i][j] = 0 end
            if count == 3 then cell[i][j] = 1 end
        end
    end
 
    return cell
end    
 
 
m = 3                   -- number rows / colums
num_iterations = 10
 
cell = {}
for i = 1, m do
    cell[i] = {}
    for j = 1, m do
        cell[i][j] = 0
    end
end
 
cell[2][2], cell[2][1], cell[2][3] = 1, 1, 1 
 
for l = 1, num_iterations do
    for i = 1, m do
        for j = 1, m do
            if cell[i][j] == 1 then io.write( "#" ) else io.write( " " ) end
        end
        io.write( "\n" )
    end    
 
    cell = Evolve( cell )
end    

let get g x y =
  try g.(x).(y)
  with _ -> 0
 
let neighbourhood g x y =
  (get g (x-1) (y-1)) +
  (get g (x-1) (y  )) +
  (get g (x-1) (y+1)) +
  (get g (x  ) (y-1)) +
  (get g (x  ) (y+1)) +
  (get g (x+1) (y-1)) +
  (get g (x+1) (y  )) +
  (get g (x+1) (y+1)) 
 
let next_cell g x y =
  let n = neighbourhood g x y in
  match g.(x).(y), n with
  | 1, 0 | 1, 1                      -> 0  (* lonely *)
  | 1, 4 | 1, 5 | 1, 6 | 1, 7 | 1, 8 -> 0  (* overcrowded *)
  | 1, 2 | 1, 3                      -> 1  (* lives *)
  | 0, 3                             -> 1  (* get birth *)
  | _ (* 0, (0|1|2|4|5|6|7|8) *)     -> 0  (* barren *)
 
let copy g = Array.map Array.copy g
 
let next g =
  let width = Array.length g
  and height = Array.length g.(0)
  and new_g = copy g in
  for x = 0 to pred width do
    for y = 0 to pred height do
      new_g.(x).(y) <- (next_cell g x y)
    done
  done;
  (new_g)
 
let print g =
  let width = Array.length g
  and height = Array.length g.(0) in
  for x = 0 to pred width do
    for y = 0 to pred height do
      if g.(x).(y) = 0
      then print_char '.'
      else print_char 'o'
    done;
    print_newline()
  done

program Gol;
// Game of life
{$IFDEF FPC}
   //save as gol.pp/gol.pas
  {$Mode delphi}
{$ELSE}
  //for Delphi save as gol.dpr
  {$Apptype Console}
{$ENDIF}
uses
  crt;
 
const
  colMax = 76;
  rowMax = 22;
  dr = colMax+2; // element count of one row
 
  cDelay = 20;  // delay in ms
 
(*
expand field by one row/column before and after
for easier access no special treatment of torus
*)
 
type
  tFldElem  = byte;//0..1
  tpFldElem = ^tFldElem;
  tRow = array[0..colMax+1] of tFldElem;
  tpRow = ^tRow;
  tBoard = array[0..rowMax+1] of tRow;
  tpBoard = ^tBoard;
  tpBoards = array[0..1] of tpBoard;
 
type
  tIntArr = array[0..2*dr+2] of tFldElem;
  tpIntArr = ^tIntArr;
 
var
  aBoard,bBoard : tBoard;
  pBoards :tpBoards;
  gblActBoard : byte;
  gblUseTorus :boolean;
  gblGenCnt   : integer;
 
procedure PrintGen;
const
  cChar: array[0..1] of char = (' ','#');
var
  p0 : tpIntArr;
  col,row: integer;
  s : string[colMax];
begin
  setlength(s,colmax);
  gotoxy(1,1);
  writeln(gblGenCnt:10);
  For row := 1 to rowMax do
  begin
    p0 := @pBoards[gblActBoard]^[row,0];;
    For col := 1 to colMax do
      s[col] := cChar[p0[col]];
    writeln(s);
  end;
  delay(cDelay);
end;
 
procedure Init0(useTorus:boolean);
begin
  gblUseTorus := useTorus;
  gblGenCnt := 0;
  fillchar(aBoard,SizeOf(aBoard),#0);
  pBoards[0] := @aBoard;
  pBoards[1] := @bBoard;
  gblActBoard := 0;
 
  clrscr;
end;
 
procedure InitRandom(useTorus:boolean);
var
  col,row : integer;
begin
  Init0(useTorus);
  For row := 1 to rowMax do
    For col := 1 to colMax do
      aBoard[row,col]:= tFldElem(random>0.9);
end;
 
procedure InitBlinker(useTorus:boolean);
var
  col,row : integer;
begin
  Init0(useTorus);
  For col := 1 to colMax do
  begin
    IF (col+2) mod 4 = 0 then
      begin
      For row := 1 to rowmax do
        IF row mod 4 <> 0 then
          aBoard[row,col]:= 1;
      end;
  end;
end;
 
procedure Torus;
var
  p0 : tpIntArr;
  row: integer;
begin
  //copy column 1-> colMax+1 and colMax-> 0
  p0 := @pBoards[gblActBoard]^[1,0];
  For row := 1 to rowMax do
    begin
    p0^[0] := p0^[colMax];
    p0^[colmax+1] := p0^[1];
    //next row
    p0 := Pointer(PtrUint(p0)+SizeOf(tRow));
    end;
  //copy row  1-> rowMax+1
  move(pBoards[gblActBoard]^[1,0],pBoards[gblActBoard]^[rowMax+1,0],sizeof(trow));
  //copy row  rowMax-> 0
  move(pBoards[gblActBoard]^[rowMax,0],pBoards[gblActBoard]^[0,0],sizeof(trow));
end;
 
function Survive(p: tpIntArr):tFldElem;
//p points to actual_board [row-1,col-1]
//calculates the sum of alive around [row,col] aka p^[dr+1]
//really fast using fpc 2.6.4 no element on stack
const
  cSurvives : array[boolean,0..8] of byte =
              //0,1,2,3,4,5,6,7,8     sum of alive neighbours
              ((0,0,0,1,0,0,0,0,0),   {alive =false 1->born}
               (0,0,1,1,0,0,0,0,0));  {alive =true  0->die }
var
  sum : integer;
begin
  // row above
  // sum := byte(aBoard[row-1,col-1])+byte(aBoard[row-1,col])+byte(aBoard[row-1,col+1]);
  sum :=     integer(p^[     0])+integer(p^[     1])+integer(p^[     2]);
  sum := sum+integer(p^[  dr+0])                    +integer(p^[  dr+2]);
  sum := sum+integer(p^[2*dr+0])+integer(p^[2*dr+1])+integer(p^[2*dr+2]);
  survive := cSurvives[boolean(p^[dr+1]),sum];
end;
 
procedure NextGen;
var
  p0,p1 : tpFldElem;
  row: NativeInt;
  col :NativeInt;
begin
  if gblUseTorus then
    Torus;
  p1 := @pBoards[1-gblActBoard]^[1,1];
  //One row above and one column before because of survive
  p0 := @pBoards[  gblActBoard]^[0,0];
  For row := rowMax-1 downto 0 do
  begin
    For col := colMax-1 downto 0 do
    begin
      p1^ := survive(tpIntArr(p0));
      inc(p0);
      inc(p1);
    end;
    // jump over the borders
    inc(p1,2);
    inc(p0,2);
  end;
  //aBoard := bBoard;
  gblActBoard :=1-gblActBoard;
  inc(gblGenCnt);
end;
 
begin
  InitBlinker(false);
  repeat
    PrintGen;
    NextGen;
  until keypressed;
  PrintGen;
end.

my ($width, $height, $generations) = @ARGV;
 
my $printed;
 
sub generate {
   (map
       {[ (map { rand () < 0.5 } 1 .. $width), 0 ]}
       1 .. $height),
   [(0) x ($width + 1)];
}
 
sub nexgen {
   my @prev = map {[@$_]} @_;
   my @new = map {[ (0) x ($width + 1) ]} 0 .. $height;
   foreach my $row ( 0 .. $height - 1 ) {
       foreach my $col ( 0 .. $width - 1 ) {
           my $val =
             $prev[ $row - 1 ][ $col - 1 ] +
             $prev[ $row - 1 ][ $col     ] +
             $prev[ $row - 1 ][ $col + 1 ] +
             $prev[ $row     ][ $col - 1 ] +
             $prev[ $row     ][ $col + 1 ] +
             $prev[ $row + 1 ][ $col - 1 ] +
             $prev[ $row + 1 ][ $col     ] +
             $prev[ $row + 1 ][ $col + 1 ];
           $new[$row][$col] =
               ( $prev[$row][$col] && $val == 2 || $val == 3 );
       }
   }
   return @new;
}
 
sub printlife {
   my @life = @_;
   if ($printed) {
	# Move the cursor up to print over prior generation.
	print "\e[1A" x $height;
   }
   $printed = 1;
   foreach my $row ( 0 .. $height - 1 ) {
       foreach my $col ( 0 .. $width - 1 ) {
           print($life[$row][$col]
             ? "\e[33;45;1m \e[0m"
             : "\e[1;34;1m \e[0m");
       }
       print "\n";
   }
}
 
my @life = generate;
print "Start\n";
printlife @life;
foreach my $stage ( 1 .. $generations ) {
   sleep 1;
   print "Generation $stage\n\e[1A";
   @life = nexgen @life;
   printlife @life;
}
print "\n";

import random
from collections import defaultdict
 
printdead, printlive = '-#'
maxgenerations = 3
cellcount = 3,3
celltable = defaultdict(int, {
 (1, 2): 1,
 (1, 3): 1,
 (0, 3): 1,
 } ) # Only need to populate with the keys leading to life
 
##
## Start States
##
# blinker
u = universe = defaultdict(int)
u[(1,0)], u[(1,1)], u[(1,2)] = 1,1,1
 
## toad
#u = universe = defaultdict(int)
#u[(5,5)], u[(5,6)], u[(5,7)] = 1,1,1
#u[(6,6)], u[(6,7)], u[(6,8)] = 1,1,1
 
## glider
#u = universe = defaultdict(int)
#maxgenerations = 16
#u[(5,5)], u[(5,6)], u[(5,7)] = 1,1,1
#u[(6,5)] = 1
#u[(7,6)] = 1
 
## random start
#universe = defaultdict(int, 
#                       # array of random start values
#                       ( ((row, col), random.choice((0,1)))
#                         for col in range(cellcount[0])
#                         for row in range(cellcount[1])
#                       ) )  # returns 0 for out of bounds
 
for i in range(maxgenerations):
    print "\nGeneration %3i:" % ( i, )
    for row in range(cellcount[1]):
        print "  ", ''.join(str(universe[(row,col)])
                            for col in range(cellcount[0])).replace(
                                '0', printdead).replace('1', printlive)
    nextgeneration = defaultdict(int)
    for row in range(cellcount[1]):
        for col in range(cellcount[0]):
            nextgeneration[(row,col)] = celltable[
                ( universe[(row,col)],
                  -universe[(row,col)] + sum(universe[(r,c)]
                                             for r in range(row-1,row+2)
                                             for c in range(col-1, col+2) )
                ) ]
    universe = nextgeneration

# Generates a new board - either a random one, sample blinker or gliders, or user specified.
gen.board <- function(type="random", nrow=3, ncol=3, seeds=NULL)
{
    if(type=="random")
    {
       return(matrix(runif(nrow*ncol) > 0.5, nrow=nrow, ncol=ncol))
    } else if(type=="blinker")
    {
       seeds <- list(c(2,1),c(2,2),c(2,3))
    } else if(type=="glider")
    {
       seeds <- list(c(1,2),c(2,3),c(3,1), c(3,2), c(3,3))
    }
    board <- matrix(FALSE, nrow=nrow, ncol=ncol) 
    for(k in seq_along(seeds))
    {
      board[seeds[[k]][1],seeds[[k]][2]] <- TRUE
    }
    board
}
 
# Returns the number of living neighbours to a location
count.neighbours <- function(x,i,j) 
{   
   sum(x[max(1,i-1):min(nrow(x),i+1),max(1,j-1):min(ncol(x),j+1)]) - x[i,j]
}
 
# Implements the rulebase
determine.new.state <- function(board, i, j)
{
   N <- count.neighbours(board,i,j)
   (N == 3 || (N ==2 && board[i,j]))
}
 
# Generates the next interation of the board from the existing one
evolve <- function(board)
{ 
   newboard <- board
   for(i in seq_len(nrow(board)))
   {
      for(j in seq_len(ncol(board)))
      {
         newboard[i,j] <- determine.new.state(board,i,j)         
      }   
   }
   newboard
}
 
# Plays the game.  By default, the board is shown in a plot window, though output to the console if possible.
game.of.life <- function(board, nsteps=50, timebetweensteps=0.25, graphicaloutput=TRUE)
{
   if(!require(lattice)) stop("lattice package could not be loaded")   
   nr <- nrow(board)
 
   for(i in seq_len(nsteps))
   {
      if(graphicaloutput) 
      {
         print(levelplot(t(board[nr:1,]), colorkey=FALSE)) 
      } else print(board)  
 
      Sys.sleep(timebetweensteps)
 
      newboard <- evolve(board)
 
      if(all(newboard==board))
      {
         message("board is static")
         break
      } else if(sum(newboard) < 1)
      {
         message("everything is dead")
         break
      } else board <- newboard
   }   
   invisible(board)
}
 
# Example usage
game.of.life(gen.board("blinker"))
game.of.life(gen.board("glider", 18, 20))
game.of.life(gen.board(, 50, 50))

def game_of_life(name, size, generations, initial_life=nil)
  board = new_board size
  seed board, size, initial_life
  print_board board, name, 0
  reason = generations.times do |gen|
    new = evolve board, size
    print_board new, name, gen+1
    break :all_dead if barren? new, size
    break :static   if board == new
    board = new
  end
  if    reason == :all_dead then puts "no more life."
  elsif reason == :static   then puts "no movement"
  else                           puts "specified lifetime ended"
  end
  puts
end
 
def new_board(n)
  Array.new(n) {Array.new(n, 0)}
end
 
def seed(board, n, points=nil)
  if points.nil?
    # randomly seed board
    indices = []
    n.times {|x| n.times {|y| indices << [x,y] }}
    indices.shuffle[0,10].each {|x,y| board[y][x] = 1}
  else
    points.each {|x, y| board[y][x] = 1}
  end
end
 
def evolve(board, n)
  new = new_board n
  n.times {|i| n.times {|j| new[i][j] = fate board, i, j, n}}
  new
end
 
def fate(board, i, j, n)
  i1 = [0, i-1].max; i2 = [i+1, n-1].min
  j1 = [0, j-1].max; j2 = [j+1, n-1].min
  sum = 0
  for ii in (i1..i2)
    for jj in (j1..j2)
      sum += board[ii][jj] if not (ii == i and jj == j)
    end
  end
  (sum == 3 or (sum == 2 and board[i][j] == 1)) ? 1 : 0
end
 
def barren?(board, n)
  n.times {|i| n.times {|j| return false if board[i][j] == 1}}
  true
end
 
def print_board(m, name, generation)
  puts "#{name}: generation #{generation}"
  m.each {|row| row.each {|val| print "#{val == 1 ? '#' : '.'} "}; puts}
end
 
game_of_life "blinker", 3, 2, [[1,0],[1,1],[1,2]]
game_of_life "glider", 4, 4, [[1,0],[2,1],[0,2],[1,2],[2,2]]
game_of_life "random", 5, 10

package require Tcl 8.5 
 
proc main {} {
    evolve 3 blinker [initialize_tableau {3 3} {{0 1} {1 1} {2 1}}]
    evolve 5 glider  [initialize_tableau {4 4} {{0 1} {1 2} {2 0} {2 1} {2 2}}]
}
 
proc evolve {generations name tableau} {
    for {set gen 1} {$gen <= $generations} {incr gen} {
        puts "$name generation $gen:"
        print $tableau
        set tableau [next_generation $tableau]
    }
    puts ""
}
 
proc initialize_tableau {size initial_life} {
    lassign $size ::max_x ::max_y 
    set tableau [blank_tableau]
    foreach point $initial_life {
        lset tableau {*}$point 1
    }
    return $tableau
}
 
proc blank_tableau {} {
    return [lrepeat $::max_x [lrepeat $::max_y 0]]
}
 
proc print {tableau} {
    foreach row $tableau {puts [string map {0 . 1 #} [join $row]]}
}
 
proc next_generation {tableau} {
    set new [blank_tableau]
    for {set x 0} {$x < $::max_x} {incr x} {
        for {set y 0} {$y < $::max_y} {incr y} {
            lset new $x $y [fate [list $x $y] $tableau]
        }
    }
    return $new
}
 
proc fate {point tableau} {
    set current [value $point $tableau]
    set neighbours [sum_neighbours $point $tableau]
    return [expr {($neighbours == 3) || ($neighbours == 2 && $current == 1)}]
}
 
proc value {point tableau} {
    return [lindex $tableau {*}$point]
}
 
proc sum_neighbours {point tableau} {
    set sum 0
    foreach neighbour [get_neighbours $point] {
        incr sum [value $neighbour $tableau]
    }
    return $sum
}
 
proc get_neighbours {point} {
    lassign $point x y
    set results [list]
    foreach x_off {-1 0 1} {
        foreach y_off {-1 0 1} {
            if { ! ($x_off == 0 && $y_off == 0)} {
                set i [expr {$x + $x_off}] 
                set j [expr {$y + $y_off}]
                if {(0 <= $i && $i < $::max_x) && (0 <= $j && $j < $::max_y)} {
                    lappend results [list $i $j]
                }
            }
        }
    }
    return $results
}
 
main
